,job_title,company,location,salary,description,counts,city
0,Desktop Support Specialist (Senior Level),Sanametrix,"Washington, DC",$18 - $30 an hour,"Sanametrix is currently identifying qualified candidates for a Desktop Support Technician position located in Washington, D.C. Duties and Responsibilities:Configures, installs, and supports desktop and laptop computers, handheld devices, printers, monitors, portable data storage devices, and other general peripherals.Provides enhanced desktop and user support service to VIP customers.Relocates IT equipment including desktop computers, printers, monitors, portable data storage devices, and other general peripherals.Configures IT devices for secure operation, including installation of security software,software updates, and other configurations as required.Connects and configures IT devices to use computer networks.Diagnose hardware and software failures, communicates the remediation plans to users, and provide status updates.Provides software support for users, including basic to advanced software operations and assistance with general use of software, computers, and peripherals.Supports laptop and desktop maintenance, including inventory and software distribution.Support security maintenance, including anti-virus software updates and patch management.Provides virtual assistance sessions using privileged access management software.Develops end-user documentation and instructions.Contributes knowledge and updates to Desktop Support SOPs and Training materials as needed.Support disaster recovery and adapt to documented recovery situations.Ability to work well under pressure and to meet deadlines as needed.Uses an IT ticket system, is responsible for receiving and tracking the trouble tickets, assigns them to a technical specialist (could be themselves or someone else) for action and ensures that their tickets are resolved.Tracks and updates the movement of all IT assets (laptops, desktops, printers, etc.) within the stipulated database and within time constraints.Stays in regular communication throughout the day with other tiers of support and Management staff.Maintains a professional attitude and appearance while providing excellent customer service.Maintaining a good work ethic and assist other technicians when needed.Participates in issue troubleshooting with the objective of root cause identification.Must be able to obtain a Public Trust security clearance.Must have at 5-7 years of experience servicing customers in a Desktop SupportOne or more of the following industry certifications is highly desired.Help Desk Institute (HDI)CompTIA A+CompTIA Network+CompTIA Security++MCSA: Windows 10MCSE: Desktop InfrastructureMCDST: Microsoft Certified Desktop Support TechnicianITIL Foundation (within 3 months of hire).The customer requires successful candidates to agree to obtain ITIL Foundation level certification within their first 3 months of employment.Due to Covid-19 candidates will be temporarily allowed to work from but will be required to come into the office 1-2 days a week. Best practices will be implemented for the safety of all Sanametrix employees.Job Type: Full-timePay: $18.00 - $30.00 per hourSchedule:Monday to FridayWork Location:One locationThis Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:Dependable -- more reliable than spontaneousAdaptable/flexible -- enjoys doing work that requires frequent shifts in directionDetail-oriented -- would rather focus on the details of work than the bigger pictureAchievement-oriented -- enjoys taking on challenges, even if they might failBenefit Conditions:Only full-time employees eligibleWork Remotely:Temporarily due to COVID-19COVID-19 Precaution(s):Remote interview processSocial distancing guidelines in placeVirtual meetingsSanitizing, disinfecting, or cleaning procedures in place",767,Washington
1,"Equipment Specialist (Electronics and Combat Systems), GS-1670-13",US U.S. Coast Guard,"Washington, DC 20593 (Saint Elizabeths area)","$103,690 - $134,798 a year","Duties
Summary
This position is located in the Department of Homeland Security, U.S. Coast Guard, Deputy Commandant for Mission Support, Assistant Commandant for Command, Control Communication, Computers and Information Technology (CG-6), Office of C5I Program Management (CG-68), C5I Systems and Capabilities Management Division (CG-681), Washington, DC.

Responsibilities
The position serves as the Senior Navy Type (NT)/Navy Owned (N/O) Equipment Manager for the U.S. Coast Guard (USCG) acting as liaison to the U.S. Navy Program Executive Office Integrated Warfare Systems (PEO IWS), and is seated at USCG HQ.

Being a CG civilian makes you a valuable member of the CG team. Typical work assignments include:

Serving as the primary liaison between Navy PEO IWS and the Coast Guard to ensure fielding of NT/NO equipment on board Coast Guard platforms is in a manner consistent with the objectives and timelines of the Department of Homeland Security Acquisition Lifecycle Framework and the Coast Guard’s specific asses programs
Participating in meetings, conferences, Program Reviews and Engineering Working Groups with managers of other projects, programs, and with other technical managers to coordinate developmental activities and ensure effective project integration within the Coast Guard
Meeting with Program/Sponsor’s Representatives and Acquisition Managers to understand operational requirements and missions for Coast Guard platforms and to achieve those objectives through the prudent selection of NT/NO technology
Reviewing professional and technical journals, research reports, Coast Guard and Navy performance data to maintain cognizance of new technological developments in the combat electronic systems field, and to identify emerging technology requirements
Working with the Coast Guard Forces Readiness Command (FORCECOM) and CG-1B3 to identify and address training gaps for NT/NO equipment and finds solutions to address those gaps, including cost sharing with Navy Programs for training
Partnering with PEO IWS to facilitate the technology selection process by providing specific guidance on Coast Guard requirements and missions and acquisition schedules

Travel Required
Occasional travel - This position requires occasional travel.
Supervisory status
No
Promotion Potential
13
Job family (Series)
1670 Equipment Services
Requirements

Requirements
Conditions of Employment
U.S. Citizenship is required.
Males born after 12/31/1959 must be registered for Selective Service.
This position requires a Secret clearance.
A one-year probationary period may be required.
All qualification requirements must be met by the closing date of the announcement. This includes Time-In-Grade requirements for current status employees applying through merit promotion procedures. Status applicants applying for a promotion must have 52 weeks of service at the next lower grade.
Qualifications
To qualify for the GS-13 grade level: Applicants must have one year of specialized experience equivalent to the GS-12 level (in the Federal sector). Specialized experience is experience that has equipped you with the particular ability, skill, and knowledge to successfully perform the duties of this position and is typically in or related to this line of work.

Examples of specialized experience include: working as a skilled mechanic or maintenance worker, sales or service engineer, or planner or estimator in a technical group; analyzing contract specifications and examining pertinent equipment; reading and interpreting engineering change orders, equipment requisitions, shop orders and work orders.

National Service Experience (i.e., volunteer experience): Experience refers to paid and unpaid experience, including volunteer work done through National Service programs (e.g., Peace Corps, AmeriCorps) and other organizations (e.g., professional; philanthropic; religious; spiritual; community, student, social). Volunteer work helps build critical competencies, knowledge, and skills and can provide valuable training and experience that translates directly to paid employment. You will receive credit for all qualifying experience, including volunteer experience.

The Office of Personnel management (OPM) must authorize employment offers made to current or former political appointees. If you are currently, or have been within the last 5 years, a political Schedule A, Schedule, C, Non-career SES or Presidential Appointee employee in the Executive Branch, you must disclose this information to the Human Resources Office.
Education
This position does not have a positive education requirement. If you are including education on your resume, report only attendance and/or degrees from schools accredited by accrediting institutions recognized by the U.S. Department of Education. See Required Documents section for detail.

FOREIGN EDUCATION: Education completed in foreign colleges or universities may be used to meet Federal qualification requirements if you can show that your foreign education is comparable to education received in accredited educational institutions in the United States. It is your responsibility to provide such evidence with your application. See Recognition of Foreign Qualifications click here
Additional information
Applicants will be required to complete questions contained on the Declaration for Federal Employment (OF-306) at the time a tentative job offer is made. Certain responses on the form could pose a problem with suitability for employment determinations. If you receive a conditional offer of employment for this position, you will be required to complete/make updates to the OF-306 and to sign and certify the accuracy of all information in your application, prior to entry on duty. False statements on any part of the application may result in withdrawal of offer of employment, dismissal after beginning work, or imprisonment.

DHS uses e-Verify, an Internet-based system, to confirm the eligibility of all newly hired employees to work in the United States. Learn more about e-Verify, including your rights and responsibilities at click here

Recruitment incentives may be authorized.

All Federal employees are required to have Federal salary payments made by direct deposit.

The Department of Homeland Security encourages persons with disabilities to apply, to include persons with intellectual, severe physical or psychiatric disabilities, as defined by 5 CFR § 213.3102(u), and/or Disabled Veterans with a compensable service-connected disability of 30 percent or more as defined by 5 CFR § 315.707. Veterans, Peace Corps/VISTA volunteers, and persons with disabilities possess a wealth of unique talents, experiences, and competencies that can be invaluable to the DHS mission. If you are a member of one of these groups, you may not have to compete with the public for federal jobs. To determine your eligibility for non-competitive appointment and to understand the required documentation, click on the links above or contact the Servicing Human Resources Office listed at the bottom of this announcement.

More than 1 selection may be made from this announcement if additional identical vacancies in the same title, series, grade, and unit occur within 45 days from the date the certificate was issued.

If you need a reasonable accommodation for the application and hiring process, please contact 202-795-6302. Decisions on granting reasonable accommodation will be made on a case-by-case basis. Visit Reasonable Accommodation


How You Will Be Evaluated
You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications above.
We will review your résumé and supporting documentation to ensure you meet the basic qualification requirements. If you meet the minimum qualifications, your experience, education and training will be rated using the on-line self assessment questions that are based on the following competencies or knowledge, skills, and abilities needed to perform this job:
Expert knowledge of the principles, concepts terminology, techniques, and methods used in electronics/electrical engineering, which enable the employee to serve as a technical expert for relevant combat systems.
Expert knowledge of combat systems, capabilities, configurations and integration
Knowledge of Federal procurement policies, procedures, and regulations
Comprehensive knowledge and ability to resolve difficult equipment problems and provide technical advice and leadership in developing, implementing, evaluating and improving provisioning processes and procedures
Ability to analyze and evaluate current and proposed policies, rules, regulations, and legislation regarding the operation and maintenance of equipment and systems
Your resume and responses to the self-assessment questions are an integral part of the process for determining your qualifications for the position. Therefore, you must support your responses to the self-assessment questions by providing examples of past and present experience in your resume.

If you are best qualified, you may be referred to the hiring manager for consideration and may be called for an interview.

Consideration will be given to performance appraisals and incentive awards as an indicator of quality of prior experience; no points will be assigned.

To preview questions please click here.

Background checks and security clearance
Security clearance
Secret
Drug test required
No
Position sensitivity and risk
Noncritical-Sensitive (NCS)/Moderate Risk
Trust determination process
Credentialing, Suitability/Fitness
Required Documents

Required Documents
1. Resume

2. Completed online questionnaire
3. Current or former federal employees, submit a copy of most recent SF-50, Notice of Personnel Action, which demonstrates your eligibility for consideration, e.g., length of time you have been in your current/highest grade. Examples of appropriate SF-50s include promotions, with-in grade increases, NOT performance awards.

4. If qualifying based on education, submit a legible copy of your unofficial college transcript from an accredited college/university. The transcript must reflect the college/university name and/or logo. Applicants are highly encouraged to proactively order a copy of their official transcripts to be delivered to their home address so transcripts will be readily available if selected. If selected, official transcripts are required prior to establishing your start date. Foreign education completed in foreign colleges or universities may be used to meet education requirements if you can show that it is comparable to education received in U.S. accredited institutions. Provide proof with your application. Please see click here.

5. If claiming special priority selection rights under the Interagency Career Transition Assistance Program (ICTAP), submit a copy of your agency notice, most recent performance rating and most recent SF-50, noting your current position, grade level and duty location. If you have never worked for the federal government, you are not ICTAP eligible. To be considered eligible, you must be placed in the well-qualified category for this position. Please see ICTAP eligibility.

6. If you are claiming veterans’ preference, submit the following documents. Please see Feds Hire Vets for detail.

a. Veterans claiming 5 point veterans' preference must submit legible Member 4 Copy DD214(s) indicating Character of Service. 5-point preference will not be granted if appropriate documentation is not submitted.

b. 30% Disabled Veterans must submit their Member Copy 4 DD-214(s), which includes Character of Service, and VA Disability Letter with percentage of disability OR documentation of disability determination from a branch of the Armed Forces which reflects a compensable service-connected disability of 30% or more.

c. Other 10 point Preference Eligibles must submit applicable Member Copy 4 DD-214(s), which includes Character of Service, and provide documentation of 10 point preference described on the back of the SF-15. 10-point preference will not be granted if appropriate documentation is not submitted with your application.

d. If you are a current active duty military member who does not have a DD214 and is claiming preference under the Veterans Opportunity to Work (VOW) Act, submit certification from the Armed Forces indicating that you will be discharged or released under honorable conditions from active duty within 120 days from the date on the certification. Certifications must be on letterhead from the appropriate military branch and include: military dates of service and expected discharge or release date, character of service, military rank, type of discharge and date when terminal leave will begin. Certifications must be signed by, or by direction of military members’ military personnel offices, unit commanders or higher headquarters.

7. If requesting consideration under Executive Order 13473, you must submit proof. To confirm eligibility for appointment based on the National Defense Authorization Act for FY 2019 (NDAA), submit a copy of the marriage certificate to the military member and a copy of your spouses’ active duty military orders (e.g., most recent military orders, PCS orders, etc.). Spouses of military members who are on retirement or separation PCS orders from active duty are not eligible to be appointed unless the member was injured with a 100% rating; or was released/discharged from active duty due to the member’s death while on active duty. Widows or widowers, who are not remarried, of military service members who were killed on active duty must submit a DD-1300.

8. OPM must authorize employment offers for former or current Political Appointees. If you are currently, or have been within the last 5 years, a political Schedule A, Schedule C or Non-Career SES employee in the Executive Branch, you must disclose this information. Submit proof of your former or current status, such as your SF-50. Please see here.

All documentation as outlined above must be received by the closing date of the announcement. If you are unable to submit your documents electronically, you may fax or mail the documents. A fax cover sheet will be provided to you from the system with fax number and instructions. Required documents will also be accepted by mail and must be received by the closing date of the announcement. The mailing address is COMMANDANT (CG-123HQ), ATTN OFFICE OF CIVILIAN HUMAN RESOURCES (JOBS), US COAST GUARD, 2703 MARTIN LUTHER KING JR AVE SE STOP 7912, WASHINGTON, DC 20593-7912.
If you are relying on your education to meet qualification requirements:
Education must be accredited by an accrediting institution recognized by the U.S. Department of Education in order for it to be credited towards qualifications. Therefore, provide only the attendance and/or degrees from schools accredited by accrediting institutions recognized by the U.S. Department of Education.
Failure to provide all of the required information as stated in this vacancy announcement may result in an ineligible rating or may affect the overall rating.
Benefits

Benefits
A career with the U.S. Government provides employees with a comprehensive benefits package. As a federal employee, you and your family will have access to a range of benefits that are designed to make your federal career very rewarding. Opens in a new windowLearn more about federal benefits.
DHS offers competitive salaries and an attractive benefits package, including: health, dental, vision, life, and long-term care insurance; retirement plan; Thrift Savings Plan [similar to a 401(K)]; Flexible Spending Account; Employee Assistance Program; personal leave days; and paid federal holidays. Other benefits may include: flexible work schedules; telework; tuition reimbursement; transportation subsidies; uniform allowance; health and wellness programs; and fitness centers. DHS is committed to employee development and offers a variety of employee training and development opportunities. For more information, go to the DHS Careers website and select “Benefits”. Disabled veteran leave will be available to any Federal employee hired on or after November 5, 2016, who is a veteran with a service-connected disability rating of 30 percent or more.
Eligibility for benefits depends on the type of position you hold and whether your position is full-time, part-time, or intermittent. Contact the hiring agency for more information on the specific benefits offered.
Help
This job is open to
Individuals with disabilities
Federal employees - Competitive service
Current or former competitive service federal employees.
Internal to an agency
Current federal employees of this agency.
Career transition (CTAP, ICTAP, RPL)
Federal employees who meet the definition of a ""surplus"" or ""displaced"" employee.
Land & base management
Certain current or former term or temporary federal employees of a land or base management agency.
Military spouses
Peace Corps & AmeriCorps Vista
Special authorities
Individuals eligible under a special authority not listed above, but defined in the federal hiring regulations.
Veterans
Clarification from the agency
Status Candidates, Current Federal Employees, Former Federal Employees, Former Overseas Employees, CTAP, ICTAP, 30% Disabled, Schedule A, Individuals with Disabilities, Military Spouses, Land and Base Management, Peace Corps, Americorps, Vista within the local commuting area of the position. For definitions of common terms found in this announcement: http://dhsconnect.dhs.gov/org/comp/mgmt/dhshr/hr/Documents/JOA_Common_Definitions.pdf",767,Washington
2,"Specialist, Attendance",District of Columbia Public Schools,"Washington, DC",None,"Position OverviewThe Office of Innovation and Systems Improvement (ISI) works with the Chancellor to align resources across the organization through innovation and continuous improvement. Our goal is to initiate change and lead DC Public Schools into the highest performing school district in the nation. After engaging with over 3,000 internal and external stakeholders to help shape the future of DCPS, we are guided by the five strategic priorities of the new Capital Commitment 2017-2022 Strategic Plan:Promote Equity: Define, understand, and promote equity to close achievement gaps and interrupt institutional bias.Empower Our People: Recruit, develop, and retain a talented, caring, and diverse team.Educate the Whole Child: Provide rigorous, joyful, and inclusive academic and social emotional experiences for all students.Ensure Excellent Schools: Increase the number of high quality schools across the district by defining blended autonomies for schools and creating opportunities for innovation.Engage Families: Deepen partnerships with families and community.The Office of the Chief Operating Officer (OCOO) is comprised of the Strategic School Operations, Food & Nutrition Services, School Security, Facilities, Compliance, and Attendance teams. OCOO is responsible for guiding the operations and functions for all 118 schools within the District. Our goal is for all DCPS schools to be ready on the first day of school and every day thereafter so that all principals can lead, all teachers can teach, and all students can learn.The Specialist, Attendance is responsible for collaboration with other members of OCOO to ensure all students attend school every day, on time, so they can be successful. The Specialist will provide technical assistance to school staff to develop and support the attendance intervention process. This position is a safety-sensitive position. As a result, throughout employment this position will be subject to the Employee Mandatory Drug and Alcohol Testing Policy.The Specialist, Attendance will report to the Director, Student Attendance.Essential Duties and ResponsibilitiesThe below statements are intended to describe the general nature and scope of work being performed by this position. This is not a complete listing of all responsibilities, duties, and/or skills required. Other duties may be assigned.Collaborates with building administrators and school-based teams to establish data-driven attendance systems, local attendance committees, and school-wide attendance campaigns.Consults with school staff to support the provision of timely, high quality interventions when students are absent from school.Provides programmatic leadership by researching and providing knowledge and technical assistance about best practices in strategic program areas, including attendance, student engagement, dropout prevention, youth development, and the social-emotional needs of students.Uses data to ensure full implementation of district and school-level attendance efforts and to evaluate their effectiveness.Helps manage the analysis and presentation of data and progress of data-driven initiatives for senior management team and external audiences; communicates progress to key stakeholder groups; and incorporates their input.Builds relationships and liaises with various internal departments to drive collaboration and project success; coordinates and integrates information about attendance throughout the district; and interacts with and responds effectively to urgent requests from multiple internal and external DCPS stakeholders.Develops strategy and clear, specific, and ambitious performance measures for individual projects that are easily translated into individual work goals and deliverables for other team members.Creates detailed timelines for each initiative; assesses and tracks project progress regularly using various computer programs and tools; and drives project completion holding others accountable for responsibilities and deadlines.Anticipates, identifies, and resolves complex obstacles to success of overall program as well as specific projects.Interviews and surveys other colleagues and management teams to determine opportunities for improvement; researches specific issues; and develops detailed recommendations and implementation plans to ensure continuous improvement and innovation within the team, Office, and agency.QualificationsBachelor's degree and three to five years of related work experience, including experience providing training, facilitation, and/or coaching for adults.Master's degree preferred.Previous exposure to or experience in the education sector a plus.Specific experience in work with youth preferred.Previous exposure to or experience with case management, counseling, or social work services a plus.DCPS ValuesSTUDENTS FIRST: We recognize students as whole children and put their needs first in everything we do.COURAGE: We have the audacity to learn from our successes and failures, to try new things, and to lead the nation as a proof point of PK-12 success.EQUITY: We work proactively to eliminate opportunity gaps by interrupting institutional bias and investing in effective strategies to ensure every student succeeds.EXCELLENCE: We work with integrity and hold ourselves accountable for exemplary outcomes, service, and interactions.TEAMWORK: We recognize that our greatest asset is our collective vision and ability to work collaboratively and authentically.JOY: We enjoy our collective work and will enthusiastically celebrate our success and each other.Job Type: Full-time",767,Washington
3,Foreign Service Office Management Specialist,U.S. Department of State,"Washington, DC 20520 (Foggy Bottom area)","$51,220 - $81,570 a year","Overview
Accepting applications
Open & closing dates

05/17/2021 to 09/30/2021

Service

Excepted

Pay scale & grade

FP 06

Salary

$51,220 to $81,570 per year

Appointment type

Permanent - Permanent after tenure granted by a Foreign Service Specialist (FSS) Tenure Board.

Work schedule

Full-timeLocation
Department of State Posts - Overseas and Domestic, United States
MANY vacancies
Relocation expenses reimbursed

Yes After completing orientation and initial training in Washington, D.C., a Foreign Service Specialist usually is assigned to two consecutive overseas tours, each two years in length, directed by the Department. After the initial two tours, assignments will be for periods of one to three years overseas or in the United States.

Telework eligible

NoThis job is open to
The public

U.S. citizens, nationals or those who owe allegiance to the U.S.

Clarification from the agency

Must be a U.S. citizen. Potential applicants should read the entire announcement to ensure they meet all requirements and understand a Foreign Service career. Applicants may not reapply for one year after their previous application for the same position. If a State Department Suitability Review Panel denied suitability in the last two years, you may not apply (except Diplomatic Security Special Agent (SA) candidates whose denial was based solely on the unique requirements for SAs).

Print
Share
Save
Announcement number

OMS-2021-0003

Control number

599670000

DutiesDuties
Summary

The U.S. Department of State is developing a rank-ordered list of eligible hires for a limited number of Foreign Service Office Management Specialist (OMS) positions. To learn more about the Department of State and a career in the Foreign Service, visit https://careers.state.gov.

There is more to the Foreign Service than just salary. Refer to the Benefits section for more information on total compensation.

This is a 9017 Foreign Service position equivalent to the 0301 CS Series.

Learn more about this agency
Responsibilities

Foreign Service Office Management Specialists (OMSes) serve key roles in U.S. embassies and consulates worldwide, as well as some domestic locations, leading and performing a wide range of administrative, operational, and technical program support functions to facilitate the overall efficiency and effectiveness the organization. The primary responsibilities of an OMS vary greatly depending on the size of the post and the particular position to which assigned. The work requires knowledge of administrative, operations, and program support principles; a strong command of the English language; superior interpersonal skills; and, in-depth knowledge of office computer software.

The following list is neither exhaustive nor in priority order; however, basic duties may include the following:

Managing the office: Develops, updates, and implements administrative and operations policies for the office/section. Develops, maintains, and tracks budgets for the office/section. Drafts project proposals and interprets and adapts guidelines for application to specific program support functions and/or problems. Conducts analysis of technical, operational, and administrative functions to make recommendations on process improvement and program effectiveness. Coordinates the acquisition of supplies, property, and office space in support of employees in the office/section. Ensures sensitive information is managed properly. Advises management on protocol matters. Coordinates emergency response efforts on behalf of an office/section and applies knowledge of security policies and procedures. Formulates and implements knowledge management and records management policies for the office/section. Develops and coordinates responses to Freedom of Information Act (FOIA) and Privacy Act requests. Maintains and certifies time and attendance records for employees in the office/section.
Supporting Department personnel: Manages the schedule of the principal and arranges meetings, conferences, and VIP escorts/visits/events. Advises on transportation policies, prepares travel arrangements, and finalizes travel/expense vouchers. Makes and receives calls on behalf of the principal and other employees in the office/section. Facilitates effective and efficient contact with key stakeholders, meeting participants, and internal/external officials. Speaks for the principal on administrative and operational matters, or programmatic areas within the assigned area of responsibility. Serves as a proxy for the principal in meetings or in the approval of administrative documents requiring the principal’s approval or attention.
Preparing written materials: Reviews, drafts, and responds to correspondence for approval within the area of authority, routing official communication to the appropriate points of contact. Proofreads and edits documents for accuracy, formatting, clearances, style, and compliance with regulations. Prepares and enhances documents, presentations, reports, memos, emails, and other forms of official communication.
Supporting official events: Organizes and conducts special events and functions on behalf of the section or post. Serves as control officer for official visits and manages visitor access to government events and facilities.
Supporting management of office staff: Provides advice on human resources issues, to include providing input and support for performance appraisals. Trains staff on the full scope of administrative and operations issues in the office/section. Supports mission objectives by identifying the requirements for money, manpower, facilities, and services needed to support a program or achieve policy results. Evaluates program requirements and policy goals in order to ensure program plans, schedules, and support are provided at the right time and place. Conducts special projects and/or manages a programmatic portfolio for the office/section.
Supporting information technology and records: Troubleshoots IT issues and resolves basic IT problems, to include hardware and software support. Maintains office equipment and ensures these resources are functioning as expected in order to accomplish the mission. Responsible for working with and troubleshooting issues with various internal and external software programs, including the full range of Microsoft Office applications.
Integrating with local culture: Plans and attends representational events and establishes relationships with host country personnel and other embassy interlocutors.

It is not uncommon for an OMS regularly to perform duties outside of normal business hours due to needs of the post, official visits, or as part of a regular after-hours duty rotation.

At small posts, OMSes also might be required to provide additional services as back-up Information Management Specialists (handling official telegraphic messages and diplomatic pouches), with training provided.

Travel Required

Occasional travel - A Foreign Service Specialist generally spends the majority of his/her career assigned to the Department of State's overseas missions and at times, lives away from family and/or in difficult or isolated conditions. Selected applicants will be notified of an Oral Assessment (OA) requirement in Washington D.C. For the selected applicants, all travel and other expenses incurred in connection with the OA are the sole responsibility of the applicant.

Supervisory status

Yes

Promotion Potential

02

Job family (Series)

0301 Miscellaneous Administration And Program

Similar jobs
Command Center Specialists
Computer Training Specialists
Specialists, Command Center
Specialists, Computer Training
Specialists, Training
Training Specialists
Requirements
Conditions of Employment
Be a U.S. citizen and available for worldwide service.*
Be able to obtain a Top Secret Security Clearance.
Be able to obtain an appropriate Foreign Service Medical Clearance.
Be able to obtain a favorable Suitability Review Panel determination.**
Be at least 20 years old to apply; at least 21 years old to be appointed.
Be appointed prior to age 60 (preference eligible veterans excepted).***

An OMS must adhere to the highest standards of integrity, dependability, attention to detail, teamwork, and cooperation while accepting the need to travel, live overseas, and when necessary, live away from family.

Qualifications

Specialized Experience

Specialized Experience demonstrates that the applicant has acquired, and is able to apply, a combination of specific knowledge, skills, and abilities appropriate to this Foreign Service position. All qualifying Specialized Experience must be of a progressively responsible nature in office management and/or administrative functions and must have been acquired supporting one or more senior individuals. To qualify as Specialized Experience, the duties must have a combination of office management or administrative components of at least 60% of the work duties. All experience must have been performed within the last 10 years.

Examples of Specialized Experience include, but are not limited to:

Developing and implementing administrative and operations procedures.
Conducting analysis of technical, operational, and administrative functions to recommend process improvements or program effectiveness.
Formulating and implementing knowledge management and records management policies, such developing and maintaining databases and records management, capturing information, and conducting research.
Managing schedules and calendars for one or more senior staff, arranging meetings, conferences, events, and travel.
Planning and assisting with events and visitors, including tracking budgets and expenses, building and managing guest lists, submitting and monitoring supply requests, and tracking guest attendance.
Troubleshooting IT issues and providing basic computer support to include maintaining office equipment. Providing support on internal and external software programs, including the full range of Microsoft Office applications.
Preparing written materials, documents, handouts, or computer presentations (e.g. PowerPoint) for meetings, including proofing and editing documents.

Knowledge, Skills, Abilities, and Other Characteristics

The applicant's experience, education, and training must show that they have an in-depth knowledge of their field and possess the knowledge, skills, abilities, and other characteristics (KSAOs) to successfully perform OMS duties worldwide.

Interpersonal skills, including team work: Interacting effectively with others, including developing and maintaining constructive and cooperative working relationships and resolving conflicts. Working with teammates, customers, and others from widely diverse backgrounds, views, priorities, knowledge, and needs in order to cooperate to get the work done.
Customer service skills: Gathering information regarding customer requirements, assessing underlying needs, finding optimal solutions, and providing effective customer service.
Communications skills: Applicants must demonstrate a strong command of the English language, both written (overall structure as well as grammar, spelling, and punctuation) and spoken (overall structure as well as delivery, clarity, and succinctness).
Cross-cultural skills: Skill in working with people from varied backgrounds, educational levels, and cultural surroundings in order to create and maintain an amiable and success-oriented working environment. Acceptance of peoples and cultures other than your own and interest in living in such cultures.
Planning, organizing, and project management skills: Skill at organizing multiple and varied tasks into an achievable system quickly and accurately with minimal supervision in order to complete duties on time. Identifying resources, making use of limited resources, correcting or preventing known problems, anticipating challenges, establishing milestones.
Time management: Skill in time management and prioritization of work, often under conditions of tight deadlines. Utilizing time efficiently, handling multiple priorities simultaneously, judging how to prioritize and delegate work appropriately.
Problem solving and decision making/judgment: Skill in using logic and reasoning to evaluate facts, identify the strengths and weaknesses of alternative solutions, conclusions, or approaches to problems, including creative and resourceful solutions, and present the alternatives in an unbiased way to others. Professional judgment and maturity to make decisions within appropriate areas of responsibility that move projects forward and enable timely achievement of section goals, including knowing when it is necessary to seek guidance from more experienced employees.
Management and supervision skills: Coordinating, scheduling, tracking, managing information flow, negotiating work priorities, supervising locally employed (LE) staff and interns. Taking initiative and showing leadership to proactively identify issues and tasks, motivate others, give guidance, and serve as a role model.
Record management skills: Creating archives, saving documents, searching, tracking paperwork, and creating and managing databases.
Computer skills: Assists and trains others on office and specialized department software and helps resolve computer-related problems as first line of support, including proactively learning new systems and changes. Knowledge at the Microsoft Office Specialist level in Microsoft Office, Word, Excel, and PowerPoint, Access or SharePoint, in order to perform tasks assigned and troubleshoot information technology issues.
Adaptability and flexibility: Changing one’s behavior to adapt to the situation and recover from setbacks and extreme job demands in a timely and positive manner to ensure effectiveness under any circumstances.
Dependability and integrity: Reliable, responsible, dependable, and conscientious at fulfilling obligations in order to perform work and assist customers. Honest and ethical in all aspects of performing the responsibilities of one’s job, regardless of the demands of the situation.
Tolerance for international career: Tolerance of worldwide availability, including intensive world travel and sometime living away from family, and tolerance for working overseas.

Note: Candidates who successfully pass the Oral Assessment (OA) must provide within 30 days of passing the OA a Microsoft Office Specialist (MOS) Certification in Word 2013 or more recent. Certifications are obtained from an authorized testing center. Information about Microsoft MOS certification can be found at www.certiport.com. It is the responsibility of the candidate to locate a testing center. All costs incurred in connection with qualifying for this position are the responsibility of the candidate. If the MOS certificate is not received within 30 days of passing the OA, the candidacy will not be continued.

Education

At the time of application, applicants must have one of the following:


A High School diploma or equivalent and three years of Specialized Experience in the last 10 years; or
An Associate’s degree in Office Management or Business Administration and two years of Specialized Experience in the last 10 years; or
A Bachelor’s or higher degree in any major and one year of Specialized Experience in the last 10 years.

If your OMST results qualify, you will be asked via email to submit documentation demonstrating your educational achievements. You must submit a copy of your high school diploma or equivalency certificate, or your university transcript(s). If you do not submit this documentation to demonstrate your educational achievements, your candidacy will not continue.

Official or unofficial transcripts may be submitted. Your transcript must include your name, the school’s name, and, if applicable, the degree and date awarded, and have no missing pages. A transcript missing any of these elements will not pass the minimum qualifications and your candidacy will not continue. Copies of diplomas may not be submitted in lieu of transcripts for education above high school level.

Education from a program or institution within the United States must be accredited by an accrediting institution recognized by the U.S. Department of Education, http://ope.ed.gov/accreditation, in order to be credited towards qualifications or your candidacy will not continue.

Education completed in foreign high schools, colleges or universities may be used to meet the education requirements if you can show that the foreign education is comparable to that received in an accredited educational institution in the United States. It is your responsibility to provide such evidence. Only accredited organizations recognized as specializing in the interpretation of foreign education credentials that are members of the National Association of Credential Evaluation Services (NACES) or the Association of International Credential Evaluators, Inc. (AICE) are accepted. If documentation from an accredited organization is not provided, your candidacy will not continue.

For further information on the evaluation of foreign education, please refer to the Office of Personnel Management and the U.S. Department of Education. The U.S. Department of State neither endorses nor recommends any individual evaluation service.

Additional information


EMPLOYMENT ELIGIBILITY VERIFICATION PROGRAM (E-Verify) – Verification of employment eligibility in the United States is required.

U.S. law requires organizations to employ only individuals who may legally work in the United States – either U.S. citizens, or foreign citizens who have the necessary authorization. This agency utilizes E-Verify to compare information from the Form I-9, Employment Eligibility Verification, to data from U.S. Department of Homeland Security (DHS) and Social Security Administration (SSA) records to confirm employment eligibility. If the employee’s information does not match DHS and/or SSA records, the employee is given an opportunity to resolve the problem. If eligibility cannot be verified, employment will be terminated.

**The Department of State Suitability Review Panel and standards are defined in Chapter 3 of the Foreign Affairs Manual. For more information please visit: https://fam.state.gov/.

***For more information about Veteran’s Preference and how it is applied in the selection process, please visit: http://careers.state.gov/faqs/faqs-wiki/are-veterans-given-hiring-preference-

No applicant will be considered who has previously been separated from the Foreign Service under sections §607, §608, §610 or §611 of the Foreign Service Act of 1980, as amended, or who resigned or retired in lieu of separation under these provisions. In addition, no applicant will be considered who has previously been separated for failure to receive a career appointment under section §306 of the Foreign Service Act of 1980, as amended, or who resigned or retired in lieu thereof.

A Foreign Service Specialist separated for failure to receive a career appointment under section 306 may not re-apply to be a Foreign Service Specialist in the same skill code but may apply for another skill code or to be a Foreign Service Generalist.

Executive Branch agencies are barred by 5 US Code 3303 as amended from accepting or considering prohibited political recommendations and are required to return any prohibited political recommendations to sender. In addition, as mandated by 5 US Code 3110, relatives of federal employees cannot be granted preference in competing for these employment opportunities.

It is the policy of the Federal Government to treat all employees with dignity and respect and to provide a workplace that is free from discrimination whether discrimination is based on race, color, religion, sex (including gender identity or pregnancy), national origin, disability, political affiliation, marital status, membership in an employee organization, age, sexual orientation, or other non-merit factors.

The Department of State provides reasonable accommodation to applicants with disabilities. Applicants requiring reasonable accommodations for any part of the application or hiring process should so advise the Department at ReasonableAccommodations@state.gov, within one week of receiving their invitation to the oral assessment. Decisions for granting reasonable accommodations are made on a case-by-case basis.How You Will Be Evaluated

You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications above.

Candidates will be evaluated on their total background including experience, education, awards, training, and self-development as it relates to the position. Selection for this position will be made only from among candidates possessing the best qualifications. Part-time work experience will be prorated.

To preview questions please click here.Background checks and security clearance
Security clearance

Top Secret

Drug test required

Yes

Required DocumentsRequired Documents

Submit your application and register to take the Office Management Specialist Test (OMST) at www.pearsonvue.com/OMST. Please do not apply through USAJobs. See How to Apply for more information.

Visit www.pearsonvue.com/OMST.
Create a web account.
Follow the instructions to complete the Office Management Specialist Test (OMST) online application. (Note: Your application is automatically saved as you proceed through it. You can interrupt the application process and return to it until you submit it.)
Answer all the self-assessment questions;
Include work history for the past ten (10 years); and,
Complete the Personal Narrative questions and Statement of Interest (see below for more information).
Complete, review, and submit the application.
Your OMST online application will be used to evaluate your qualifications for this position.
You have six months to complete the application process outlined in this announcement and take the OMST. If you have not taken then OMST within six months, you must restart the application process.
Application packages must be complete before you can register for the OMST.
We strongly recommend that you go back into your application and verify that everything is completed properly.

Personal Narrative

These required questions provide an opportunity to describe examples and accomplishments from your education, life, and/or work experience that demonstrate your qualifications for becoming a Foreign Service Specialist. Examples can be drawn from any part of your professional or personal experience. Each response is limited to 300 words or fewer (maximum length 2,000 characters) for each item. You should compose your replies carefully, as one of the skills necessary to succeed as a Foreign Service Specialist is the ability to write clearly and concisely. Answers to the all of the items in the Personal Narrative and Statement of Interest are required and must be completed in the online application.

1. Substantive Knowledge: Describe your skills, knowledge, and experience in managing office policies and procedures, such as developing and implementing project proposals, budgets, or knowledge management procedures.

2. Intellectual Skills: Describe an example of how you used your proficiency in computer technology and programs, such as those in the Microsoft Office Suite or similar programs, to collect, interpret, and/or analyze data. Comment on the technology you used and how your skill with the program helped to solve a problem.

3. Interpersonal Skills: Describe a situation where you used your interpersonal skills to resolve a conflict or provide effective customer service.

4. Communication Skills: Describe an example of how you used your proficiency in oral or written communication, including foreign language skills if appropriate, to further an aim or achieve a goal.

5. Managerial Skills: Describe a situation where you had to plan, organize, and prioritize your own work, particularly where you had to handle several different tasks with close deadlines and it was important to maintain a high standard of performance. Comment on how you set priorities and allocated time, and indicate any resources you used to help prioritize tasks.

6. Leadership Skills: Describe a situation where you took initiative to resolve a problem or proposed an innovative solution. Indicate who was affected by the problem and in what way, and the nature of the difficulties faced.

Statement of Interest

Required narrative Statement of Interest which discusses your:


Motivation for joining the Foreign Service;
Relevant work experience, including any unique strengths not described elsewhere such as special skills (e.g. computer), current licenses, certifications, honors, awards, special accomplishments, and/or training (with date completed) relating to this position; and
Experience living or working in a multicultural environment, overseas or in the United States.

If you are relying on your education to meet qualification requirements:

Education must be accredited by an accrediting institution recognized by the U.S. Department of Education in order for it to be credited towards qualifications. Therefore, provide only the attendance and/or degrees from schools accredited by accrediting institutions recognized by the U.S. Department of Education.

Failure to provide all of the required information as stated in this vacancy announcement may result in an ineligible rating or may affect the overall rating.

BenefitsBenefits

A career with the U.S. Government provides employees with a comprehensive benefits package. As a federal employee, you and your family will have access to a range of benefits that are designed to make your federal career very rewarding.
Opens in a new window
Learn more about federal benefits.

Benefits include health and medical coverage, federal retirement benefits, and paid leave. Overseas benefits include tax-free housing overseas, tax-free education allowance for dependent children between K-12 overseas, and an unrivaled opportunity to see the world and experience different cultures.

The salary listed is from the Foreign Service Overseas pay scale and the Washington D.C. pay scale. New hires entering with a grade level of FP-06 will receive an administrative promotion to FP-05 after 18 months.

Click here for more information on salary.

Eligibility for benefits depends on the type of position you hold and whether your position is full-time, part-time, or intermittent. Contact the hiring agency for more information on the specific benefits offered.

How to Apply

Submit your application and register to take the Office Management Specialist Test (OMST) at www.pearsonvue.com/OMST. Please do not apply through USAJobs.

Visit www.pearsonvue.com/OMST.
Create a web account.
Follow the instructions to complete the OMST online application. (Note: Your application is automatically saved as you proceed through it. You can interrupt the application process and return to it until you submit it.)
Answer all the self-assessment questions;
Include work history for the past ten (10 years); and,
Complete the Personal Narrative questions and Statement of Interest (see the Required Documents section for more information.
Complete, review, and submit the application.
Your OMST online application will be used to evaluate your qualifications for this position.
You have six months to complete the application process outlined in this announcement and take the OMST. If you have not taken then OMST within six months, you must restart the application process.
Application packages must be complete before you can register for the Office Management Specialist Test.
We strongly recommend that you go back into your application and verify that everything is completed properly.
Select an appointment to take the OMST at one of Pearson Vue's test centers. The OMST is an important part of the selection process, covering English expression, reading comprehension, and situational judgement necessary to work as an Office Management Specialist.

If you are having technical difficulty with the application process, please contact the Help Desk by calling 1-866-389-8339 (toll-free) or 1-952-905-7483, or by utilizing the Chat function on www.pearsonvue.com. The Help Desk is available Monday through Friday 7:00 a.m. to 7:00 p.m. Central Time; closed on local holidays.

For more information on Foreign Service Specialist hiring processes, please visit our FAQs at http://careers.state.gov/faqs. If you have any questions regarding Foreign Service careers, please visit our careers.state.gov site and post your question(s) on the appropriate Forum in the Connect section: http://careers.state.gov/connect/forums.Agency contact information
GTM/TAC
Phone

000-000-0000

Fax

000-000-0000

Email

OMSVacancyInfo@state.gov

Address

U.S. Department of State
2201 C St NW
H518
Washington, District of Columbia 20520
United States
Learn more about this agency
Next steps

For more information on the OMS selection process, visit https://careers.state.gov/work/foreign-service/specialist/office-management-specialist-selection-process/.

Fair & Transparent
Fair & Transparent

The Federal hiring process is setup to be fair and transparent. Please read the following guidance.

Equal Employment Opportunity Policy

The United States Government does not discriminate in employment on the basis of race, color, religion, sex (including pregnancy and gender identity), national origin, political affiliation, sexual orientation, marital status, disability, genetic information, age, membership in an employee organization, retaliation, parental status, military service, or other non-merit factor.

Equal Employment Opportunity (EEO) for federal employees & job applicantsReasonable Accommodation Policy

Federal agencies must provide reasonable accommodation to applicants with disabilities where appropriate. Applicants requiring reasonable accommodation for any part of the application process should follow the instructions in the job opportunity announcement. For any part of the remaining hiring process, applicants should contact the hiring agency directly. Determinations on requests for reasonable accommodation will be made on a case-by-case basis.

A reasonable accommodation is any change to a job, the work environment, or the way things are usually done that enables an individual with a disability to apply for a job, perform job duties or receive equal access to job benefits.

Under the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, federal agencies must provide reasonable accommodations when:

An applicant with a disability needs an accommodation to have an equal opportunity to apply for a job.
An employee with a disability needs an accommodation to perform the essential job duties or to gain access to the workplace.
An employee with a disability needs an accommodation to receive equal access to benefits, such as details, training, and office-sponsored events.

You can request a reasonable accommodation at any time during the application or hiring process or while on the job. Requests are considered on a case-by-case basis.

Learn more about disability employment and reasonable accommodations or how to contact an agency.Legal and regulatory guidance
Financial suitability
Social security number request
Privacy Act
Signature and false statements
Selective Service
New employee probationary period",767,Washington
4,IT Specialist (Security),US Federal Aviation Administration,"Washington, DC","$88,211 - $136,714 a year","Duties
Summary
Due to the Pandemic and individual states with different phases of reopening, the selectee’s report date to the official duty station/facility may be delayed until such time as employees are allowed to report to the workplace. The person selected may telework up to the maximum extent possible, up to and including full time, until it is determined by state and Federal officials that employees are allowed to report to the workplace where this position is located, on a regular basis.

Responsibilities
The Chief Privacy Office’s primary responsibilities to the agency is to provide expertise and oversight for privacy requirements both across the IS&P service areas as well as the enterprise. It implements accountability and continuous improvement of FAA privacy processes and programs. The office works closely with all FAA Lines of Business (LOB) and Staff Offices (SO) to ensure and manage the delivery of privacy requirements (e.g. privacy compliance documents and assessments, privacy policy and providing training and awareness. The office currently responds to Privacy Incidents and manages the Identity Monitoring Code issuance process. It additionally oversees the handling and work loading of privacy act requests, appeals and complaints. The office also provides guidance for contractual terms involving privacy data. The office works closely with the Security Operations Center (SOC) when incidents involve privacy data.
Members of the Chief Privacy Office perform multiple, varying and complex assignments under the minimal direction of a manager, project/program manager, team leader, or more experienced professional. They may act as a contributing specialist on large work activities or as a project manager or team leader for large projects/programs/activities. Assignments frequently require knowledge and experience working across functional and/or organizational lines. Typical assignments may include providing guidance to less-experienced professionals as well as senior managers and executives; leading project/program teams; designing and recommending solutions to complex problems; providing briefings; preparing and reviewing management reports and/or contractual documents; and developing and recommending improvements to systems and/or processes to improve privacy. The office additionally supports Public Affairs during privacy incidents that generate media interest, in coordination with agency processes and policy. Work is reviewed though status reports and at project completion, to ensure compliance and alignment with the requirements of projects and/or other work activities. Work activities influence the objectives of one or more organizational units, major subdivisions and/or LOB's and SO's and may affect the objectives of the FAA. The work can often affect both internal/external customers and stakeholders.
If selected in addition to the above, you will be responsible for the following:
Working with system owners to prepare and review privacy compliance documentation, including Privacy Threshold Assessment (PTA), Privacy Continuous Monitoring (PCM) Assessments, Privacy Impact Assessments (PIA), System Disposal Assessment (SDA) and System of Record Notices (SORN).
Performing Privacy Compliance and Contract review inspections.
Participating in privacy policy development and reviews.
Providing an important liaison/advisory function to provide guidance for the protection of Personally Identifiable Information (PII) to FAA Lines of Business (LOB) and Staff Offices (SO).
Leading special projects and researching and providing recommendations regarding technology changes, which may affect privacy.
Supporting PII, SSN Reduction and Data Loss Prevention activities,
Plan and prioritize privacy tasking in order to complete activities according to schedules and within prescribed timelines.
Developing and recommending approaches to address current and anticipated problems and issues and working with management to solve problems.
Travel Required
Occasional travel - The job may require travel from time- to-time, but not on a regular basis. The travel may be for training or other work-related duties.
Supervisory status
No
Promotion Potential
NA
Job family (Series)
2210 Information Technology Management
Similar jobs
Enterprise Data Manager
Information Systems Managers
Information Technology Project Managers
Information Technology Specialist (It Specialist)
Managers, Information Systems
Requirements

Requirements
Conditions of Employment
US Citizenship is required.
Selective Service Registration is required for males born after 12/31/1959.
Must submit an SF50 (See Required Documents)
Qualifications
For additional information please view the complete OPM qualification standard for the Group Coverage
Qualification Standard for IT Specialist, 2210 series:
https://www.opm.gov/policy-data-oversight/classification-qualifications/general-schedule-qualification-standards/2200/information-technology-it-management-series-2210-alternative-b/
To qualify for this position you must demonstrate in your application that you possess at least one year of specialized experience equivalent to FV-H / FG/GS-10-12. Specialized experience is experience that has equipped you with the particular knowledge, skills, and abilities to perform successfully the duties of the position.
Specialized experience may include but not limited to: Experience preparing and reviewing privacy compliance documents, such as Privacy Threshold Assessment (PTA), Privacy Continuous Monitoring (PCM), Privacy Impact Assessments (PIA), System Disposal Assessment (SDA) and System of Record Notices (SORNs) and experience planning and prioritizing in order to handle multiple tasks and projects concurrently and in a timely manner.
Applicants should include examples of specialized experience in their work history.
Qualifications must be met by the closing date of this vacancy announcement.
If the Agency decides to interview any qualified employee on the selection list, then all on the list who are qualified must be interviewed. If the selection list is shortened to a best qualified list through a comparative process, then the best qualified list shall be considered to be the selection list.
Education
Preview Job Questionnaire
Make sure your resume includes detailed information to support your qualifications and answers to the job questionnaire.
Additional information
We may use this vacancy to fill other similar vacant positions.
Position may be subject to a background investigation.
A one-year probationary period may be required.

FAA employees, their spouses and minor children may not hold stock or any other securities interest in an airline, aircraft manufacturing company, or in a supplier of components of parts to an aircraft manufacturing company. This prohibition is effective on the date of your appointment. If selected, your acceptance of the agency's final offer means you agree to comply with this prohibition. Questions may be directed to an agency ethics official at 9-faa-agc-ethics-office@faa.gov.

The U.S. Department of Transportation strives to ensure that equity, transparency, accountability, collaboration, and communication permeate all that we do for the betterment of the Department, the traveling public, and our nation. As such, DOT values a highly diverse workforce of persons who promote a culture of belonging by respecting the personal dignity and worth of each individual and fostering a positive environment where all feel safe and welcome. If these commitments coincide with your personal ideals and professional aspirations, please consider joining the DOT family.

The person selected for this position may be required to file a financial disclosure statement within 30 days of entry on duty. FAA policy limits certain outside employment and financial investments in aviation-related companies.
As a part of the Federal-Wide Hiring Reform Initiative (streamlining the hiring process), the FAA is committed to eliminating the use of the Knowledge, Skills and Ability (KSA) narratives from the initial application in the hiring process for all announcements. Therefore, as an applicant for this announcement, you are NOT required to provide a narrative response in the text box listed below each KSA.

In lieu of providing a KSA narrative response in the text box listed below each KSA, in your work history, please include information that provides specific examples of how you meet the response level or answer you chose for each KSA. Your work history examples should be specific and clearly reflect the highest level of ability. Your KSA answers will be evaluated further to validate whether the level that you selected is appropriate based on the work history and experience you provided. Your answers may be adjusted by a Human Resource Specialist as appropriate.
Eligible applicants meeting the minimum qualification requirements and selective factor(s), if applicable, may be further evaluated on the KSAs listed in the announcement. Based on this evaluation, applicants will be placed in one of the following categories: score order, category grouping, or alphabetical and referred to the selecting official for consideration.
Selection may be made from this announcement or from ACT-AIT-21-AIS010-72620 or ACT-AIT-21-AIS010-72625.
This is a bargaining unit position.

Links to Important Information: Locality Pay , COLA

How You Will Be Evaluated
You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications above.


IMPORTANT: Applicants may be rated on the extent and quality of experience, education, and training relevant to the duties of the position(s). All answers provided in the on-line process must be substantiated. Ensure that your application package/resume supports your responses.

Background checks and security clearance
Security clearance
Other
Drug test required
No
Required Documents

Required Documents
Only supplemental documentation, e.g. transcripts or veteran's documentation will be accepted in combination with your online application. These documents must be uploaded or emailed to tara.price@faa.gov on or before the closing date of this announcement. All submitted documents should reference the announcement number.

Applicants claiming eligibility for the Expanded Veterans Hiring Opportunity (EVHO), MUST submit a DD Form 214 reflecting character of service to verify eligibility by the closing date of the announcement as requested by the Human Resource Office. Eligibility for EVHO will be considered based on applicable documentation submitted by the closing date.

If you are a current or former Federal employee (including a current FAA employee), you MUST provide a copy of your SF-50 (Notification of Personnel Action) containing information in Blocks 15, 17, 18, 19, 22, and 24 so it can be used to verify your position title, series, grade, tenure, and organization of record by the closing date of the announcement. You may fax your SF-50 or upload it into the on-line application. If faxing the SF-50, please ensure you include the vacancy announcement number on the faxed copy.

If you are a current Federal employee and need a current copy of your SF-50, please contact your personnel office. If you are an FAA employee, you can access and print your SF-50 from the eOPF system https://eopf.opm.gov/dot/. If you are a former Federal employee, you can obtain a copy of your SF-50 by writing the National Personnel Records Center Annex, 1411 Boulder Boulevard, Valmeyer, IL 62295. Additional information is available from this link: http://www.archives.gov/st-louis/civilian-personnel/.

Expanded Veterans Hiring Opportunity (EVHO) are those veterans who are honorably discharged from the Armed Forces after completing at least three (3) years of continuous active service. Applicants claiming eligibility for EVHO, MUST submit a DD Form 214 reflecting character of service to verify eligibility by the closing date of the announcement as requested by the Human Resource Office. Eligibility for EVHO will be considered based on applicable documentation submitted by the closing date.
If you are relying on your education to meet qualification requirements:
Education must be accredited by an accrediting institution recognized by the U.S. Department of Education in order for it to be credited towards qualifications. Therefore, provide only the attendance and/or degrees from schools accredited by accrediting institutions recognized by the U.S. Department of Education.
Failure to provide all of the required information as stated in this vacancy announcement may result in an ineligible rating or may affect the overall rating.
Benefits

Benefits
A career with the U.S. Government provides employees with a comprehensive benefits package. As a federal employee, you and your family will have access to a range of benefits that are designed to make your federal career very rewarding. Opens in a new windowLearn more about federal benefits.
Review our benefits
Eligibility for benefits depends on the type of position you hold and whether your position is full-time, part-time, or intermittent. Contact the hiring agency for more information on the specific benefits offered.
Help
This job is open to
Federal employees - Competitive service
Current or former competitive service federal employees.
Federal employees - Excepted service
Current excepted service federal employees.
Veterans
Clarification from the agency
Current or Former Federal Employees; Veterans - EVHO; Also open to former excepted service federal employees eligibleunder an interchange agreement. Current or former federal employees must have met a one year probationary period ortrial period in the competitive or excepted service. Applications will be accepted from preference eligibles and veteranswho are honorably discharged from the Armed Forces after completing at least 3 years of continuous active duty service.",767,Washington
5,"Specialist, Systems Administrator",District of Columbia Public Schools,"Washington, DC",None,"Position OverviewThe mission of the Office of Data Systems and Strategy is to support schools and the district as a whole to use technology and data effectively to accelerate student achievement. The Office includes the following teams:The Information Technology team provides DCPS students and staff, in every school, with the infrastructure, systems, and support to use technology effectively to accelerate student achievement.The Assessments team leads and supports schools in the administration of summative assessments and surveys and ensures test integrity is maintained during assessments.The Data team ensures stakeholders at all levels of the organization have access to accurate, timely, and relevant data by organizing, validating, and reporting on student data and by conducting analysis and research to inform decision-making.The School Data & Performance team supports and builds school-based capacity to use data tools to inform school planning and decision-making.The Information Technology team provides DCPS students and staff, in every school, with the infrastructure, systems, and support to use technology effectively to accelerate student achievementThe Specialist, Systems Administrator will play a significant role in the administration and end user support of the instructional and business-critical operational/productivity systems. Serving as an escalation point from the service desk, the Specialist, Systems Administrator will apply their advanced skillset and troubleshooting experience to identify the root cause and resolve issues in a timely fashion. Proficiency in core business and educational platforms, including Microsoft Office 365, Active Directory, Azure and Exchange Online, is critical to the success of this position.The Specialist, Systems Administrator will report to the Director, IT Infrastructure and Operations.Essential Duties and ResponsibilitiesThe below statements are intended to describe the general nature and scope of work being performed by this position. This is not a complete listing of all responsibilities, duties, and/or skills required. Other duties may be assigned.Provides level 2 in-person and virtual business and education platforms support to DCPS staff and students by serving as an escalation point from the service desk (level 1).Documents incidents, problems, and service requests through the district’s ITSM.Follows strict service level agreements to ensure timely service.Supports the configuration of business and education platforms to ensure requirements are implemented with fidelity.Performs ongoing maintenance and troubleshooting of instructional platforms and applications to ensure their ongoing availability, stability, and compliance with established standards and security requirements, including but not limited to setting up users, roles, security, and internal system notifications.Works closely with various senior-level system administrators and business application owners on SSO, data, and systems integrations.Develops secure automated solutions for administrative and domain management tasks.Maintains, administers, and supports Office 365, Azure, Teams, and Exchange.Assists in administering mission critical instructional platforms such as Clever, Canvas, Gaggle, and Adobe.Interfaces with Microsoft and other solution providers for any tier 3 support requirements.Develops concise and accurate engineering and knowledgebase documentation, including design plans, implementation guides, knowledge guides, and standard operating procedures.Identifies risks and problems and conducts qualitative and quantitative analysis to generate and evaluate alternatives and to make recommendations.Works closely with the academic and education technology teams to gather requirements and implement solutions to meet desired outcomes.Follows organizational change management processes and standard operating procedures to plan for and implement continuous improvements of the environment.QualificationsBachelor's degree and three to five years of related work experience,including a minimum of three years of enterprise level Azure/AD/Office 365 Administration experience.Master's degree preferred.Previous exposure to or experience in the education sector a plus.Microsoft Azure and Office 365 certifications.High degree of system-specific knowledge and a background in the various technologies and practices required by DCPS, including: Azure AD, VDI platform, Office 365 Suite, Canvas and Clever.Excellent understanding and working knowledge of PowerShell and the ability to create and maintain scripts for effective use with exchange/Office 365 and Azure environments.Experience with the integration of Office 365 with third party security and application tools.Strong communication skills and experience partnering with senior IT and program leadership.Must be able to expresses key ideas and obtain tangible feedback from cross-functional team members and stakeholders.Works well with clients and other vendors in achieving mission success and is committed to providing quality products and services.Obsessive attention to detail and accuracy of information.Must be available after hours and on weekends to respond to urgent requests and emergencies as needed.DCPS ValuesSTUDENTS FIRST: We recognize students as whole children and put their needs first in everything we do.COURAGE: We have the audacity to learn from our successes and failures, to try new things, and to lead the nation as a proof point of PK-12 success.EQUITY: We work proactively to eliminate opportunity gaps by interrupting institutional bias and investing in effective strategies to ensure every student succeeds.EXCELLENCE: We work with integrity and hold ourselves accountable for exemplary outcomes, service, and interactions.TEAMWORK: We recognize that our greatest asset is our collective vision and ability to work collaboratively and authentically.JOY: We enjoy our collective work and will enthusiastically celebrate our success and each other.Job Type: Full-time",767,Washington
6,Senior Computer Security Specialist,NuCrest LLC,"Washington, DC",None,"Overview:
NuCrest is seeking a Senior Computer Security Specialist as part of a Cybersecurity Support Team in Alexandria, VA providing RMF A&A services for PIT and PIT Systems. Assist the Government ISSOs with RMF services for as needed. Must have at least four (4+) years of experience of demonstrated experience in the Information Security (Cybersecurity or Information Assurance) field; a minimum of at least four (4+) years of experience as an ISSO, working A&A documentation, assessments, and IA program tasks in DHS and DoD; have an active Secret security clearance; a bachelor’s degree or higher in computer science, Information Technology, Information Security, or similar field and have either a minimum IAM Level I Certifications to include one or more of the following: EC-Council Certified Network Defense (CND), CompTIA Cloud+, GIAC Security Leadership Certification (GSLC), CompTIA Security+ CE DoD 8570.01-Manual compliant certifications.
Description:
The Senior Computer Security Specialist evaluates and applies the technical, operational and physical information security to various system and system activities. Has knowledge of computer hardware and operating systems (Windows and UNIX). The Senior Computer Security Specialist assesses information security risks, threats, vulnerabilities; documents findings; and summarizes recommendations in written and oral form for the customer. The Senior Computer Security Specialist should have thorough knowledge of all aspects of Cyber Risk, IT Security, and Information Assurance in the areas of Security Assessment & Authorization (A&A), Contingency Planning, Continuous Monitoring (CM)/On-going Authorization (OA), Privacy, Security Operations, Incident Response, Cloud Security to minimize any type of loss and destruction to information technology systems assets and data. The Senior Computer Security Specialist should also be proficient in researching and evaluating emerging information technologies relevant to information security; interpreting requirements and providing analytical reviews for system architecture, equipment and software; and providing recommendations. The Senior Computer Security Specialist should be proficient in FISMA, DHS, DoD and NIST Information Security policies, standards, and best practices and ability to convey information to technical and non-technical audiences verbally and in writing.
Responsibilities:
Carry out activities at the organization, mission, business process, and information system levels of the enterprise to help prepare the customer to manage its security and privacy risks using the RMF. Perform account validation for FISMA tracking system (e.g., Xacta and eMASS).
Categorize the information system into low, moderate, or high potential security impact, using FIPS 199 as a guide. Register the information system through the approve FISMA tracking tools program/management offices (DoD/eMASS, DHS/IACS(Xacta).
Select the security controls for the information system and document the controls in the Security Plan.
Create the Security Assessment Plan (SAPs), Rules of Engagement, and Security Assessment Reports (SARs).
Conduct Assessments for PIT, Assessment and Authorization for PIT Systems and Assessment and Authorization for Information Systems to successfully obtain an Authorization to Operate. Assess the security controls in accordance with the assessment procedures defined in the SAP. Prepare the SAR documenting the issues, findings, and recommendations from the security control assessment.
Prepare the POA&M, consisting of tasks needing to be accomplished and schedules to remediate system weaknesses, based on the findings and recommendations of the SAR excluding any remediation actions taken.
Assemble the security authorization package, containing the results of the SAR, the POA&M, the System Security Plan, and other documents that provide the authorizing official with essential information needed to make a risk-based decision on whether to authorize operation.
Determine the risk (including risk to mission, functions, image, or reputation) to organizational operations, organizational assets, individuals, other organizations, or the Nation. Determine if the risk to organizational operations, organizational assets, individuals, other organizations, or the Nation is acceptable.
Establish cyberhealth dashboards with several metrics. Report the security status of the information system (including the effectiveness of security controls employed within and inherited by the system), to appropriate organizational officials on an ongoing basis in accordance with the organization-defined monitoring strategy.
Develop a strategy for the continuous monitoring of security control effectiveness and any proposed/actual changes to the information system and its environment of operation. Determine and document the security impact of proposed or actual changes to the information system and its environment of operation.
Maintain continuous monitoring for an Information Systems that have been placed into Ongoing Authorization. Conduct selected remediation actions based on the results of ongoing monitoring activities and the outstanding items in the POA&M. Update the Security Plan, SAR, and POA&M based on the results of the continuous monitoring process.
Determine if risk to organizational operations, organizational assets, individuals, other organizations, or the Nation is acceptable. Review the reported security status of the information system (including the effectiveness of security controls employed within and inherited by the system) on an ongoing basis in accordance with the monitoring strategy to determine whether the risk to organizational operations, organizational assets, individuals, other organizations, or the Nation remains acceptable.

Required Skill and Experience:
At least twelve (12+) years of experience of demonstrated experience in the Information Security (Cybersecurity or Information Assurance) field.
Minimum of at least twelve (12+) years of experience as an ISSO/ISSM, working A&A documentation, assessments, and IA program tasks.
Strong familiarity with the NIST Risk Management Framework (800-37), NIST 800-53/53A, NIST 800+ series Special Publications, elated Federal Information Processing Standards (FIPS), DHS 4300 A/B/C, DOD 8500.1, DoD Risk Management Framework (RMF) guidance and DoD Assessment & Authorization process, FISMA guidance, and other Federal Cyber Security policies and guidelines. Familiarity with USCG COMDTINST 5500.13
Strong technical, analytic and problem-solving skills combined with the ability to provide quick resolution to problems.
Security domain, implementation and security tools knowledge.
Extensive knowledge of Xacta, eMASS, and Assured Compliance Assessment Solution (ACAS).
Knowledge of DOD Host Based Security System (HBSS).
Working knowledge of DISA Security Technical Implementation Guides (STIG) benchmarks and STIG Viewer. Capable of conducting manual reviews, interpreting STIG guidance, and implementation recommendations. Familiar with drafting documentation, relating to vulnerabilities. (POA&Ms, Waivers, etc.).
Experience in the analysis of identified system weaknesses identified during system security assessments and the related mitigation plans as they pertain to meeting mandated system security requirements and timeframes. To include weakness POA&M and waiver creation and management.
Must have experience using Microsoft Office Programs (Excel, Word, PowerPoint, etc.)
Demonstrated consulting and analytical skills and experience.
Strong analytical, problem-solving and decision-making capabilities.
Ability to interact with a variety of stakeholders to include vendors, senior leadership, CIOs, and CISOs.

Education:
BA/BS in Computer Science, Information Technology, Information Security.

Certifications:
Minimum IAM Level II certification level to include one or more of the following: EC-Council Certified Network Defense (CND), CompTIA Cloud+, GIAC Security Leadership Certification (GSLC), CompTIA Security+ CE DoD 8570.01-Manual compliant certifications.

Clearance:
Minimum Active Secret security clearance

Work Core Hours:
Eight-hour workday, during the workweek: 8:00 am – 5:00 pm ET, Monday through Friday

Company Background:
NuCrest, LLC is a minority-owned Service-Disabled Veteran-Owned Small Business (SDVOSB)/Small-Disadvantaged Business (SDB) based in Anne Arundel County, Maryland focuses on delivering a diverse portfolio of security-focus IT Enterprise Services and Solutions to support the critical missions of Federal and Civic clients. We deliver our services across multiple enterprise platforms, data networks, and cloud environments.
At NuCrest we support our Veterans and encourage all to apply!
NuCrest provides equal employment opportunities to all employees and applicants for employment and prohibits discrimination and harassment of any type without regard to race, color, religion, age, sex, national origin, disability status, genetics, protected veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state or local laws.
This policy applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting, hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation and training.",767,Washington
7,"Specialist, Operations Systems Improvement",District of Columbia Public Schools,"Washington, DC",None,"Position OverviewThe Office of Innovation and Systems Improvement (ISI) works with the Chancellor to align resources across the organization through innovation and continuous improvement. Our goal is to initiate change and lead DC Public Schools into the highest performing school district in the nation. After engaging with over 3,000 internal and external stakeholders to help shape the future of DCPS, we are guided by the five strategic priorities of the new Capital Commitment 2017-2022 Strategic Plan:Promote Equity: Define, understand, and promote equity to close achievement gaps and interrupt institutional bias.Empower Our People: Recruit, develop, and retain a talented, caring, and diverse team.Educate the Whole Child: Provide rigorous, joyful, and inclusive academic and social emotional experiences for all students.Ensure Excellent Schools: Increase the number of high quality schools across the district by defining blended autonomies for schools and creating opportunities for innovation.Engage Families: Deepen partnerships with families and community.The Office of the Chief Operating Officer (OCOO) is comprised of the Strategic School Operations, Food & Nutrition Services, School Security, Facilities, Compliance, and Attendance teams. OCOO is responsible for guiding the operations and functions for all 118 schools within the District. Our goal is for all DCPS schools to be ready on the first day of school and every day thereafter so that all principals can lead, all teachers can teach, and all students can learn.The Specialist, Operations Systems Improvement will design and develop strategies and work plans to streamline OCOO systems and workstreams. The Specialist will help to manage project plan progress and will recommend solutions and next steps. The Specialist will support the organizational culture of OCOO, improve cross-team collaboration, and support effective communications.The Specialist, Operations Systems Improvement will report to the Director, Operations Strategy.Essential Duties and ResponsibilitiesThe below statements are intended to describe the general nature and scope of work being performed by this position. This is not a complete listing of all responsibilities, duties, and/or skills required. Other duties may be assigned.Supports the Office of the Chief Operating Officer in developing and implementing innovative projects to optimize school supports.Identifies patterns/trends in issues across multiple projects and develops longer-term, systematic solutions to address them.Builds relationships and liaises with various internal departments to drive collaboration and project success.Interviews and surveys other colleagues and management teams to determine opportunities for improvement; researches specific issues; and develops detailed recommendations and implementation plans to resolve.Stays closely aware of progress of projects, high-level initiatives, and emerging issues across DCPS organization; and informs the Director of Developments that impact or change the direction of programmatic priorities.Helps manage the analysis and presentation of data and progress of data-driven initiatives for senior management team and external audiences; and communicates progress to key stakeholder groups and incorporates their input.Helps to manage special projects, which may include school opening planning, development of training materials, creation of outreach and communication plans, and other projects as needed.Interacts with and responds effectively to urgent requests from multiple internal and external DCPS stakeholders.Helps to manage spending and budget strategy for OCOO; collaborates with DCPS Central Office of Federal Programs and Grants, Office of the Chief Financial Officer, and Office of Contracts & Acquisitions to ensure OCOO funds are prepared, spent, and tracked appropriately.QualificationsBachelor's degree and three to five years of related work experience.Master's degree preferred.Previous exposure to or experience in the education sector a plus.Strong organizational skills, project management experience, and the ability to adhere to deadlines.Superior communication skills, both written and verbal and the ability to collaborate with a variety of stakeholders.Must be creative, solutions-oriented, a team player, and enjoy jumping into new projects frequently.Proficiency in MS Office Suite and other applicable computer applications.DCPS ValuesSTUDENTS FIRST: We recognize students as whole children and put their needs first in everything we do.COURAGE: We have the audacity to learn from our successes and failures, to try new things, and to lead the nation as a proof point of PK-12 success.EQUITY: We work proactively to eliminate opportunity gaps by interrupting institutional bias and investing in effective strategies to ensure every student succeeds.EXCELLENCE: We work with integrity and hold ourselves accountable for exemplary outcomes, service, and interactions.TEAMWORK: We recognize that our greatest asset is our collective vision and ability to work collaboratively and authentically.JOY: We enjoy our collective work and will enthusiastically celebrate our success and each other.Job Type: Full-time",767,Washington
8,Regulatory Specialist,US Occupational Safety and Health Administration,"Washington, DC","$103,690 - $134,798 a year","Duties
Summary
This position is located in the Office of Information Quality and Paperwork Reduction (QIQPR), Directorate of Standards and Guidance (DSG).
This position is Inside the Bargaining Unit.
This position is at the Full Performance level.

Applicants: Please submit a writing sample that would demonstrate your analytical writing skills. It should be no longer than 3-4 pages written by you personally. For example, position paper, decision memo, white paper, options paper, etc.”

Responsibilities
Major duties for this position include but are not limited to the following:

Writes and/or edits documents and correspondence, e.g., Federal Register notices, controlled correspondence, options memoranda, concept papers, etc.
Responds to technical inquiries from the general public on burden hour, cost calculations and analysis.
Advises senior level staff of potential problems during the approval process that may impact required Paperwork Reduction Act timeframes.
Recommends whether burden studies should be conducted in-house or through contracting. Designs contractor studies, develops statements of work to be performed, including work plans.
Negotiates with potential contractors to achieve consensus objectives and to plan methodologies. Monitors contractor work throughout studies to assure that there are no data gaps and data needs are understood, guide accomplishment through each phase, and monitors progress to insure that focus of efforts is properly targeted.
Plan and manage a regulatory paperwork schedule involving competing and changing priorities; develop information collection requests as required by law incorporating information from numerous technical sources.
Participates in the Directorate's development of standards by serving as the technical advisor on the Paperwork Reduction Act and 0MB Regulation 5 CFR 1320.
Plans and manages the regulatory paperwork schedule for both new and proposed rules to ensure compliance with PRA and the continued, uninterrupted clearance of record keeping and reporting provisions contained in safety rules.
Reviews and analyzes the standard's economic analysis for pertinent information. Works directly with economists in the Office of Regulatory Analysis (ORA) to coordinate objectives and findings in accordance with the economic analysis and the standard. Serves as a team member on health standards development projects providing information and assistance on the Paperwork Reduction Act; oversees preparation of the PRA section of the preamble; oversees responses to public comments regarding the information collection requirements.
Prepares and/or coordinates the preparation of program plans, agendas, analyses, reports, etc. Monitors progress through to completion of projects.

Travel Required
Occasional travel - Occasional travel may be required.
Supervisory status
No
Promotion Potential
13 - This position is at the FPL - Full Performance Level.
Job family (Series)
0301 Miscellaneous Administration And Program
Requirements

Requirements
Conditions of Employment
Candidate required to obtain the necessary security/investigation level.
Requires a probationary period if the requirement has not been met.
Must be at least 16 years old and a U.S. Citizen.
Must be able to obtain/maintain a Public Trust security clearance.
Applicants must meet time-in-grade, time-after-competitive-appointment and qualifications requirements within 30 calendar days after the closing date of the vacancy to be eligible for consideration for selection.

Federal Employees Please Note: Your SF-50 must include enough information to be able to determine that time-in-grade requirements have been met and reflects your position title, pay plan/series/grade, tenure and the type of appointment (i.e. competitive/excepted). In some cases you may need to submit more than one SF-50.

Reference the ""Required Documents"" section for additional requirements.
Qualifications
To qualify for the GS-13 Grade Level you must meet the Specialized Experience.

Specialized Experience: Applicants must have 52 weeks of specialized experience equivalent to at least the next lower grade level, GS-12, in the Federal Service. Specialized experience is defined as experience in interpreting regulatory requirements, analyzing and justifying information collection burdens, and preparing supporting documentation. Experience writing and working on teams to address burdens and costs, and related activities, imposed by regulations on respondents. Applied knowledge on the Paperwork Reduction Act of 1995, Information Quality Act of 2000, and related regulatory policies.
Education
Additional information
DOL seeks to attract and retain a high performing and diverse workforce in which employees’ differences are respected and valued to better meet the varying needs of the diverse customers we serve. DOL fosters a diverse and inclusive work environment that promotes collaboration, flexibility and fairness so that all individuals are able to participate and contribute to their full potential.

Refer to these links for more information: GENERAL INFORMATION, ADDITIONAL DOCUMENTATION, FORMER FEDERAL EMPLOYEES

Additional vacancies may be filled using this announcement, if authorized.


How You Will Be Evaluated
You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications above.
Evaluation Factors (Competencies) - All qualified applicants will be evaluated on the following key competencies:

Writing - Recognizes or uses correct English grammar, punctuation, and spelling; communicates information (for example, facts, ideas, or messages) in a succinct and organized manner; produces written information, which may include technical material, that is appropriate for the intended audience.

Problem Solving - Identifies and analyzes problems; weighs relevance and accuracy of information; generates and evaluates alternative solutions; makes recommendations.

Technical Competence - Uses knowledge that is acquired through formal training or extensive on-the-job experience to perform one's job; works with, understands, and evaluates technical information related to the job; advises others.

Reasoning: Identifies rules, principles, or relationships that explain facts, data, or other information; analyzes information and makes correct inferences or draws accurate conclusions

Research - Knowledge of the scientific principles, methods, and processes used to conduct a systematic and objective inquiry; including study design, collection, analysis, and interpretation of data; and the reporting of results.

The information you provide may be verified by a review of your work experience and/or education, by checking references, and through other means (ex. interview). Your evaluation may also include a review by an HR Specialist or panel and may include other assessment tools (ex. interview, structured interview, written test, work sample, etc.). The examining Office of Human Resources (OHR) makes the final determination concerning applicant ratings. Your resume MUST provide sufficient information to substantiate your vacancy question responses. If not, the OHR may amend your responses to more accurately reflect the level of competency indicated by the content of your resume.

Click here for Evaluation details.

INFORMATION FOR CTAP[/ICTAP] ELIGIBLE(S) ONLY: If you are eligible for special priority selection under CTAP [or ICTAP], you must be well-qualified for the position to receive consideration. ICTAP/CTAP eligible(s) will be considered ""well-qualified"" if they attain at least a rating score of 90 in a numerical rating scheme. Be sure to review DOL Account Eligibility Questions #24 to reflect that you are applying as an ICTAP or CTAP eligible and submit supporting documentation.

To preview questions please click here.

Background checks and security clearance
Security clearance
Other
Drug test required
No
Required Documents

Required Documents
The following documents must be submitted by 11:59 p.m. (ET) on the vacancy closing date. Warning: If you submit a document using the same document title, the 2nd submission will OVERWRITE the 1st submission. Also, do not upload password-protected documents.

The following documents are required from all applicants (PLEASE READ CAREFULLY):

ARE YOU A CURRENT OR FORMER FEDERAL EMPLOYEE? If applying as a status candidate with current or former Federal Service, please provide a copy of your last or most recent SF-50, ""Notification of Personnel Action” which shows your appointment eligibility for the position for which you are applying. Your SF-50 must identify the highest grade you held on a permanent basis, Pay Plan/Pay Schedule, Series, and Grade/Pay Band, and career status. Multiple SF-50 may be submitted to demonstrate your highest previous rate and eligibility.
WARNING: An award SF-50 (ex. cash or time off award) may not indicate grade, step, and competitive status. For current DOL employees, an award SF-50 DOES NOT indicate grade and step.

- Resumes are required - provide a resume either by creating one in USAJOBS or uploading one from your computer and USAJOBS profile. To receive full consideration for relevant and specialized experience, please list the month, year, and the number of work hours worked for the experience listed on your resume. We also suggest that you preview the vacancy questions, and confirm that your resume supports your question responses.
Most recent performance appraisal/evaluation signed and dated within 18 months is requested by the agency, but will not disqualify candidates if not submitted. If not submitted during the application process, one may/will be requested at the time of the interview if the opportunity is extended. Applies to current and former Federal employees.
Writing Sample: Please submit a writing sample that would demonstrate your analytical writing skills. It should be no longer than 3-4 pages written by you personally. For example, position paper, decision memo, white paper, options paper, etc.”

The following documents are required if applicable:

- Displaced Employee Placement Documents - Only required if requesting priority consideration under ICTAP/CTAP Eligibility.

- DD-214 - verifying military service, eligibility for consideration under the Veterans Employment Opportunity Act (VEOA), and showing the character of discharge (ex. Member Copy 4 and 2 are acceptable vs. Copy 1 which is not acceptable to adjudicate veteran's preference)

Special/Non-Competitive Appointing Authority Documents
Applicants who are eligible for consideration, and wish to be considered, under one of the following non-competitive hiring authorities must submit appropriate documentation (click on the links below to see the documentation requirements): Military Spouses (MISP)
Land Management Eligible(s): a copy of your most recent Notification of Personnel Action (SF-50 or equivalent) proving your eligibility for appointment under the Land Management Workforce Flexibility Act. This service must have been performed in the competitive service, under a time-limited appointment in a Land Management Agency, as defined by P.L. 114-328. For more information, click here.
Cover Letters are not mandatory and will not be used to verify experience, but may be submitted.

Applicants selected for employment who are not current DOL employees will be required to provide proof of citizenship, and the E-Verify system will be used to confirm the employment eligibility of all new hires.
If you are relying on your education to meet qualification requirements:
Education must be accredited by an accrediting institution recognized by the U.S. Department of Education in order for it to be credited towards qualifications. Therefore, provide only the attendance and/or degrees from schools accredited by accrediting institutions recognized by the U.S. Department of Education.
Failure to provide all of the required information as stated in this vacancy announcement may result in an ineligible rating or may affect the overall rating.
Benefits

Benefits
A career with the U.S. Government provides employees with a comprehensive benefits package. As a federal employee, you and your family will have access to a range of benefits that are designed to make your federal career very rewarding. Opens in a new windowLearn more about federal benefits.
Review our benefits
Eligibility for benefits depends on the type of position you hold and whether your position is full-time, part-time, or intermittent. Contact the hiring agency for more information on the specific benefits offered.
Help
This job is open to
Federal employees - Competitive service
Current or former competitive service federal employees.
Career transition (CTAP, ICTAP, RPL)
Federal employees who meet the definition of a ""surplus"" or ""displaced"" employee.
Land & base management
Certain current or former term or temporary federal employees of a land or base management agency.
Military spouses
Veterans
Clarification from the agency
This vacancy is open to current/former Federal employees w/competitive/reinstatement eligibility; ICTAP and CTAP eligibles in the local commuting area; Veterans' Employment Opportunity Act (VEOA) eligible, Military Spouses and Qualified Land Management Eligibles.",767,Washington
9,"Cyber Threat Analyst/ Computer Security Systems Specialist, Level 3",FEDDATA,"Arlington, VA",None,"Position Summary:
Research and analyze classified reporting to identify current and emerging threat trends and work with intelligence community partners to produce and offer classified threat intelligence products and briefings to internal and external partners and stakeholders.
Essential Job Functions:
Provide 24/7 research and reporting support to customer Senior Leadership, Duty Officers, partners and stakeholders.
Develop informational and analytic products daily designed to increase situational awareness and advanced warning of current and emerging cybersecurity threats and risks.
Report on underlying patterns of behavior by conducting detailed analysis of incidents, threats and risks and associated impacts and consequences, vulnerabilities, tactics, techniques and procedures (TTP), and other malicious and non-malicious indicators.
Provide daily threat briefings to the Watch Floor during the customer Director’s Morning Brief.
Develop operational-level trends analysis products that leverage customer internal data repositories, classified and unclassified open source reporting to provide situational awareness of emerging cyber threat and risk trends to customer partners, stakeholders, and customers.
Provide operational analysis coordination, research, and reporting support to the customer during internal cyber incident management exercises as well as national-level cyber exercises.
Track and manage internal and external requests for information (RFIs) and requests for analysis (RFAs) for the entire Branch and produce weekly, monthly, quarterly, and annual performance metrics reports.

Required Skills: (There are multiple positions for the Cyber Threat Analyst position (Level1, Level 2, Level 3))
Due to the nature of this position and the information that employees will be required to access, U.S. Citizenship is required.
Required Security Clearance: Active Top Secret Security Clearance with ability to obtain a DHS SCI, as well as obtain and maintain a favorably adjudicated DHS background investigation (EOD) for continued employment.

Cyber Threat Analyst, Level 2
Bachelor's Degree with a minimum of 2 years of experience is required. An additional 4 years of experience may be substituted for a degree.

Cyber Threat Analyst, Level 3
Bachelor's Degree and minimum of 4+ years of experience is required. An additional 4 years of experience may be substituted for a degree.

Desired/Preferred Skills:
TS/SCI is desired.

Work Conditions:
Work is typically based in a busy office environment and subject to frequent interruptions. Business work hours are normally set from Monday through Friday 8:00am to 5:00pm, however some extended or weekend hours may be required. Additional details on the precise hours will be informed to the candidate from the Program Manager/Hiring Manager. May be required to travel up to 25% of time.
Physical Requirements:
May be required to lift and carry items weighing up to 25 lbs. Requires intermittent standing, walking, sitting, squatting, stretching and bending throughout the workday.
Background Screening/Check/Investigation:
Successful Completion of a Background Screening/Check/Investigation will be required as a condition of hire.
Employment Type: Full-time
Benefits:
Federal Data Systems, LLC offers competitive compensation, a flexible benefits package, career development opportunities that reflect its commitment to creating a diverse and supportive workplace. Benefits include, not all inclusive – Medical, Vision & Dental Insurance, Paid Time-Off & Company Paid Holidays, Personal Development & Learning Opportunities.
Other:
This employer participates in E-Verify and will provide the federal government with your Form I-9 information to confirm that you are authorized to work in the U.S.
Federal Data Systems, LLC (FEDDATA) is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. That does not unlawfully discriminate in any of its programs or activities on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, age, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, or any other basis prohibited by applicable law.",767,Washington
10,Senior Technical Support Specialist Tier II WFH in Washington,Zest City,"Washington, DC","$38,000 - $83,000 a year","Fast pace business supporting blue chip clients
$38-83000 USD subject to experience
Working for the market leader

Responsible for providing assistance to customers in an enterprise and multi-site infrastructure needing to resolve problems with their computer systems by answering service requests. Provides more complex troubleshooting and assistance for customer systems, scheduling escalations as needed. Perform daily equipment checks to ensure equipment is functioning properly. Provides support for department using basic acquired job skills and knowledge of the company.


Major Accountabilities:


Network Operations Center Functions - Provide Tier II support to clients related to issues with assigned business unit products and services (e.g., VOC, data, etc.) while ensuring adherence to established corporate and departmental policies and procedures
Respond to escalated tickets from Tier I support staff to issues that impact clients business operations
Perform more advanced troubleshooting of routers and systems making adjustments within scope of responsibility
Test modifications to systems to ensure operation before implementing for client's use
Contact common carrier and work with them to resolve issues determined to be in their area of responsibility, acting as a liaison between them and the client
Update information on trouble tickets as necessary, and close out trouble tickets when clients' issues have been resolved
Work aging tickets to resolution, engaging appropriate higher level support teams as needed
Provide constant communication to clients on any/all outstanding issues
Provide backup support to Tier I, answering incoming client calls involving questions or issues (e.g., moves, adds, changes, service affecting issues, etc) with services being provided
Document all trouble tickets with clear, concise explanations in a timely and accurate manner ensuring adherence to department policies and procedures May resolve Tier I problems (e.g., modify call flow, password reset, web feature modification, add/delete users, etc.) as needed
Using various tools (e.g., Tivoli, etc), monitor circuits and network functions and activities for issues
Research Assistance - Assist in resolving routine issues by identifying issue(s) and researching in a timely manner
Document all issues thoroughly maintaining department files
Continuously evaluate the status of all work efforts, ensuring all tasks are prioritized to assist in providing timely and quality services
Assist in monitoring issue trends, escalating such trends to supervisor to determine appropriate actions necessary to eliminate future occurrences and improve service levels
Team Interface/Customer Service - Establish and maintain a professional relationship with internal/external customers, team members and department contacts
Cooperate with team members to meet goals or complete tasks
Provide quality customer service that exceeds customer expectations and improves level of service being provided
Treat all internal/external customers, team members and department contacts with dignity/respect
Escalate to supervisor any situation outside the employee's control that could adversely impact the services being provided

Qualifications:


Education
High school diploma or GED required
College courses from an accredited college or university in computer science, MIS or a related field preferred
Experience
Minimum 2 years experience in a network operations or technical support environment required
Advanced work in pursuit of a Bachelors degree (e.g., junior and senior year, etc.) in computer science, MIS, or a related field can be substituted for one year of technical support or network operations experience
Technical Knowledge
Basic troubleshooting methodology knowledge preferred
Cisco Certified Network Associate (e.g., Voice, Wireless, Security, Service Provider Operations) or higher designation preferred
Minimum 1 year experience with Cisco networking systems required
Minimum 1 year experience with troubleshooting or configuring voice services required
Minimum 1 year experience with call flow configuration required
Other
Basic knowledge of Word and Excel required
Based on departmental need, may be required to work weekend or evening shifts",767,Washington
11,Mission Support Specialist (Personnel),US Customs and Border Protection,"Washington, DC 20001 (Chinatown area)","$60,129 - $94,581 a year","Duties
Summary
As our nation navigates the COVID-19 pandemic, CBP is committed to delivering our mission to safeguard America's borders and enable legitimate trade and travel. Staffing mission critical positions remains a high priority. Be reassured that CBP is still hiring, despite potential hiring process step delays due to restrictions to in-person activities.
Responsibilities
Organizational Location: This position is with the Department of Homeland Security, within U.S. Customs and Border Protection, U.S. Border Patrol Headquarters, Office of the Chief, Washington, District of Columbia.

Joining the Customs and Border Protection U.S. Border Patrol will allow you to use your expertise in administration to provide advisory and technical services to management. Apply for this exciting opportunity to strengthen homeland security by planning and carrying out a wide variety of administrative and management program planning activities. This position starts at a salary of $60,129.00 (GS-9, Step 1) to $94,581.00 (GS-11, Step 10) with promotion potential to $113,362 (GS-12 Step 10).

In this Mission Support Specialist (Personnel) position, you will become a key team member of Homeland Security professionals performing significant review and analysis of studies and projects to address substantive technical issues. Typical work assignments include:

Assisting in performing researches, and preparing briefing materials for the Chief and Deputy Chief of U.S. Border Patrol
Analyzing and developing plans to meet established goals and revise methods if necessary
Developing and delivering briefings, project papers, status/staff report and correspondence to managers
Providing direct guidance and tracking of the budget for the Office of the Chief. Books all travel for the Chief, Deputy Chief, as well as other members of the Office of the Chiefs staff and tracks all expenditures associated with the Office of the Chiefs budget
Ensuring conference spending compliance and maintaining records to ensure all conference spending falls within approved limits

Travel Required
Occasional travel - You will be expected to travel for this position.
Supervisory status
No
Promotion Potential
12
Job family (Series)
0301 Miscellaneous Administration And Program
Requirements

Requirements
Conditions of Employment
You must be a U.S. Citizen to apply for this position
Males born after 12/31/1959 must be registered with Selective Service
Primary U.S. residency for at least three of the last five years (additional details below)
You may be required to pass a background investigation
CBP follows the DHS Drug-Free Workplace Plan for drug testing procedures
As an employee of CBP, you will be joining a workforce that is dedicated to accomplishing our mission while maintaining the trust of our Nation by strictly adhering to all government ethics standards. Your conduct will be subject to the ethics rules applicable to all Executive Branch employees, and to CBP employees specifically, as well as the criminal conflict of interest statutes. Once you enter on duty, these rules include obtaining approval for outside employment or business activity, to ensure such employment or business activity is not prohibited and does not interfere or conflict with performance of your official duties. Please review further details via the following link.

Qualifications
Experience: You qualify for the GS-9 grade level if you possess 1 year of specialized experience equivalent to at least the next lower grade level, performing duties such as:
Assisting senior specialists in developing and updating position descriptions
Applying principles and practices commonly used in the recruitment and placement process
Applying knowledge of laws and policies of employee benefits to provide guidance on options and advantages/disadvantages
Reviewing payroll and other personnel spreadsheets
Filing documents pertinent to employees and identifying and recommending solutions to administrative problems


Experience: You qualify for the GS-11 grade level if you possess 1 year of specialized experience equivalent to at least the next lower grade level, performing duties such as:
Coordinating and monitoring a variety of administrative projects related to human resources and/or related areas (i.e. personnel, payroll, benefits, etc.)
Identifying and recommending solutions to a wide range of problems relevant to human resources management
Analyzing data from a variety of sources to develop trends, patterns, and estimates
Preparing preliminary and finished reports and related documents


Education Substitution:
GS-9: You may substitute a Master's degree or 2 full years of graduate education or a J.D or L.L.B. degree for experience required at the GS-9 grade level. Such education must have been obtained in an accredited college or university and demonstrate the knowledge, skills, and abilities necessary to do the work of the position. Check with your school to determine how many credit hours comprise two years of graduate education. If that information is not available, use 36 semester or 54 quarter hours.

GS-11: You may substitute a Ph.D. or an equivalent doctoral degree, or three full years of progressively higher-level graduate education leading to such a degree or an LL.M. for experience at the GS-11 grade level. Such education must have been obtained in an accredited college or university. Check with your school to determine how many credit hours comprise three years of graduate study. If that information is not available, use 54 semester or 81 quarter hours.

Combining Experience and Education: To combine your education and experience, you must convert each to a percentage, and then add the percentages. The combined total of your percentage of education and experience must equal at least 100% in order to qualify. If your education is currently described in quarter hours, convert the quarter hours into semester hours by multiplying the quarter hours by the fraction 2/3. To calculate your percentage of graduate education, divide the number of graduate semester hours by 18. To determine your percentage of qualifying experience, you must divide your total number of months of qualifying experience by the required number of months of experience. Add your percentages of education and experience. The two percentages must total at least 100%.

Experience refers to paid and unpaid experience, including volunteer work done through National Service programs (e.g., Peace Corps, AmeriCorps) and other organizations (e.g., professional; philanthropic; religious; spiritual; community, student, social). Volunteer work helps build critical competencies, knowledge, and skills and can provide valuable training and experience that translates directly to paid employment. You will receive credit for all qualifying experience, including volunteer experience.

You must meet all qualification requirements, including education if applicable to this position, subject to verification at any stage of the application process by 06/18/2021.

In order to be considered for this position, you must complete all required steps in the process. In addition to the application and application questionnaire, this position requires an online assessment. The online assessment measures critical general competencies required to perform the job.

The Office of Personnel Management (OPM) must authorize employment offers made to current or former political appointees. If you are currently, or have been within the last 5 years, a political Schedule A, Schedule C, Non-career SES or Presidential Appointee employee in the Executive Branch, you must disclose this information to the Human Resources Office.

Background Investigation: U.S. Customs and Border Protection (CBP) is a federal law enforcement agency that requires all applicants to undergo a thorough background investigation prior to employment in order to promote the agency's core values of vigilance, service to country, and integrity. During the screening and/or background investigation process, you will be asked questions regarding any felony criminal convictions or current felony charges, the use of illegal drugs (e.g., marijuana, cocaine, heroin, LSD, methamphetamines, ecstasy), and the use of non-prescribed controlled substances including any experimentation, possession, sale, receipt, manufacture, cultivation, production, transfer, shipping, trafficking, or distribution of controlled substances. For more information visit this link.

Residency: There is a residency requirement for all applicants not currently employed by CBP. Individuals are required to have physically resided in the United States or its protectorates (as declared under international law) for at least three of the last five years. If you do not meet the residency requirement and you have been physically located in a foreign location for more than two of the last five years, you may request an exception to determine if you are eligible for a residency waiver by meeting one or more of the following conditions:
Working for the U.S. Government as a federal civilian or as a member of the military
A dependent who was authorized to accompany a federal civilian or member of the military who was working for the U.S. government
Participation in a study abroad program sponsored by a U.S. affiliated college or university
Working as a contractor, intern, consultant or volunteer supporting the U.S. government


Probationary Period: All employees new to the federal government must serve a one year probationary period during the first year of his/her initial permanent federal appointment to determine fitness for continued employment. Current and former federal employees may be required to serve or complete a probationary period.
Education
Please see the Qualifications and Required Documents sections for more information if education is applicable to this position.
Additional information
This position is not covered under the bargaining unit.

Reasonable Accommodation Requests: If you believe you have a disability (i.e., physical or mental), covered by the Rehabilitation Act of 1973 as amended and Americans with Disabilities Act 1990 as amended, that would interfere with completing the USA Hire Competency Based Assessments, you will be granted the opportunity to request a reasonable accommodation in your online application. Requests for Reasonable Accommodations for the USA Hire Competency Based Assessments and appropriate supporting documentation for Reasonable Accommodation must be received prior to starting the USA Hire Competency Based Assessments. Decisions on requests for Reasonable Accommodations are made on a case-by-case basis. If you meet the minimum qualifications of the position, after notification of the adjudication of your request, you will receive an email invitation to complete the USA Hire Competency Based Assessments. You must complete all assessments within 48 hours of receiving the URL to access the USA Hire Competency Based Assessments, if you received the link after the close of the announcement. To determine if you need a Reasonable Accommodation, please review the Procedures for Requesting a Reasonable Accommodation for Online Assessments here.

Positions with known promotion potential do not guarantee promotion, nor is the promise of promotion implied.

DHS uses E-Verify, an internet-based system, to confirm the eligibility of all newly hired employees to work in the United States. Learn more about E-Verify including your rights and responsibilities.

Follow U.S. Customs and Border Protection on Twitter @CustomsBorder

The Department of Homeland Security encourages persons with disabilities to apply, to include persons with intellectual, severe physical or psychiatric disabilities, as defined by 5 CFR § 213.3102(u), and/or Disabled Veterans with a compensable service-connected disability of 30 percent or more as defined by 5 CFR § 315.707. Veterans, Peace Corps/VISTA volunteers, and persons with disabilities possess a wealth of unique talents, experiences, and competencies that can be invaluable to the DHS mission. If you are a member of one of these groups, you may not have to compete with the public for federal jobs. To determine your eligibility for non-competitive appointment and to understand the required documentation, click on the links above or contact the Servicing Human Resources Office listed at the bottom of this announcement.

Agency Career Transition Assistance Program (CTAP) or the Interagency Career Transition Assistance Program (ICTAP) Eligibles: If you have never worked for the federal government, you are not CTAP/ICTAP eligible. View information about CTAP/ICTAP eligibility on OPM's Career Transition Resources website. To be considered eligible under CTAP/ICTAP, you must be placed in the Well-Qualified category for this position, as described above. In addition, you must submit the supporting documents listed under the Required Documents section of this job announcement.

How You Will Be Evaluated
You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications above.
We will review your resume and supporting documentation to ensure you meet the minimum qualification requirements. If you meet the minimum qualifications, we will use responses you provide on the application questionnaire and the result of the online assessments required for this position to place you in one of three categories based on your experience, education, and training.

The knowledge, skills, and abilities needed to perform this job are:

Knowledge of the concepts, principles, practices, regulations and policies related to human resources, compensation, classification, and general administrative guidelines
Knowledge in the application of methods and techniques to analyze and evaluate the effects of potential changes in plans and procedures
Skills in utilizing standard computer programs (i.e., Microsoft Office Suite) to develop and maintain electronic files, word processing documents to prepare various type of issue/project papers, PowerPoint presentations, and spreadsheets that concisely presents findings/recommendations
Ability to analyze and evaluate information in order to determine accuracy and make recommendations to improve operations
Ability to effectively communicate both orally and in writing with all levels of management and employees, and the ability to display well-balanced, accurate judgement


Competencies:
Attention to Detail
Customer Service
Decision Making
Flexibility
Integrity/Honesty
Interpersonal Skills
Learning
Reading
Reasoning
Self-Management
Stress Tolerance
Teamwork


If you meet the minimum qualifications, you will be placed in one of the following categories:
Highly Qualified: Applicants possessing experience that substantially exceeds the minimum qualifications of the position and demonstrate high proficiency in all of the critical competencies, including all Selective Placement Factors (SPF), and appropriate Quality Ranking Factors (QRF) as determined by the job analysis.
Well-Qualified: Applicants possessing experience that exceeds the minimum qualifications of the position and demonstrates acceptable proficiency in all of the critical competencies, including all SPF's and appropriate QRFs as determined by the job analysis.
Qualified: Applicants possessing experience that meets the minimum qualifications of the position and demonstrate basic proficiency in most of the critical competencies, including all SPFs and appropriate QRFs as determined by the job analysis.


Veterans: Qualified veterans who have a compensable service-connected disability of at least 10% are listed in the best-qualified category, except when the position being filled is scientific or professional at the GS-09 grade level, or higher. This position is not considered scientific/professional. Other 10 point preference eligibles and veterans with 5 point preference who meet the eligibility and qualification requirements are placed above non-preference eligibles within the category in which they qualify. View information on veterans' preference.


If you are highly qualified, you may be referred to the hiring manager for consideration and may be called for an interview. Preview the job questionnaire https://apply.usastaffing.gov/ViewQuestionnaire/11139875

Background checks and security clearance
Security clearance
Not Required
Drug test required
No
Required Documents

Required Documents
Your resume: A resume describing your job-related qualifications is required and will be used for the purpose of reviewing your qualifications and determining what training, if any, would be required when placed. A resume in English is required. It must contain your full legal name, address, phone number, complete work history including a detailed description of your duties, the dates you performed those duties (MM/DD/YY), your hours worked per week, job title, as well as series, grade, and salary (if applicable). For additional required items, see the link.
Your responses to the job questionnaire: https://apply.usastaffing.gov/ViewQuestionnaire/11139875
Your responses to the USA Hire Competency Based Assessment
Are you qualifying based on education? Submit a copy of your college transcript (unofficial is acceptable at this time; however, official copies will be required prior to entrance on duty) or a list of coursework with hours completed provided from the institution. Education must be from an institution accredited by an agency recognized by the U.S. Department of Education. Education obtained from a foreign university or college is not creditable unless it has been evaluated by an organization that specializes in interpretation of education credentials. For a listing of accrediting agencies see www.naces.org
Are you claiming special priority selection rights under the Agency Career Transition Assistance Program (CTAP) or the Interagency Career Transition Assistance Program (ICTAP)? You must submit a separation notice; your most recent SF-50 (noting your current position, grade level and duty location); a copy of your most recent performance rating of record; an agency certification that you cannot be placed after injury compensation has been terminated; an OPM notification that your disability annuity has been terminated; or a Military Department of National Guard Bureau notification that you are retired under 5 U.S.C. 8337(h) or 8456.
Are you a veteran? To apply veterans' preference you must submit proof of eligibility as appropriate for your preference type:
Five Point Preference: DD 214 listing the character of service and either qualifying medal(s) or service period
Ten Point Preference: DD 214 showing character of service and supporting documentation as listed on the Standard Form 15 (application for 10 Point Veterans' Preference). Submitting an SF-15 with your application is encouraged. Veterans with a service-connected disability must also submit a VA Disability Award letter dated 1991 or later, OR supporting documentation as listed in the SF-15
If you are currently serving on active duty, you must submit a written statement from the armed forces certifying your dates of service, rank, expected character of service, and anticipated date of separation. If you apply with a written statement at this stage, your preference will be verified by a DD 214 upon separation from the military.
For more information about veterans' preference visit this link.
Are you a current or former federal employee? If yes, it is recommended that you submit a copy of your SF-50(s) (Notification of Personnel Action) to support your experience. Examples of appropriate SF-50s include promotions, within-grade increases and accessions.
Are you a current or former political Schedule A, Schedule C, Non-career SES or Presidential Appointee employee? Submit a copy of your applicable SF-50, along with a statement that provides the following information regarding your most recent political appointment:
Position title
Type of appointment (Schedule A, Schedule C, Non-career SES, or Presidential Appointee)
Agency
Beginning and ending dates of appointment
If you are requesting a reasonable accommodation to the USA Hire Competency Based Assessments, submit documentation to support your request, including the Reasonable Accommodation Request Form found here.

Benefits

Benefits
A career with the U.S. Government provides employees with a comprehensive benefits package. As a federal employee, you and your family will have access to a range of benefits that are designed to make your federal career very rewarding. Opens in a new windowLearn more about federal benefits.
Review our benefits
Eligibility for benefits depends on the type of position you hold and whether your position is full-time, part-time, or intermittent. Contact the hiring agency for more information on the specific benefits offered.
Help
This job is open to
The public
U.S. citizens, nationals or those who owe allegiance to the U.S.",767,Washington
12,Sr. Computer Security Systems Specialist (Cyber),n-Link Corporation,"Washington, DC 20001 (Shaw area)",None,"COMPANY OVERVIEW:
n-Link Corporation was founded in 1995 as a high-end enterprise IT solutions firm attracting high-flying performers to join our company of owners. As a woman-owned small business, the founder created an Employee Stock Ownership Plan (ESOP) in 1999 and 10 years later became 100% ESOP owned. In 2011, the company was selected as a ""Top Small Company Workplaces"" by Inc. Magazine and was awarded the prestigious ""Innovation Award"" by the National Center for Employee Ownership (NCEO). It has also won a place on Inc. Magazine's 500/5000 fastest growing companies in America for 2013, 2014 and 2015.
~Position is contingent upon award notification~
JOB OVERVIEW:
We are currently seeking a highly qualified Sr. Computer Security Systems Specialist (Cyber) to support a DHS contract for provision of ISSO Services in Washington, DC. This position is pending award notification.
RESPONSIBILITIES:
Assist in design, development, and implementation of security solutions for a variety of systems.
Perform complex risk analysis
Establish information security requirements based upon policy, regulation, and resource demands
REQUIREMENTS:
Bachelor's Degree
Active Top-Secret Security Clearance with capability of SCI access
8+ years of professional experience
8+ years experience with FISMA compliance in unclassified environments.
5+ years of experience with FISMA compliance in classified environments.
5+ years of experience with ISSO and SS&SA experience in classified environments.
ISSO and SS&SA experience in unclassified environments.
Experience with the following:
Security Operations Center (SOC) services.
Conducting vulnerability scanning and assessments utilizing NESSUS and AppDetective.
Utilizing applications hosted in a Data Center Environment.
Utilizing applications hosted in a Cloud Environment.
Ability to lead tabletop exercises for disaster recovery planning as well as experience leading actual failover and failback exercises in support of disaster recovery planning in both a classified and unclassified environment.
Working with the Information Assurance Compliance System (IACS) software tool to maintain FISMA inventory information.
FeeQ2VRjFp",767,Washington
13,Computer Security Systems Specialist - Senior Lead (3.3 SECURITY COMPLIANCE SUPPORT),"Technical and Management Resources, Inc.","Annapolis Junction, MD 20701",None,"Overview:

TMR is looking for a Computer Security Systems Specialist to support the Department of Transportation Administration (TSA), Office of Information Technology (IT), Technology Solutions Division (TSD). TSD will be adding additional IT systems to support the TSA Pre✓® expansion effort. All systems are used to improve the security of our nation’s transportation systems by applying dynamic risk-based, intelligence driven vetting procedures and enhancing its use of technology. This position is located in Annapolis Junction, MD.
Responsibilities:

Provide Information Systems Security Officer (ISSO) support services that involves Security Engineering and Security Compliance for TSA’s mission critical systems, including Secure Flight (SF), Screening Gateway (SG), Transportation Vetting System (TVS), Technology Infrastructure Modernization (TIM) System, and the Security Threat Assessment Mission Platform (STAMP) that will significantly improve security operation of our nation’s traveling public.
Qualifications:

Required:
Must have 15 years of experience.
Computer Security Systems Specialists must possess a Batchelor’s Degree or higher and have an active Certified Information Systems Security Professional (CISSP) certification or Certified Information Security Manager (CISM) certification.
US Citizen able to obtain/maintain Public Trust clearance
Preferred:
The following certifications are preferred but not required: Linux+, Network+, CCNA, CAP, CEH, ESCA, and OSCP.
The following experience is preferred, but not required: DevSecOps, and CI/CD integration.
The Specialist should have experience with various Operating Systems including Windows, Linux and Unix.",767,Washington
14,Senior Security Specialist,ANDURIL INDUSTRIES,"Washington, DC",None,"Anduril is a defense technology company, bringing Silicon Valley talent and funding to the defense sector. Our technology helps our customers solve their toughest challenges by enabling them to make better, more informed decisions in life-and-death situations. We’ve assembled a diverse team of experts in artificial intelligence, computer vision, sensor fusion, optics, and data analysis that are creating software and hardware solutions to radically evolve the capabilities of the United States and our allies. If you are passionate about solving problems that have real impact, come join Anduril and build the future of defense.
Anduril Industries is seeking to add a Senior Personnel Security Specialist to join our Washington DC security team. This is a full-time position.

The Senior Personnel Security Specialist position will provide technical and administrative assistance in support of the day-to-day personnel security operations at Anduril Industries. The selected person will review cases, interact with other offices and agencies, and work with various Anduril Industries and federal personnel security (PERSEC) systems.
WHAT YOU'LL DO
Provide reviews for both classified and unclassified cases and provide recommendations in writing to Anduril personnel on what action to take to resolve security issues and whether the person, whose background issues are being adjudicated, is eligible for a Anduril Industries access authorization, and/or is eligible for Sensitive Compartmented Information (SCI) pursuant to Intelligence Community Directive (ICD) 704.
Liaise with other offices and agencies on matters affecting security operations, such as processing verbal and written requests for clearance verifications, handling of other agency sponsored clearances, obtaining reports of investigation and polygraph examination, etc.
Provide timely notification of cancelled investigations to investigative agencies, clearance actions to requesting offices, clearance suspensions, revocations, denials and terminations to authorities as appropriate.
Maintain, retrieve, duplicate, and file data received from the entire Anduril Industries complex in Anduril Industries headquarters personnel security files and administrative review files.
Support the day-to-day headquarters operations related to Automated Data Processing (ADP) databases for the personnel security program, including Anduril Industries Integrated Safeguards and Defense Information Security System (DISS) and Personnel Security Database (SecCon).
Enter data from documents and reports into the appropriate system, ensuring initial input of information, as well as all maintenance/updates, is accurate, current, and complete.
Receive requests for clearance verification by letter or telephone; responding by checking name(s) against master, pending, and termination files; processing written requests for clearance verification received from other government agencies.
Assist in developing operational procedures and management systems to improve data integrity and expire retrieval.
Prepare and disseminate personnel security reports and developing computer templates using standard Microsoft Office software to facilitate electronic transfer operations.
Provide Administrative Review (AR) and Program & Appeal Panel (AP) Support by processing requests received, managing AR case files, initiate AR procedures, ensure AR files are accurate and complete, track all cases.
Support Freedom of Information/Privacy Act (FOI/PA) activities by providing file management, retrieving case files, and other administrative activities.
All other duties as assigned.
REQUIRED QUALIFICATIONS
Bachelor’s degree from an accredited university or college in public administration, criminal justice, security management or related field.
10 years of experience in personnel security or related field.
5-10 years of experience in security investigations programs.
An active DOD Top Secret, with Single Scope Background Investigation (SSBI) or T5 completed within 5 years.
Demonstrated expert knowledge in all phases of a personnel security program with emphasis on the review and analysis of derogatory information as it relates to national security concerns and recent practical experience in administrative review.
Demonstrated the highest level of writing ability with experience in preparation of analytical work products and able to effectively convey, through written and oral communication, complex and sensitive information.
Must be able to obtain and hold a U.S. TS/SCI security clearance.
U.S. Person status is required as this position needs to access export controlled data.
PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS
Master’s degree from an accredited university or college in public administration, criminal justice, security management or related field.
12+ years of experience in personnel security or related field
10+ years of experience in security investigations program
Anduril is an equal-opportunity employer, and we encourage candidates from all backgrounds to apply. If you are someone passionate to work on problems that matter, we’d love to hear from you!",767,Washington
15,Senior Technical Support Specialist Tier II WFH in Washington,Zest City,"Washington, DC","$38,000 - $83,000 a year","Fast pace business supporting blue chip clients
$38-83000 USD subject to experience
Working for the market leader

Responsible for providing assistance to customers in an enterprise and multi-site infrastructure needing to resolve problems with their computer systems by answering service requests. Provides more complex troubleshooting and assistance for customer systems, scheduling escalations as needed. Perform daily equipment checks to ensure equipment is functioning properly. Provides support for department using basic acquired job skills and knowledge of the company.


Major Accountabilities:


Network Operations Center Functions - Provide Tier II support to clients related to issues with assigned business unit products and services (e.g., VOC, data, etc.) while ensuring adherence to established corporate and departmental policies and procedures
Respond to escalated tickets from Tier I support staff to issues that impact clients business operations
Perform more advanced troubleshooting of routers and systems making adjustments within scope of responsibility
Test modifications to systems to ensure operation before implementing for client's use
Contact common carrier and work with them to resolve issues determined to be in their area of responsibility, acting as a liaison between them and the client
Update information on trouble tickets as necessary, and close out trouble tickets when clients' issues have been resolved
Work aging tickets to resolution, engaging appropriate higher level support teams as needed
Provide constant communication to clients on any/all outstanding issues
Provide backup support to Tier I, answering incoming client calls involving questions or issues (e.g., moves, adds, changes, service affecting issues, etc) with services being provided
Document all trouble tickets with clear, concise explanations in a timely and accurate manner ensuring adherence to department policies and procedures May resolve Tier I problems (e.g., modify call flow, password reset, web feature modification, add/delete users, etc.) as needed
Using various tools (e.g., Tivoli, etc), monitor circuits and network functions and activities for issues
Research Assistance - Assist in resolving routine issues by identifying issue(s) and researching in a timely manner
Document all issues thoroughly maintaining department files
Continuously evaluate the status of all work efforts, ensuring all tasks are prioritized to assist in providing timely and quality services
Assist in monitoring issue trends, escalating such trends to supervisor to determine appropriate actions necessary to eliminate future occurrences and improve service levels
Team Interface/Customer Service - Establish and maintain a professional relationship with internal/external customers, team members and department contacts
Cooperate with team members to meet goals or complete tasks
Provide quality customer service that exceeds customer expectations and improves level of service being provided
Treat all internal/external customers, team members and department contacts with dignity/respect
Escalate to supervisor any situation outside the employee's control that could adversely impact the services being provided

Qualifications:


Education
High school diploma or GED required
College courses from an accredited college or university in computer science, MIS or a related field preferred
Experience
Minimum 2 years experience in a network operations or technical support environment required
Advanced work in pursuit of a Bachelors degree (e.g., junior and senior year, etc.) in computer science, MIS, or a related field can be substituted for one year of technical support or network operations experience
Technical Knowledge
Basic troubleshooting methodology knowledge preferred
Cisco Certified Network Associate (e.g., Voice, Wireless, Security, Service Provider Operations) or higher designation preferred
Minimum 1 year experience with Cisco networking systems required
Minimum 1 year experience with troubleshooting or configuring voice services required
Minimum 1 year experience with call flow configuration required
Other
Basic knowledge of Word and Excel required
Based on departmental need, may be required to work weekend or evening shifts",767,Washington
16,Computer Security Systems Specialist - Senior Lead (3.3 SECURITY COMPLIANCE SUPPORT),"Technical and Management Resources, Inc.","Annapolis Junction, MD 20701",None,"Overview:

TMR is looking for a Computer Security Systems Specialist to support the Department of Transportation Administration (TSA), Office of Information Technology (IT), Technology Solutions Division (TSD). TSD will be adding additional IT systems to support the TSA Pre✓® expansion effort. All systems are used to improve the security of our nation’s transportation systems by applying dynamic risk-based, intelligence driven vetting procedures and enhancing its use of technology. This position is located in Annapolis Junction, MD.
Responsibilities:

Provide Information Systems Security Officer (ISSO) support services that involves Security Engineering and Security Compliance for TSA’s mission critical systems, including Secure Flight (SF), Screening Gateway (SG), Transportation Vetting System (TVS), Technology Infrastructure Modernization (TIM) System, and the Security Threat Assessment Mission Platform (STAMP) that will significantly improve security operation of our nation’s traveling public.
Qualifications:

Required:
Must have 15 years of experience.
Computer Security Systems Specialists must possess a Batchelor’s Degree or higher and have an active Certified Information Systems Security Professional (CISSP) certification or Certified Information Security Manager (CISM) certification.
US Citizen able to obtain/maintain Public Trust clearance
Preferred:
The following certifications are preferred but not required: Linux+, Network+, CCNA, CAP, CEH, ESCA, and OSCP.
The following experience is preferred, but not required: DevSecOps, and CI/CD integration.
The Specialist should have experience with various Operating Systems including Windows, Linux and Unix.",767,Washington
17,Senior Security Specialist,ANDURIL INDUSTRIES,"Washington, DC",None,"Anduril is a defense technology company, bringing Silicon Valley talent and funding to the defense sector. Our technology helps our customers solve their toughest challenges by enabling them to make better, more informed decisions in life-and-death situations. We’ve assembled a diverse team of experts in artificial intelligence, computer vision, sensor fusion, optics, and data analysis that are creating software and hardware solutions to radically evolve the capabilities of the United States and our allies. If you are passionate about solving problems that have real impact, come join Anduril and build the future of defense.
Anduril Industries is seeking to add a Senior Personnel Security Specialist to join our Washington DC security team. This is a full-time position.

The Senior Personnel Security Specialist position will provide technical and administrative assistance in support of the day-to-day personnel security operations at Anduril Industries. The selected person will review cases, interact with other offices and agencies, and work with various Anduril Industries and federal personnel security (PERSEC) systems.
WHAT YOU'LL DO
Provide reviews for both classified and unclassified cases and provide recommendations in writing to Anduril personnel on what action to take to resolve security issues and whether the person, whose background issues are being adjudicated, is eligible for a Anduril Industries access authorization, and/or is eligible for Sensitive Compartmented Information (SCI) pursuant to Intelligence Community Directive (ICD) 704.
Liaise with other offices and agencies on matters affecting security operations, such as processing verbal and written requests for clearance verifications, handling of other agency sponsored clearances, obtaining reports of investigation and polygraph examination, etc.
Provide timely notification of cancelled investigations to investigative agencies, clearance actions to requesting offices, clearance suspensions, revocations, denials and terminations to authorities as appropriate.
Maintain, retrieve, duplicate, and file data received from the entire Anduril Industries complex in Anduril Industries headquarters personnel security files and administrative review files.
Support the day-to-day headquarters operations related to Automated Data Processing (ADP) databases for the personnel security program, including Anduril Industries Integrated Safeguards and Defense Information Security System (DISS) and Personnel Security Database (SecCon).
Enter data from documents and reports into the appropriate system, ensuring initial input of information, as well as all maintenance/updates, is accurate, current, and complete.
Receive requests for clearance verification by letter or telephone; responding by checking name(s) against master, pending, and termination files; processing written requests for clearance verification received from other government agencies.
Assist in developing operational procedures and management systems to improve data integrity and expire retrieval.
Prepare and disseminate personnel security reports and developing computer templates using standard Microsoft Office software to facilitate electronic transfer operations.
Provide Administrative Review (AR) and Program & Appeal Panel (AP) Support by processing requests received, managing AR case files, initiate AR procedures, ensure AR files are accurate and complete, track all cases.
Support Freedom of Information/Privacy Act (FOI/PA) activities by providing file management, retrieving case files, and other administrative activities.
All other duties as assigned.
REQUIRED QUALIFICATIONS
Bachelor’s degree from an accredited university or college in public administration, criminal justice, security management or related field.
10 years of experience in personnel security or related field.
5-10 years of experience in security investigations programs.
An active DOD Top Secret, with Single Scope Background Investigation (SSBI) or T5 completed within 5 years.
Demonstrated expert knowledge in all phases of a personnel security program with emphasis on the review and analysis of derogatory information as it relates to national security concerns and recent practical experience in administrative review.
Demonstrated the highest level of writing ability with experience in preparation of analytical work products and able to effectively convey, through written and oral communication, complex and sensitive information.
Must be able to obtain and hold a U.S. TS/SCI security clearance.
U.S. Person status is required as this position needs to access export controlled data.
PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS
Master’s degree from an accredited university or college in public administration, criminal justice, security management or related field.
12+ years of experience in personnel security or related field
10+ years of experience in security investigations program
Anduril is an equal-opportunity employer, and we encourage candidates from all backgrounds to apply. If you are someone passionate to work on problems that matter, we’d love to hear from you!",767,Washington
18,International Relations Specialist,US Bureau of International Labor Affairs,"Washington, DC","$60,129 - $113,362 a year","Duties
Summary
This position is located in the Department of Labor, Bureau of International Labor Affairs (ILAB), Office of Child Labor, Forced Labor, and Human Trafficking (OCFT), Technical Assistance and Cooperation Unit, Africa Division. ILAB leads DOL's efforts to ensure that workers around the world are treated fairly and are able to share in the benefits of the global economy.
This position inside the bargaining unit.
Additional selections may be made from this announcement.

Responsibilities
ILAB's mission is to improve global working conditions, raise living standards, protect workers' ability to exercise their rights, and address the workplace exploitation of children and other vulnerable populations.

Major duties for this position include but are not limited to the following:

Executes job duties in support of senior team members and the Office mission while providing research and analyses of child labor, forced labor, and human trafficking issues for assigned countries for the purpose of contributing to Congressionally-mandated and Executive Order reports, engaging with foreign governments or other U.S. government officials, designing technical assistance programs, or related to other strategic interests of ILAB, or as part of analysis of trends and lessons learned that inform program evaluation, project survey, and project design activities.
Drafts and provides written feedback on documents, as assigned, and regularly prepares written communication for and on behalf of senior ILAB and DOL staff on international child and forced labor issues.
Demonstrates an intermediate ability to critically analyze Office issues and initiatives through study and monitoring of relevant legislation; pertinent ILO and other international organizations' standards and decisions; overseas developments, reports, and cables; books and articles; research and evaluation documents and papers; and discussions with foreign and U.S. officials, academic experts, trade union leaders, non-governmental representatives, and business representatives.
Applies a wide range of qualitative and/or quantitative methods to assess and improve program effectiveness.
Participates in the formulation of policy or program recommendations that advance OCFT and ILAB mission, programming, and other priorities in target countries and on a global level. Engages with a range of actors and entities (i.e. ILAB and DOL officials; U.S. or foreign government agencies; international organizations, civil society groups, and/or business representatives) to develop and/or strengthen OCFT and ILAB strategic relationships and information exchanges.
Monitors labor developments in countries of importance to the U.S. and advises the Director, Deputy Director, Deputy Undersecretary, other DOL professional staff, ambassadors, labor attaches or others with related responsibility, either orally or in writing, on policy, key developments, and results regarding Office issues and programs.
Coordinates policy positions and work products within OCFT and across ILAB offices, other DOL agencies, and outside stakeholders with the aim of advancing OCFT and ILAB mission regarding research, technical assistance and policy engagement.
Plans, develops, oversees, implements and provides technical support for monitoring and evaluation and audit activities, and closes out technical assistance/cooperation initiatives; coordinates ILAB's contracts, grants, and cooperative agreements for technical assistance projects; and uses qualitative and/or quantitative methods to measure results and assess and improve program effectiveness and/or projects or systems.

Travel Required
Occasional travel - Travel is up to 7% per year.
Supervisory status
No
Promotion Potential
13 - There is no obligation to provide future promotions if you are selected. Promotions are dependent on your ability to perform the duties at a higher level, meet all the performance requirements, and supervisor’s recommendation to the next grade.
Job family (Series)
0131 International Relations
Requirements

Requirements
Conditions of Employment
Candidate required to obtain the necessary security/investigation level.
Appointment to this position may require a background investigation.
Subject to pre-employment and random drug tests.
Requires a probationary period if the requirement has not been met.
Must be at least 16 years old and a U.S. Citizen.
Selective Placement Factor- Ability to read French including standard newspaper items addressed to the general reader, routine correspondence, reports, and technical materials related to the duties of the position.

Applicants must meet time-in-grade, time-after-competitive-appointment and qualifications requirements within 30 calendar days after the closing date of the vacancy to be eligible for consideration for selection.

Federal Employees Please Note: Your SF-50 must include enough information to be able to determine that time-in-grade requirements have been met and reflects your position title, pay plan/series/grade, tenure and the type of appointment (i.e. competitive/excepted). In some cases you may need to submit more than one SF-50.

Reference the ""Required Documents"" section for additional requirements.
Qualifications
IN DESCRIBING YOUR EXPERIENCE, PLEASE BE CLEAR AND SPECIFIC. WE WILL NOT MAKE ASSUMPTIONS REGARDING YOUR EXPERIENCE.
Basic Requirements:

Degree: major or equivalent, or a combination of courses totaling at least 24 semester hours in international law and international relations, political science, economics, history, sociology, geography, social or cultural anthropology, law, statistics, or in the humanities; or 12 semester hours in one of the above disciplines and 12 semester hours in statistics/quantitative methods.

OR

Combination of education and experience: courses equivalent to a major, or a combination of related courses totaling at least 24 semester hours, in one or more of the social sciences, or in the humanities, as shown in A above, plus appropriate experience or additional education.

OR

Experience: four years of appropriate experience in one or more of the fields listed above in work associated with international organizations, problems, or other aspects of foreign affairs.

In addition to the basic requirements of this position, applicants must also possess 52 weeks of specialized experience equivalent to at least the next lower grade level in the Federal Service.

For the GS-09:

To qualify for the GS-09 grade level, applicants must have 52 weeks of specialized experience at or equivalent to the GS-07 grade level or pay band in the Federal Service or equivalent experience in the private or public sector performing work related to International Relations, with knowledge of, and skill in applying, fundamental methods, principles, and practices relevant to work in the area of International Relations, and standardized knowledge of analytical, and evaluative methods and techniques sufficient to research and write on topics relevant to international development of international labor issues in an academic or work setting.

OR

2 years of progressively higher level graduate education leading to a master's degree or master's or equivalent graduate degree(related to the position to be filled.)

OR

Combination of education and experience.

For the GS-11:

To qualify for the GS-11 grade level, applicants must have 52 weeks of specialized experience at or equivalent to the GS-09 grade level or pay band in the Federal Service or equivalent experience in the private or public sector performing work related to International Relations, applying a range of analytical and evaluative techniques and methods with knowledge of U.S. foreign policy and of economic, social, cultural, and political factors in countries in Sub-Saharan Africa, relevant to efforts to assist in raising working conditions and improving the quality of life for its citizens; or experience assisting in the development or oversight of technical assistance projects on issues related to vulnerable populations in Sub-Saharan Africa. Examples of specialized experience are as follows: 1) Participating in drafting and/or providing written feedback on documents on issues relevant to issues of international child labor, forced labor, and/or human trafficking; 2) Developing and/or overseeing technical assistance projects to address issues related to reducing child labor, forced labor, and/or human trafficking; or 3) Supporting efforts related to the formulation of U.S. foreign policy on international labor issues.

OR

3 years of progressively higher level graduate education leading to a Ph.D. degree or Ph.D. or equivalent doctoral degree (related to the position to be filled.)

OR

Combination of education and experience.

For the GS-12

To qualify for the GS-12 grade level, applicants must have 52 weeks of specialized experience at or equivalent to the GS-11 grade level or pay band in the Federal Service or equivalent experience in the private or public sector performing International Relations Specialist work, applying a full range of analytical and evaluative techniques and methods with extensive knowledge of U.S. foreign policy and of economic, social, cultural, and political factors in one or more countries in Sub-Saharan Africa, relevant to efforts to develop and implement policies in support of raising the working conditions and improving the quality of life for its citizens. Experience with conducting research, studies, or contributing to program or foreign policy initiatives on issues relevant to the reduction of child labor, forced labor, and/or human trafficking. In addition, experience with U.S. policy on international labor issues. Examples of specialized experience are as follows: 1) Applying a range of qualitative and/or quantitative methods to assess and improve program effectiveness. 2) Developing and/or overseeing technical assistance projects to address issues related to reducing child labor, forced labor, and/or human trafficking in countries in Sub-Saharan Africa; or 3) Contributing to the formulation of U.S. foreign policy on labor issues in countries in Sub-Saharan Africa.
Education
Any applicant falsely claiming an academic degree from an accredited school will be subject to actions ranging from disqualification from federal employment to removal from federal service.

If your education was completed at a foreign college or university, you must show comparability to education received in accredited educational institutions in the United States and comparability to applicable minimum course work requirements for this position. Click Evaluation of Foreign Education for more information.
Additional information
DOL seeks to attract and retain a high performing and diverse workforce in which employees’ differences are respected and valued to better meet the varying needs of the diverse customers we serve. DOL fosters a diverse and inclusive work environment that promotes collaboration, flexibility and fairness so that all individuals are able to participate and contribute to their full potential.

Refer to these links for more information: GENERAL INFORMATION, ADDITIONAL DOCUMENTATION, FORMER FEDERAL EMPLOYEES


How You Will Be Evaluated
You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications above.
Evaluation Factors (Competencies) - All qualified applicants will be evaluated on the following key competencies:

Research, Analysis, and Written Communication - Effectively applies knowledge of quantitative and qualitative research methods to conduct systematic and objective inquiry and analysis. Writes in a clear, concise, organized, and convincing manner for the intended audience.

Policy Development and Coordination - Formulates effective strategies to engage with assigned countries based on DOL and US priorities and interests and examines policy issues with a long-term perspective. Determines objectives and sets priorities; anticipates potential threats or opportunities.

Interagency Coordination - Effectively coordinates between elements of the Department, US Government agencies, nongovernmental organizations, and regional and international organizations for the purpose of accomplishing an objective.

Technical Assistance - Knowledge of requirements, practices, and procedures for soliciting, receiving, reviewing, and processing proposals, and awarding and administering grants and agreements.

The information you provide may be verified by a review of your work experience and/or education, by checking references, and through other means (ex. interview). Your evaluation may also include a review by an HR Specialist or panel and may include other assessment tools (ex. interview, structured interview, written test, work sample, etc.). The examining Office of Human Resources (OHR) makes the final determination concerning applicant ratings. Your resume MUST provide sufficient information to substantiate your vacancy question responses. If not, the OHR may amend your responses to more accurately reflect the level of competency indicated by the content of your resume.

Click here for Evaluation details.

INFORMATION FOR CTAP[/ICTAP] ELIGIBLE(S) ONLY: If you are eligible for special priority selection under CTAP [or ICTAP], you must be well-qualified for the position to receive consideration. ICTAP/CTAP eligible(s) will be considered ""well-qualified"" if they attain at least a rating score of 85 in a numerical rating scheme. Be sure to review DOL Account Eligibility Questions #24 to reflect that you are applying as an ICTAP or CTAP eligible and submit supporting documentation.

To preview questions please click here.

Background checks and security clearance
Security clearance
Secret
Drug test required
Yes
Position sensitivity and risk
Noncritical-Sensitive (NCS)/Moderate Risk
Trust determination process
National security
Required Documents

Required Documents
The following documents must be submitted by 11:59 p.m. (ET) on the vacancy closing date. Warning: If you submit a document using the same document title, the 2nd submission will OVERWRITE the 1st submission. Also, do not upload password-protected documents.

The following documents are required from all applicants (PLEASE READ CAREFULLY):

ARE YOU A CURRENT OR FORMER FEDERAL EMPLOYEE? If applying as a status candidate with current or former Federal Service, please provide a copy of your last or most recent SF-50, ""Notification of Personnel Action” which shows your appointment eligibility for the position for which you are applying. Your SF-50 must identify the highest grade you held on a permanent basis, Pay Plan/Pay Schedule, Series, and Grade/Pay Band, and career status. Multiple SF-50 may be submitted to demonstrate your highest previous rate and eligibility.
WARNING: An award SF-50 (ex. cash or time off award) may not indicate grade, step, and competitive status. For current DOL employees, an award SF-50 DOES NOT indicate grade and step.

- Resumes are required - provide a resume either by creating one in USAJOBS or uploading one from your computer and USAJOBS profile. To receive full consideration for relevant and specialized experience, please list the month, year, and the number of work hours worked for the experience listed on your resume. We also suggest that you preview the vacancy questions, and confirm that your resume supports your question responses.
Most recent performance appraisal/evaluation signed and dated within 18 months is requested by the agency, but will not disqualify candidates if not submitted. If not submitted during the application process, one may/will be requested at the time of the interview if the opportunity is extended. Applies to current and former Federal employees.

The following documents are required if applicable:

- Displaced Employee Placement Documents - Only required if requesting priority consideration under ICTAP/CTAP Eligibility.

- DD-214 - verifying military service, eligibility for consideration under the Veterans Employment Opportunity Act (VEOA), and showing the character of discharge (ex. Member Copy 4 and 2 are acceptable vs. Copy 1 which is not acceptable to adjudicate veteran's preference)

- Special/Non-Competitive Appointing Authority Documents - Applicants who are eligible for consideration, and wish to be considered, under one of the following non-competitive hiring authorities must submit appropriate documentation (click on the links below to see the documentation requirements): (a) Persons with Severe Disabilities (SCHEDULE A) (b) 30% or More Compensable Disabled Veterans (DAV) (c) Former Peace Corps Volunteers (PCV) OR AmeriCorps VISTA OR Current/Former Peace Corps Employees (PCE) (d) Military Spouses (MISP)
Land Management Eligible(s): a copy of your most recent Notification of Personnel Action (SF-50 or equivalent) proving your eligibility for appointment under the Land Management Workforce Flexibility Act. This service must have been performed in the competitive service, under a time-limited appointment in a Land Management Agency, as defined by P.L. 114-328. For more information, click here.
Cover Letters are not mandatory and will not be used to verify experience, but may be submitted.

Applicants selected for employment who are not current DOL employees will be required to provide proof of citizenship, and the E-Verify system will be used to confirm the employment eligibility of all new hires.

Unofficial Transcript(s) (in English) - If you are using education as a basis for qualifying for this position, you must submit all applicable academic transcripts demonstrating that you meet the qualifying educational requirements (ex. BA/BS, MA, JD, Ph.D., etc.). If specific coursework is required to qualify, you must supply an unofficial transcript from each academic institution in which the required courses were taken in order to receive credit.

You may upload your unofficial transcript(s) as one document (3 MB size limit). If over 3 MB, please submit via fax feature.

 NOTE: The OFFICIAL Transcript(s) MUST BE RECEIVED, if you are selected, and prior to receiving the firm offer with a start date.

Reference the “Education Section” for College Transcript and Evaluation of Foreign Education.
If you are relying on your education to meet qualification requirements:
Education must be accredited by an accrediting institution recognized by the U.S. Department of Education in order for it to be credited towards qualifications. Therefore, provide only the attendance and/or degrees from schools accredited by accrediting institutions recognized by the U.S. Department of Education.
Failure to provide all of the required information as stated in this vacancy announcement may result in an ineligible rating or may affect the overall rating.
Benefits

Benefits
A career with the U.S. Government provides employees with a comprehensive benefits package. As a federal employee, you and your family will have access to a range of benefits that are designed to make your federal career very rewarding. Opens in a new windowLearn more about federal benefits.
Review our benefits
Eligibility for benefits depends on the type of position you hold and whether your position is full-time, part-time, or intermittent. Contact the hiring agency for more information on the specific benefits offered.
Help
This job is open to
Individuals with disabilities
Federal employees - Competitive service
Current or former competitive service federal employees.
Career transition (CTAP, ICTAP, RPL)
Federal employees who meet the definition of a ""surplus"" or ""displaced"" employee.
Land & base management
Certain current or former term or temporary federal employees of a land or base management agency.
Military spouses
Peace Corps & AmeriCorps Vista
Veterans
Clarification from the agency
Current Federal employees with competitive status; Former Federal employees with reinstatement eligibility; ICTAP/CTAP eligibles in the local commuting area; VEOA eligibles; Military Spouse eligibles; Land Management Act eligibles; Individuals with Disabilities (Schedule A); Peace Corps & AmeriCorps VISTA eligibles. Also advertised as job #DE-21-PHIL-ILAB-0049 for non-status applicants; to be considered for each, apply to BOTH jobs.",767,Washington
19,Senior Information Technology Specialist - Network Engineer,US Supreme Court of the United States,"Washington, DC","$103,690 - $134,798 a year","Duties
Summary
This is a full-time position with the Office of Information Technology at the Supreme Court of the United States in Washington, D.C.

Closing Date: Monday, June 21, 2021 11:59 PM EST
Responsibilities
This is a full-time position. The Office of Information Technology (OIT) provides the development, operation, maintenance, and support of Information Systems for the Supreme Court of the United States. The Office of Information Technology (OIT) staff operates and administers distributed network architectures that support a fully virtualized environment of end user workstations and servers, geographically diverse data centers, website administration using a virtual machine infrastructure linked with Content Delivery Network (CDN) solution, and administers several complex Local Area Networks which connects these resources.

The incumbent is responsible for design, implementation, day to day operations and optimization of the Courts Network Infrastructure (NI) both at the Court and various remote sites. The Network Infrastructure (NI) includes copper and fiber cable plant, routers, switches, access points, wireless controllers, firewalls, hardware load balancers, circuits, Network Management Systems (NMS), and Content Delivery Networks (CDN).


The incumbent will perform technical analysis and administration of the Network Infrastructure (NI) include the following: security patching, periodic maintenance, ""break-fix"" actions, troubleshooting, configuring, testing, installing cabling as needed, fault isolation, preventative maintenance, install hardware/software/firmware upgrades, problem solving, equipment inventory, and all other aspects of technical support. The incumbent is expected to quickly react to and resolve problems that may impact the critical functions of the Court.
Travel Required
Occasional travel - You may be expected to travel for this position.
Supervisory status
No
Promotion Potential
14
Job family (Series)
2210 Information Technology Management
Requirements

Requirements
Conditions of Employment
U.S. Citizenship
Meet Experience Requirements (see Qualifications)
Employment is subject to successful completion of a security background check.
If you are a male applicant born after December 31, 1959, you must certify that you have registered with the Selective Service System, or are exempt from having to do so under the Selective Service Law. See: www.sss.gov
Qualifications
Minimum of seven years Network Infrastructure (NI) experience in the following categories:

Performing analysis and fault isolation functions, with hands-on working-level knowledge of Firewalls, VPN Appliances, Hardware Load Balancers, Wireless Networks, Routers and Switch equipment and Security Appliances.

Expert level working knowledge of TCP/IP, Ethernet, Vlans, Routing Protocols (OSPF/BGP), Network Automation, Network Security, Network Management Systems, and IP Traffic Capturing Hardware/Software required.

Candidate must be able to demonstrate recent experience performing hardware set-up and installation as well as documenting installation and configuration changes.

Prepare detailed project plans, evaluate and implement technology enhancements, and diagnosing technical faults in a complex Network Infrastructure (NI).

Highly Desirable Certifications: Professional Level Firewall certification, CCNP (Cisco Certified Network Professional), F5 CTS-301 (F5-Certified Technical Specialist focus in BIG-IP LTM).

Experience with Unified Communications and VoIP technologies is desirable.

Strong interpersonal communication skills, ability to communicate and understand technical information, comprehend technical instructions, evaluate problems, and assist users; ability to remain calm and professional in high stress environment when confronted with challenging situations, short timeframes, or other pressing and urgent requests.

As a condition of continued employment, the candidate must be able to acquire and retain a Top Secret (TS) clearance.
Education
College degree in the field of engineering, computer science, or a related field preferred; however a degree can be substituted for years of experience or technical training provided by previous employer.
Additional information
Working for the Supreme Court of the United States offers a comprehensive benefits package that includes, in part, paid vacation, sick leave, holidays, life insurance, health benefits, and participation in the Federal Employees Retirement System. Additional benefits include flexible spending accounts, long-term care insurance, and the SmartBenefits transit subsidy.

How You Will Be Evaluated
You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications above.
We will review and assess your application package in comparison with the posted qualifications for the position.

Background checks and security clearance
Security clearance
Not Required
Drug test required
No
Required Documents

Required Documents
The following documents are required:

OF-306 (http://www.opm.gov/forms/pdf_fill/of0306.pdf)
A resume
A cover letter

Benefits

Benefits
Review our benefits
Help
This job is open to
The public
U.S. citizens, nationals or those who owe allegiance to the U.S.
Clarification from the agency
United States Citizens Only",767,Washington
20,Senior Intelligence Liaison Officer (SILO)/Security Specialist III,"Ruchman and Associates, INC","Washington, DC",None,"Ruchman and Associates, Inc. is seeking Senior Intelligence Liaison Officer (SILO)/Security Specialist III for contract support of the United States Marshals Service (USMS), Judicial Security Division (JSD). The SILO will assist the USMS management and other staff members in all office activities and operations as assigned. The individual will be assigned to the National Joint Terrorism Task Force (NJTTF) to provide support and serve as an intermediary to the Judicial Security Division (JSD) Office of Protective Intelligence (OPI) and to other USMS offices as appropriate. The individual will interact with representatives of other law enforcement and intelligence agencies, as well as the senior leadership of the NJTTF. The individual will review available intelligence information on a daily basis and identify intelligence that could potentially impact the USMS. They will then further query the source agency of this intelligence, analyze it as to the potential threat it poses to persons or property protected by the USMS, prepare reports, make recommendations to mitigate the potential threat, and pass this information to OPI. In addition the individual will serve as a conduit for information or requests for information from the USMS, through OPI, to NJTTF components or agencies with the goal of mitigating threats. The individual will be physically located at the NJTTF in the operational section. As such, they will have interaction in NJTTF investigations that impact the USMS and its protective responsibilities. Through the course of this investigative interaction, they may conduct some operational intelligence and investigative functions with other NJTTF counterparts with permission of the USMS.
Responsibilities:
Administer security projects nationwide.
Assist with and/or perform technical surveys, system specifications, and recommend measures to ensure safe proceedings in judiciary facilities and to reduce the prospect of security risks;
Identify security risks, analyze and manage those risks, and specify system requirements and procedural measures to ensure a safe working environment at USMS and Judicial facilities;
Conduct evaluations of security designs;
Conduct inspections and compare security equipment designs to established standards;
Ensure vehicle barriers, X-ray machines, walk-through metal detectors, and other technical security systems are fully operational;
Evaluate a wide variety of equipment, systems, and products for security vulnerabilities and conduct operational testing of security systems;
Perform extensive travel throughout the U.S. and its territories to service USMS facilities;
Use CAD or equivalent software to create detailed 2D or 3D designs for complex projects Collaborate with others to establish timelines and budgets, as well as solve problems
Help guide equipment and material logistics – shipping, receiving, Bill-of-Materials (BOM) preparation;
Use computer networking to monitor equipment and share information and data;
Administer equipment inventory – tracking, spare parts, ordering;
Organize workshops, shop tools, equipment, parts, and supplies;
Test new-generation technical security equipment;
Train security personnel as required; and Produce a variety of written documents including well-crafted memoranda, trip reports, email communications, security surveys or technical reports detailing specific services planned or performed

Requirements:
Required to maintain status as a Special Deputy United States Marshal and carry a USMS issued firearm.
Must be able to pass USMS facilty and NJTTF facility clearance requirements, and must have Active Clearance.
A BA/BS Degree in a Criminal Justice related field or a BA/BS in an unrelated field and two years of law enforcement intelligence experience. A successful candidate will likely have three to five years of law enforcement intelligence experience.
Knowledge of the intelligence process and the following disciplines: Protective Investigations, Judicial Security practices and procedures, knowledge of the scope and limitations of USMS protective responsibilities, Fugitive Investigations, Justice Prisoner and Alien Transport System (JPATS), USMS Special Operations Group responsibilities, knowledge of USMS Witness Security practices, knowledge of prisoner detention practices and requirements, USMS District Operations, Joint Terrorism Task Force and National Joint Terrorism Task Force responsibilities.
Ability to apply inductive, deductive, and conductive reasoning.
Ability to analyze and evaluate raw data in order to produce actionable intelligence and formal documents.
Ability to communicate factual information and ideas in English, clearly and concisely, both orally and in writing, often under pressure and tight deadlines.
Time management, organization and prioritization skills.
Ability to meet with and deal effectively with people.
Ability to build and maintain relationships with internal employees as well as outside sources.
Attention to detail.
Communication skills.
Exhibit a high level of confidentiality.
Ability to quickly and effectively adapt to change.
Ability to qualify with a USMS approved duty weapon on a USMS approved course of fire on a semiannual basis, upon receiving proper instruction and guidance.
Proficient in the use of the National Crime Information Center, the National Law Enforcement Teletype System, DHS Online, SIPRNET, JWICS, the Homeland Security Data Network and have familiarity with the USMS Justice Detainee Information System.
Knowledge of Microsoft Windows and Microsoft Office Suite to include Word,
Outlook, Excel, and PowerPoint.",767,Washington
21,IT Specialist (Drupal),Government of the District of Columbia,"Washington, DC 20001 (Downtown area)","$87,703 - $113,002 a year","DC Public Library Office of Information Technology supports a large, multi-site networked environment of wired and wireless staff and public workstations connected to cloud-hosted servers and applications within and outside the District of Columbia.
Under the guidance of the Director of Information Technology, the IT Specialist (Drupal) serves as the lead developer for major library application platforms, such as the Library’s RDBMS, internet and intranet CMS, mobile app, and other major application platforms. The incumbent will work closely with Public Services and Business Operations Administrators to ensure planning, implementation, and coordination of Library services and applications.
Duties and Responsibilities
Provides guidance in the design, documentation, development, modification, testing, installation, implementation, and support of new or existing applications software
Assesses the feasibility of adopting new software design technologies within the current systems environment. Ensures that all applications, systems, software, and equipment used in production have been set to conform with all security guidelines and regulations,.
Lead, coordinate, and oversee the effective delivery of library services and applications by overseeing the design, installation, maintenance, documentation, security, upgrading, and troubleshooting of library application platforms, servers, and databases.
Responsible for development and maintenance of interfaces between application platforms, applications, and other systems; integration of proprietary, custom, and COTS applications using API
Provide functional support and training for all application modules; and the creation of custom reports.
Administer, configure, and optimize applications and partner products, add-ons, and extensions. Generate reports and statistics. Ensure database integrity and security.
 Contribute to the enhancement of technology services and operations by planning, coordinating, and implementing application projects, maintenance, and updates.
Works with Library staff to resolve functionality issues and improve workflow through better utilization of application platforms.
Respond/evaluate user needs by training technical and library staff and recommending appropriate actions.
Provide written and verbal communications to staff, vendors, contractors, and the public.
 Assist with technical planning, budgeting, and priority management.
Education and Experience
Bachelor’s degree in Engineering, Information Science, Information Systems, Information Technology, Computer Science, or related field required plus a minimum of five (5) years of IT experience as a technical resource that demonstrates knowledge of software design principles, methods, approaches, and procedures to design, develop, optimize and integrate system components or a minimum of one (1) year of specialized experience at the lower grade level. Library experience is desired. In addition, the following is required:
Knowledge of design, configuration, administration, management, security, operation, and documentation of RDBMS. Knowledge of cataloging principles, including MARC and RDA, is desired.
Demonstrated understanding of client/server environment, and experience with software applications needed to administer application environments. This may include Microsoft Windows Server, UNIX/Linux, Oracle, SQL Server, XML, etc.
Mastery of standard web browser display and application technologies (HTML, XML, CSS, JavaScript, CGI, XSLT), including usability, accessibility and cross-browser compatibility issues.
Ability to communicate effectively with staff, the public, vendors, and technical personnel, both verbally and in writing; to evaluate and communicate technical information; and ability to train technical and library staff as needed.
Knowledge of principles purchasing and budgeting, contractor and vendor relations, and project management
Ability to evaluate complex information and emerging issues in the use of advanced technology, communications and user needs.
Residency Requirement
A person applying for a position in the Career Service, Educational Service, Management Supervisory Service, an attorney position in the Legal Service (series 905) other than the Senior Executive Attorney Service (SEAS), or an attorney position in the Excepted Service (series 950) who is a bona fide District resident AT THE TIME OF APPLICATION for the position, may be awarded a 10-point residency preference over non-District applicants, unless the person declines the preference points. If selected the person shall be required to present no less than 8 proofs of bona fide District residency and maintain such residency for 7 consecutive years from the effective date of the appointment. Failure to maintain bona fide District residency for the 7-year period will result in forfeiture of employment.
General Suitability Screening
This position is subject to general suitability screening; verification of employment history, reference checks and degree/license, as applicable. The appointee to the position may be offered employment contingent upon receipt of a satisfactory general suitability screening.
Employment Benefits
Selectee will be eligible for health and life insurance, annual (vacation) and sick leave and will be covered under the District of Columbia government's retirement plan. However, if selectee was previously employed in the District of Columbia government under an appointment for which he/she was eligible for Civil Service Retirement (CSR), contributions to CSR will resume upon re-employment.
Licenses and Certifications
None
Working Conditions/Environment
The work is performed in an office setting.
Other Significant Factors
Emergency/Essential Designation: This position is designated as Emergency
Collective Bargaining Unit: This position is not the collective bargaining unit.
Duration of Appointment: Career Service Full Time Appointment
Telework: Telework may be granted upon surpervisory approval
Must be eligible to work in the U.S.
Equal Employment Opportunity
The District of Columbia Government is an Equal Opportunity Employer: all qualified candidates will receive consideration without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, sex, age, marital status, personal appearance, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, family responsibilities, matriculation, political affiliation, genetic information, disability. Sexual harassment is a form of sex discrimination, which is also prohibited. In addition, harassment based on any of the above-protected categories is prohibited.
Click here to review additional Employment Disclosure & Information for Applicants.",767,Washington
22,Solutions Architect – Security Specialist,"Amazon Web Services, Inc.","Arlington, VA","$122,300 a year","
Background in any of the following: Security Architecture, Compliance Frameworks, Security Operations, or DevSecOps
Technical Degree (Computer Science, Maths, Engineering or equivalent) and/or relevant tech experience
Fluent English written and verbal communication skills
A passion for technology and for learning

Do you like helping government and education customers architect systems and solve technical problems? Do you have a knack for helping customers to build a deep understanding of new cloud platforms and new application architectures, and the consultative and leadership skills to launch cloud computing projects on trajectories to success? Do you want to be part of the business development team helping to establish Amazon Web Services as a leading technology platform?
As a Public Sector Specialist Security Specialist Solution Architect within Amazon Web Services public sector business development, you will have the opportunity to shape and deliver on a strategy to build mind share and broad usage of AWS's utility computing services within public sector organizations, as well as the larger public sector partner ecosystem, the growth and training of which will be one of your main objectives. You would be a member of a dynamic team bringing the latest in disruptive, cutting-edge cloud security technologies to bear on the difficult IT problems facing national, regional, and local governments, as well as educational institutions and NGOs.

As a part of the business development and sales team within the larger Worldwide Public Sector organization based near Washington DC, you will help remove security blockers and accelerate the adoption of AWS as the leading cloud technology platform in the public sector worldwide. You will participate in the creation and sharing of security best practices, technical content and new reference architectures (e.g. white papers, code samples, blog posts) and evangelize and educate partners and customers about AWS security capabilities and technology (e.g. through workshops, user groups, meetups, public speaking, online videos, or conferences).

Candidates have a mix of communication, presentation and technical skills, and will have the ability to engage with customers at different levels in the organization, from executive to developer. Previous experience with AWS is desired but not required, provided you have experience building large scale solutions. You will get the opportunity to work directly with senior engineers within AWS service teams influencing their roadmaps and driving innovation, as well as with customers and partners.

Roles and responsibilities

Work with AWS customers to convey cloud computing security, compliance, and risk management best practices
Work with other teams within AWS to drive workload adoption
Develop technical content, such as white papers and reference architectures, that can be used by our customers to assist them in deploying secure and compliant cloud-based solutions
Provide mentorship across AWS sales and solutions architecture teams regarding security and compliance to build skills in the field
Support go-to-market planning for security services
Represent AWS security services and solutions at trade events by delivering presentations and workshops
Be the customers trusted advisor, helping them learn and use AWS security services such as Amazon Identity and Access Management (IAM), Amazon GuardDuty, AWS Security Hub, Amazon Macie, AWS Key Management System, AWS CloudHSM, AWS Organizations, AWS Artifact, AWS WAF, and others
Serve as a key member of the business development and account management team in helping to ensure customer success in securely building and migrating applications, software and services on the AWS platform

Our team is dedicated to supporting new members. We have a broad mix of experience levels and tenures, and we’re building an environment that celebrates knowledge sharing and mentorship. Our senior members enjoy one-on-one mentoring and thorough, but kind, code reviews. We care about your career growth and strive to assign projects based on what will help each team member develop into a better-rounded engineer and enable them to take on more complex tasks in the future.

Here at AWS, we embrace our differences. We are committed to furthering our culture of inclusion. We have ten employee-led affinity groups, reaching 40,000 employees in over 190 chapters globally. We have innovative benefit offerings, and we host annual and ongoing learning experiences, including our Conversations on Race and Ethnicity (CORE) and AmazeCon (gender diversity) conferences. Amazon’s culture of inclusion is reinforced within our 14 Leadership Principles, which remind team members to seek diverse perspectives, learn and be curious, and earn trust.

Our team also puts a high value on work-life balance. Striking a healthy balance between your personal and professional life is crucial to your happiness and success here, which is why we aren’t focused on how many hours you spend at work or online. Instead, we’re happy to offer a flexible schedule so you can have a more productive and well-balanced life—both in and outside of work.


Experience designing, building, or operating large scale IT security systems - either on premises or in the cloud
Working knowledge of cloud native security architectures and best practices
Knowledge of a modern programming language (Python, JavaScript, Go, .Net, Rust, Java, etc.) and/or scripting, Infrastructure as Code etc.
In-depth working knowledge in technology domain such as data protection, threat detection, edge security, and compliance
Experience working in a customer-facing role or a role which involved public speaking
AWS certification (e.g. AWS Solutions Architect Associate, Security Speciality or Professional) or other industry certification (e.g. CISSP, CCSP, etc.)
A background working in a regulated industry such as financial services, healthcare or defense
Managing a certification or accreditation (PCI-DSS, ISO 27001, C5, etc.)
Track record of implementing AWS services in a variety of business environments such as large enterprises and start-ups

AWS Certifications, e.g. AWS Certified Solutions Architect - Associate, AWS Solutions Architect - Professional
Amazon is committed to a diverse and inclusive workplace. Amazon is an equal opportunity employer and does not discriminate on the basis of race, national origin, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, protected veteran status, disability, age, or other legally protected status. For individuals with disabilities who would like to request an accommodation, please visit https://www.amazon.jobs/en/disability/us.

San Francisco, CA: Pursuant to the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance, we will consider for employment qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records.
Los Angeles, CA: Pursuant to the Los Angeles Fair Chance Ordinance, we will consider for employment qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records.
For employees based in Colorado, this position starts at $122,300/yr. A sign-on bonus and restricted stock units may be provided as part of the compensation package, in addition to a range of medical, financial, and/or other benefits, dependent on the position offered. For more information regarding Amazon benefits, please visit https://www.amazon.jobs/en/benefits. Applicants should apply via Amazon’s internal or external careers site.",767,Washington
23,Public Affairs Specialist (Digital Media),US Office of Justice Programs,"Washington, DC","$72,750 - $113,362 a year","Duties
Summary
Join our team! The Office of Justice Programs (OJP), Office of Communications (OCOM), is in search of a Public Affairs Specialist to provide their digital media expertise in support of OJP's mission. You will oversee social media plans and prepare digital media content for the general public, media outlets, and Congress, helping OJP's national role in preventing and reducing crime, assisting victims, and enhancing the rule of law through scientific research and grant/cooperative partnerships.

Responsibilities
(The duties described reflect the full performance level of this position)
Serves as an advisor to agency management on public affairs and digital media activities/programs. Makes recommendations regarding the dissemination of information to correct misperceptions and enhance public understanding of OJP's mission. Plans and evaluates OJP's public affairs programs related to digital media content and dissemination, including: victim service program funding, juvenile justice efforts, sex offender management, and vital research and data. Monitors digital media trends, tracks data, and provides information on ways for OJP to enhance its digital media presence. Applies knowledge of computer-based information systems, internet applications, and technologies to plan, design, and evaluate web sites and pages.
Develops and coordinates organizational messages and digital media content with the appropriate team members, management, component communication liaisons, external stakeholders, and agency leadership to ensure quality, consistency and message alignment while protecting the reputation and public perception of the Department of Justice. Makes recommendations to senior leaders on web-based strategies and tactics to inform the general public and Congress concerning OJP's mission, accomplishments, and needs.
Manages, plans, and produces digital media content, such as social media posts, photographs, and graphics to enhance website and social media engagement. Reviews and edits digital media to ensure content, grammar, and/or punctuation follow prescribed editorial style and formatting guidelines for the appropriate digital platform. Uses analogies, visuals, and other techniques to tailor information to specific audiences.
Establishes and maintains effective working relationships with national and international media representatives and stakeholder communication professionals. Researches audience reactions and experience, and information needs, represents the voices of diverse audiences and communities, reports on user trends and recommends new communication features and improvements. Handles queries from the news media, other government agencies, community organizations and the public about OJP activities that could significantly affect public view of OJP, or prompt Congressional action.
Travel Required
Occasional travel - Travel may be required up to 25%
Supervisory status
No
Promotion Potential
13
Job family (Series)
1035 Public Affairs
Requirements

Requirements
Conditions of Employment
U.S. Citizenship required.
Subject to background/suitability investigation/determination.
Submit all required documents and Online Assessment Questionnaire.
Federal payments are required to be made by Direct Deposit.
Requires registration for the Selective Service. Visit www.sss.gov.
Pre-employment drug testing required.
1-year probationary period may be required.
Performs other duties as assigned.
Qualifications
MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS

To Qualify for the GS-11 Level, you must meet option A, B, or C, listed below, by the closing date of the announcement:

A. Education: Ph.D. or equivalent doctoral degree OR 3 full years of progressively higher level graduate education leading to such a degree OR LL.M., if related. Education must demonstrate the knowledge, skills, and abilities to do the work.

B. Specialized Experience: Experience that equipped the applicant with the particular knowledge, skills, and abilities to perform successfully the duties of the position, and that is typically in or related to the work of the position to be filled. To be creditable, specialized experience must have been equivalent to at least the GS-09 level in the federal service.

Examples of specialized experience for the GS-11 position include:
(1) Writing and developing blog posts, newsletters, reports, collateral materials, articles, and web content;
(2) Contributing to digital media communication plans using established approaches and techniques known to be successful for the intended audience; AND/OR
(3) Developing social media sites to support an organization's web presence and platform (e.g. Facebook, Twitter, LinkedIn, YouTube).

C. Combination of Education and Experience: Combinations of successfully completed graduate-level education and experience as identified in items A and B above may be used to meet total qualification requirements for the GS-11.

To Qualify for the GS-12 Level, you must meet the specialized experience for the position by the closing date of the announcement. Specialized experience is experience which equipped the applicant with the particular knowledge, skills, and abilities to perform successfully the duties of the position, and that is typically in or related to the work of the position to be filled. To be creditable, specialized experience must have been equivalent to at least the GS-11 level in the federal service.

Examples of specialized experience for the GS-12 level include:
(1) Independently producing and disseminating a range of public-facing digital media products for an organization, such as text, audio, video, and graphics;
(2) Planning and evaluating an organization's public affairs and/or digital media program strategies, in order to ensure information enhances the public's understanding of a highly visible and/or potentially controversial topics; AND/OR
(3) Using social media tools to include social networking sites, video sharing sites, blogs, and wikis to promote a strong web presence for the organization, including utilizing video, audio, and digital imagery to support communications.

Education cannot be substituted for experience to qualify for the GS-12 level for this position.

TECHNICAL QUALIFICATIONS (GS-11 and GS-12):

Applicants who meet the minimum qualifications as described above will be further evaluated based upon the following technical qualifications:

(1) Ability to communicate in writing.
(2) Knowledge of communication and public affairs principles, methods, and techniques.
(3) Ability to develop and disseminate official information for a wide variety of audiences.
(4) Ability to plan and execute work.
(5) Ability to provide digital media management analysis, advice, and assistance.
(6) Ability to communicate effectively other than in writing.
(7) Knowledge of social media and web site principles and evaluation techniques.


Additional information on the qualification requirements is outlined in the OPM Qualification Standards Handbook of General Schedule Positions and is available at OPM's website: https://www.opm.gov/qualifications/standards/indexes/num-ndx.asp
All qualification requirements must be met by the closing date of this announcement.
Click here to see the full Qualifications Statement.
Education
Education must be accredited by an accrediting institution recognized by the U.S. Department of Education in order for it to be credited towards qualifications (particularly positions with a positive education requirement.) Therefore, applicants must report only attendance and/or degrees from schools accredited by accrediting institutions recognized by the U.S. Department of Education. Applicants can verify accreditation at the following website: http://www.ed.gov/admins/finaid/accred/index.html. All education claimed by applicants will be verified by the appointing agency accordingly.
Additional information
This position is included in the bargaining unit.
TIME-IN-GRADE REQUIREMENT: Status applicants for promotion must have 52 weeks of service at the next lower grade by the closing date.
This vacancy announcement may be used to fill additional vacancies.
This position may be eligible for telework per agency policy.
OJP offers opportunities for flexible work schedules.


How You Will Be Evaluated
You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications above.
You will be considered under all categories for which you are eligible.

For All U.S. Citizens: Your application will be evaluated and rated under DOJ's Category Rating and Selection Procedures. Your resume and supporting documentation will be used to determine whether you meet the job qualifications listed on this announcement. If you are basically qualified for this job, your resume and supporting documentation will be compared to your responses on the online assessment questionnaire. If you rate yourself higher than is supported by your application materials, your responses may be adjusted and/or you may be excluded from consideration for this job. Your application will then be placed in one of three categories: Best Qualified, Highly Qualified, or Qualified. Names of all candidates in the best qualified category will be sent to the hiring official for employment consideration. Candidates within the best qualified category who are eligible for veterans preference will receive selection priority over non-veteran preference eligibles.

For Status/Merit Promotion/VEOA candidates: Your resume and supporting documentation will be used to determine whether you meet the job qualifications listed on the announcement. If you are basically qualified for this job, your resume and supporting documentation will be compared to your responses on the online assessment questionnaire. If you rate yourself higher than is supported by your resume and application materials, your responses may be adjusted and/or you may be excluded from consideration for this job. If you are found to be among the top candidates, you will be referred to the selecting official for employment consideration.

For Interagency Career Transition Assistance Plan (ICTAP)/Career Transition Assistance Plan (CTAP) applicants: The ICTAP provides eligible displaced Federal competitive service employees with selection priority over other candidates for competitive service vacancies. The CTAP provides eligible surplus and displaced competitive service employees in the Department of Justice with selection priority over other candidates for competitive service vacancies If your agency has notified you in writing that you are a displaced employee eligible for ICTAP consideration, or if your Department of Justice component has notified you in writing that you are a surplus or displaced employee eligible for CTAP consideration, you may receive selection priority if: 1) this vacancy is within your ICTAP/CTAP eligibility; 2) you apply under the instructions in this announcement; and 3) you are found well-qualified for this vacancy. Under merit promotion procedures, to be well qualified, you must satisfy all qualification requirements for the vacant position and score 85 or better on established ranking criteria. Under category rating procedures, you must satisfy all qualification requirements for the vacant position and rate equivalent to the Highly Qualified or better category using established category rating criteria.

Background checks and security clearance
Security clearance
Not Required
Drug test required
Yes
Required Documents

Required Documents
REMINDER: ALL DOCUMENTS MUST BE RECEIVED BY MIDNIGHT Eastern Time (Washington, D.C. time) ON THE CLOSING DATE OF THIS ANNOUNCEMENT.

REQUIRED DOCUMENTS (ALL APPLICANTS):

1. Resume and/or work history profile,

2. Responses to the online questions,

3. Veterans' Preference Documentation (if applicable; see below for more information).

ADDITIONAL REQUIRED DOCUMENTS (FEDERAL EMPLOYEES):

4. SF-50, Notification of Personnel Action (for current and former federal employees; see below for more information), and


5. Performance Appraisal (for current federal employees) Note: if not provided, will be required at time of interview.

Note: Incomplete applications will not be considered.

Veterans Preference

In order to verify your veteran preference entitlement, please submit a copy of the Member Copy 4 of your DD-214 (Certificate of Release or Discharge from Active Duty); official statement of service from your command if you are currently on active duty; or other official documentation (e.g., documentation of receipt of a campaign badge or expeditionary medal) that shows your military service was performed under honorable conditions.

If you are a disabled veteran, a Purple Heart recipient, or widow/widower of a veteran, the spouse of a disabled veteran or the natural mother of a disabled or deceased veteran, you must submit a Standard Form (SF) 15, Application for 10-Point Veteran Preference, and the other required documentation identified on the reverse side of the SF-15 to support your preference claim.

Although veteran preference points are not assigned under the category rating procedures described under How You Will Be Evaluated, veterans' preference eligibles are listed ahead of non-veterans within each category for which qualified. In addition, qualified veterans with a compensable service-connected disability of 10% or more are placed at the top of the highest quality category (i.e., Best Qualified).

Veterans Employment Opportunity Act

To be eligible for a Veteran Employment Opportunities Act (VEOA) appointment, a veteran must be honorably separated and either a preference eligible or have substantially completed three (3) or more years of continuous active military service. If applying for a Merit Promotion announcement and wish to be considered under the VEOA, you must submit a copy of the Member Copy 4 of your DD-214, in addition to any other required documents listed on this announcement.
Interagency Career Transition Assistance Plan (ICTAP)/Career Transition Assistance Plan (CTAP)

If you are claiming CTAP/ICTAP eligibility, you must submit proof by the closing date of the announcement that you meet the requirements of 5 CFR 330.605(u) for CTAP and 5 CFR 330.704 for ICTAP or you will not receive priority consideration. The proof includes a copy of the Agency notice, your most recent performance rating, and your most recent SF-50 Notification of Personnel Action for Competitive Appointment.

Non-competitive Eligibility

You can apply for a non-competitive appointment if you meet the basic eligibility requirements and you are eligible for special appointment such as those authorized for the severely disabled; veterans with service-connected disabilities of 30% or more; returning volunteers from the Peace Corps or Vista, Veterans' Recruitment Appointment, etc. Appropriate documentation to support your claim must be included in your application, along with the type of special appointment you are seeking.

Current/Former Federal Employees

If you are a current Federal employee in a permanent, competitive service position, you must submit document to confirm your status. Failure to submit an appropriate SF-50 will automatically disqualify you from further consideration.

Submit an SF-50 (Notification of Personnel Action) or other official agency documentation that shows your current (or most recent) grade and competitive service status. (The ""position occupied"" block on the SF-50 should show a ""1"" and your ""tenure"" block should show a ""1"" or ""2"".).
Submit your most recent Performance Appraisal (dated within the last 18 months) or a separate statement explaining why you are unable to submit your appraisal. If not provided at time of application, it will be required at time of interview.
If you are a former Federal employee who is reinstatement eligible based on prior federal permanent competitive service, you must submit documents to confirm your eligibility.

Submit an SF-50 (Notification of Personnel Action) or other official agency documentation that shows your current (or most recent) grade and competitive service status. (The ""position occupied"" block on the SF-50 should show a ""1"" and your ""tenure"" block should
If you are relying on your education to meet qualification requirements:
Education must be accredited by an accrediting institution recognized by the U.S. Department of Education in order for it to be credited towards qualifications. Therefore, provide only the attendance and/or degrees from schools accredited by accrediting institutions recognized by the U.S. Department of Education.
Failure to provide all of the required information as stated in this vacancy announcement may result in an ineligible rating or may affect the overall rating.
Benefits

Benefits
A career with the U.S. Government provides employees with a comprehensive benefits package. As a federal employee, you and your family will have access to a range of benefits that are designed to make your federal career very rewarding. Opens in a new windowLearn more about federal benefits.
To explore the major benefits offered to most Federal employees, visit the Office of Personnel Management's website at http://www.usajobs.gov/ResourceCenter/Index/Interactive/Benefits#icc.

Fitness Reimbursement: OJP offers a fitness reimbursement program for employees' individual fitness-related expenditures.

OJP also offers credit union services; ATM machine on-site; a health unit and on-site nurse for your usage.

Transit Benefits: To defray your commuting cost, we are pleased to offer the Employee Transit Benefit Program.
Review our benefits
Eligibility for benefits depends on the type of position you hold and whether your position is full-time, part-time, or intermittent. Contact the hiring agency for more information on the specific benefits offered.
Help
This job is open to
The public
U.S. citizens, nationals or those who owe allegiance to the U.S.
Clarification from the agency
Applicants will be considered under Delegated Examining and/or Merit Promotion procedures based upon eligibility. Applicants must be U.S. Citizens.",767,Washington
24,Network and Computer Systems Administrator,ActioNet,"Washington, DC 20024 (Southwest Federal Center area)",None,"ActioNet is recruiting for Information Security Analysts of varying seniority levels at Wright Patterson AFB, OH, Tinker AFB, OK, Hill AFB, UT, and Robins AFB, GA. These positions require a Top Secret clearance with SCI eligibility. ActioNet is an IT service provider and solutions integrator headquartered in Vienna, VA that works with the Federal Government and Department of Defense.
What is in it for you?
Being able to work in a dynamic, mission critical environment
Duties and Responsibilities
Possesses and applies expertise on multiple complex work assignments. Assignments may be broad in nature, requiring originality and innovation in determining how to accomplish tasks. Operates with appreciable latitude in developing methodology and presenting solutions to problems. Contributes to deliverables and performance metrics where applicable.
More senior levels possess and apply a comprehensive knowledge across key tasks and high impact assignments. Plans and leads major technology assignments. Evaluates performance results and recommends major changes affecting short-term project growth and success. Functions as a technical expert across multiple project assignments.
Install, configure, and support an organization's local area network (LAN), wide area network (WAN), and Internet systems or a segment of a network system. Monitor network to ensure network availability to all system users and may perform necessary maintenance to support network availability. May monitor and test Web site performance to ensure Web sites operate correctly and without interruption. May assist in network modeling, analysis, planning, and coordination between network and data communications hardware and software. May supervise computer user support specialists and computer network support specialists. May administer network security measures.
Basic Qualifications:
Must have an active Top Secret clearance with SCI eligibility
Education requirements vary by seniority level
Experience working in a TS/SCI environment and are aware of the nuances involved in those environments and technologies.
Domain knowledge of networking and system administration requirements in a TS/SCI environment
Are you ready to make a difference?
ActioNet is an equal opportunity employer and value diversity at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status.",767,Washington
25,Senior Security Specialist,Advantage SCI,"Washington, DC 20002 (Capitol Hill area)",None,"Job Description:
Job Title: Senior Security Specialist
Reports To: Program Manager and Customer
Work Location: Washington, D.C.
Clearance: Active Top Secret/SCI
Available Start Date: ASAP
Advantage SCI, LLC is seeking Security Specialist candidates to be considered for employment to support a government agency in Washington, DC.
The Personnel Security Specialist is responsible for applying agency or organizational regulations regarding the type of personal security check required (i.e., national agency check, special background investigation, etc.) and requesting an investigation from the appropriate organization. In carrying out personnel security work, the specialist performs such tasks as evaluating the sensitivity determination for each position, as described by management based on need-to-know principles. Personnel security specialists review, evaluate, and adjudicate reports of investigations, personnel files, and other records to determine whether to grant, deny, revoke, suspend, or restrict security clearances consistent with national security and/or suitability issues. They determine the adequacy and completeness of the investigation and of other means by which data were collected; evaluate the authenticity, veracity, and pertinence of the data to the case at hand; and request additional investigations or develop other information if needed. Security specialists recommend or decide whether security clearances should be granted, suspended, revoked, or denied. Personnel security specialists provide authoritative information and assistance to organization officials by advising on personnel security policies and related matters and on the impact of personnel security requirements on organizational missions. Specialists also advise management on matters about reinvestigation requirements, personnel assurance programs (i.e., ongoing checks on employee reliability), and related matters concerning the maintenance of current clearances and monitoring the reliability of the work force.

Required Experience:
Active Top Secret/SCI ClearanceMust have 3-5 years’ experience in related discipline;
Must have good working knowledge of JADE, Scattered Castles, and Joint Personnel Adjudicative System (JPAS) databases;
Must have a working knowledge of applicable security policy manuals, Intelligence Community Directives and manuals, Electronic Questionnaire for Investigation Processing (E-QIP) software, and other pertinent documents;
Must have a working knowledge with conducting security checks utilizing the Treasury Enforcement Communications System (TECS), National Crime Information Center Database, and CIS Database;
Candidate must be capable of multi-tasking and working in a high-tempo environment;
Must possess excellent oral and written communications skills;
Must have exceptional interpersonal skills and ability to communicate effectively with all levels of staff, and visitors; and
Excellent customer relations skills required. Ability to collaborate with a team of non?
supervisory personnel on matters relating to personnel security program objectives,
priorities and deadlines preferred.
Working Conditions:
Able to sit and work at a computer keyboard for extended periods of timeAble to stoop, kneel, bend at the waist and reach on a daily basisAble to lift up to 35 pounds occasionallyNoise level: Low to moderate
Advantage SCI, LLC is an Equal Opportunity Employer
EXECUTIVE ORDER 11246 Prohibits discrimination against any employee or applicant on the basis of race, sex, color, religion, or national origin and requires affirmative action to ensure that applicants are employed, and employees treated, without regard to race, sex, color, genetic information, religion, or national origin. (Enforcement Agency: U.S. Department of Labor, Office of Federal Contract Compliance Programs)

From: Advantage SCI",767,Washington
26,Senior Computer Security Specialist,mPower Software Services,"Arlington, VA",None,"In this role, you will apply your understanding of computer security, military system specifications, and Department of Defense Information Assurance (DoD) (IA) policies, in the execution of all aspects of the systems and their Cybersecurity posture. You would be responsible for DoD Information Assurance Risk Management Framework (DIARMF), and the implementation of Cyber Security and IA boundary defense techniques, various IA-enabled network technologies and appliances to facilitate certification and security engineering tasks in support of the customer.

Job Duties and Responsibilities;

Provide patches and updates to all BIG IP/F5s in enterprise environment
Perform necessary inspections and verification of security settings on BIG IP/F5 equipment (perform Secure Technical Implementation Guide) STIGs
Author DoD IA Assessment and Authorization (A&A) artifacts.
Document a system from an IA perspective
Derive, document and/or identify system CONOPS for Mission Assurance Categorization per DoDI 8500.2
Lead the research, recommend and document logical and physical solutions that prevent, detect and correct the system to be certified and accredited
Research and apply DISA Security Technical Implementation Guides (STIGs) and NSA recommendations
Lead the identification of disagreements between as built specifications, security requirements and DoD security policies and design implementations to bring the system into compliance.
Plan, develop, execute and document results of security test procedures
Lead the preparation and execution an Information Assurance Vulnerability Management (IAVM) Plan
Lead the preparation and production of a System Security Plan (SSP)
Lead the preparation of a Plan Of Action and Milestones (POA&M)
Lead the technical support effort in identifying and specifying requirements and performing risk assessments
Lead or Develop Standard Operating Procedures (SOP)
Ensure IT solutions meet requirements for security, availability, capacity, resiliency, and performance in a way that is efficient and supportable, reducing overall support costs
Understand industry leading solutions and trends for assigned technologies and applying those as appropriate
Understand business needs and partnering with appropriate IT counterparts to recommend technology solutions
Establish and maintain an IT multi-year strategy with a focus on continuous improvement. Create and maintain solutions architecture artifacts and other strategy and system documentation
Use tools such as Host Based Security System (HBSS), Assured Compliance Assessment Solution (ACAS), Junos Space, Cisco Prime and Cisco Adaptive Security Appliance

Education:

Bachelors Degree in Computer Science or a related technical discipline a
Four (4) years’ experience (in addition to minimum experience requirements) may be substituted for a Bachelor’s degree.
A Master’s degree may be substituted for two (2) years’ experience; or a doctoral degree may be substituted for three (3) years’ experience.",767,Washington
27,Reemployment Services and Eligibility Assessment,Virginia VA Employment Commission,"Alexandria, VA","$41,800 a year","The Virginia Employment Commission has a rare opportunity in our Workforce Services Division (WSD) for a qualified candidate to fill as a Reemployment Services and Eligibility Assessment (RESEA) Specialist in the Alexandria area. This exciting position offers an opportunity in which each day can be different from the day before. If this type of a workday interests you, and you have skills as a trainer or experience with employee coaching and development, are skilled in developing community-partner relationships, and would enjoy assisting members of your community with their re-employment, then the VEC would like to talk to you!

This position is located within our Workforce Services Division, whose primary function is to focus on employment opportunities and assist Virginia’s employers in hiring qualified job seekers to fill employer’s open positions. In this position, the successful candidate will provide workforce services to employers and job seekers related to the administration of the Reemployment Services and Eligibility Assessment (RESEA) Program and the Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act (WOIA).

As a RESEA Specialist, you will also:

Provide, coordinate, and evaluate re-employment services for unemployment insurance (UI) claimants identified as “likely to exhaust” benefits and ex-service members (UCX claimants) under the RESEA program.

Serve as a RESEA program “subject matter expert” and assist in ensuring rapid re-employment for claimants, resulting in shortening the duration of UI claims and identifying or preventing erroneous UI payments. Additionally, this position recommends corrective action to improve program performance.

Work with clients to obtain gainful employment, schedule meetings and conduct interviews with clients, identify and document needs, provide career counseling and coaching, make referrals to support services, conduct job matching and make job referrals, assess continued eligibility and re-employment needs, and track progress and outcomes.

Conduct and coordinate individual and group RESEA sessions providing information on services, labor market data, job readiness assessments, job service registration, UI eligibility and work search review, the Individual Reemployment Plan, and provides referrals to additional services such as Adult Education and Literacy, Vocational Rehabilitation, Occupational Skills, Senior Community Service, and Apprenticeship.

Provide informal on-the-job training for staff and re-employment services training for customers which addresses resume development, computer basics, correspondence and electronic tools for job searches, interviewing and networking skills, career exploration, self and specialized assessments, and job club facilitation in one-on-one, group, or workshop settings.

Conduct UI eligibility and fact finding work, review work search activities, and refer UI eligibility issues and problems for investigation and/or adjudication (as appropriate) to reduce fraud, abuse, and overpayment.

Work with employers to address employment needs (hiring, layoff, and reduction in staff), maintain strong working relationships, and refer potential clients.

Travel between offices within the workforce service area to meet with clients and staff, conducts training and makes presentations, and performs other duties to ensure business needs are met.

In addition to RESEA caseload, this position performs workforce services related to job seekers, employers, and Trade and Rapid Response cases to meet business needs.

Why work for the VEC? As the largest employment agency in Virginia, employees of the VEC have many different jobs but all share one common purpose – providing service to our customers, whether they are external or internal. Our Mission is to promote economic growth and stability by delivering and coordinating workforce services to include policy development, job placement, temporary income support, workforce information, and transition and training services. If this sounds like a mission that you would like to be a part of, apply today!

This salaried, non-exempt position offers Commonwealth of Virginia employee benefits such as:

12 paid holidays as well as vacation, sick, volunteer, and personal leave;Comprehensive health benefits;
participation in the VRS retirement system;
and much more! Please visit https://www.dhrm.virginia.gov/employeebenefits for more information about the benefits of working for the Commonwealth.

This position is physically located in and reports to our Alexandria office.

Minimum Qualifications
Knowledge of employment security issues related to the Wagner-Peyser (WP) Act and WIOA.

Knowledge of agency policies, procedures, and service delivery models related to workforce services.

Knowledge of basic employment and wage laws and guidelines, as well as office operations and etiquette.

Strong customer service, oral and written communication, and computer skills (e.g., experience using Microsoft Office Professional and/or similar software).

Ability to interact effectively with employers and the public, and to discuss, interpret, and apply agency standards and procedures.

Ability to conduct interviews and research, to evaluate skill sets and needs, and to use web-based applications to enter data and conduct database searches.

Ability to adapt to changing priorities and workload, to mentor and train staff, and to schedule and coordinate the work of others.

Ability to review program activities, initiate corrective action as needed, and make recommendations to improve operations.

Preferred Qualifications
Graduation from a college or university with a degree or coursework in public or business administration, human resources, and/or related field, or equivalent training and/or experience in employee selection and placement, outplacement, and/or career counseling.

Knowledge of UI eligibility requirements, experience developing and implementing employment and/or career plans or managing clients through the employment process, and credentials in workforce development (CWDP, WPDP, etc.) preferred.

Must have and maintain a valid driver’s license and be able to travel throughout the workforce service area as needed.

Special Requirements
The selected candidate must successfully pass a background investigation.

Special Instructions to Applicants
Applications for this position must be submitted electronically through this website.

Mailed, emailed, faxed, or hand delivered applications and résumés will not be accepted.

Consideration for an interview is based solely on the information within the application (resume)..

This website will provide a confirmation of receipt when the application is submitted for consideration.

Please refer to your RMS account for the status of your application and this position.

NOTICE: VEC will record information from each new employee’s Form I-9 (Employment Eligibility Verification) into the Federal E-Verify system to confirm identity and work authorization.

The Virginia Employment Commission Is an Equal Opportunity Employer/Program, and a Virginia Values Veterans (V3) certified employer. AmeriCorps, Peace Corps and other national service alumni are encouraged to apply.

Auxiliary Aids and Services are available upon request to individuals with disabilities.

Applicants needing accommodations should contact the Human Resource office for additional information.

The Commonwealth does not provide sponsorship; therefore, applicants must be a citizen or national of the U.S., a Lawful Permanent Resident, or an alien authorized to work in the US.

Name Human Resources

Phone 804-786-3025

Fax Faxed applications, resumes or cover letters will not be accepted.

Email Emailed applications, resumes or cover letters will not be accepted.

Address
Mailed applications, resumes or cover letters will not be accepted.",767,Washington
28,Senior Information Technology Specialist - Senior Cyber Security Engineer,US Supreme Court of the United States,"Washington, DC","$103,690 - $134,798 a year","Duties
Summary
This is a full-time position with the Office of Information Technology at the Supreme Court of the United States in Washington, D.C.

Closing Date: Tuesday, June 29, 2021, 11:59 PM EDT
Responsibilities
This position is a full-time position in the Office of Information Technology at the Supreme Court of the United States, in Washington, DC. Under the guidance of senior staff, the incumbent will perform the full range of tasks and activities involved in developing, coordinating, implementing and maintaining standards, procedures and technical solutions to protect the security and integrity of information systems and data. The incumbent will be responsible for the following duties:

Assist with implementation and ongoing support of multiple security hardware and software solutions to include antivirus, data loss prevention, IPS/IDS, vulnerability scanner, SIEM and forensics tools.
Work with stakeholders at all levels of the organization to communicate the state of information security, inform of possible risks, and suggest ways to improve security.
Conduct network monitoring and intrusion detection analysis to determine if there have been any attacks on the system.
Analyze network traffic to identify anomalies, and test the information security controls for weaknesses.
Respond to threats and take mitigating actions to contain the malicious activity and minimize damage as well as facilitate forensics analysis to determine the source of the threat.
Design and implement new solutions to protect systems and data. Work with other IT teams to implement the new safeguards, whether it is in the form of software, hardware, or new operating procedures.
The incumbent will make recommendations to senior management on results of analysis and work closely with other Information Technology groups to refine and enhance security controls. Will assist with problem solving, process improvement, project management, and information security policies, and participate in on-call support.
Travel Required
Not required
Supervisory status
No
Promotion Potential
None
Job family (Series)
2210 Information Technology Management
Similar jobs
Computer Applications Engineers
Computer Hardware Engineers
Computer Network Engineers
Engineers, Computer Applications
Engineers, Computer Hardware
Engineers, Computer Network
Requirements

Requirements
Conditions of Employment
U.S. Citizenship
Meet Experience Requirements (see Qualifications)
Employment is subject to successful completion of a security background check.
If you are a male applicant born after December 31, 1959, you must certify that you have registered with the Selective Service System, or are exempt from having to do so under the Selective Service Law. See: www.sss.gov
Qualifications
As a condition of continued employment, the candidate must be able to acquire and retain a Top Secret (TS) clearance. Candidate must possess the following knowledge, skills and abilities:
Strong knowledge of firewalls, security appliances, intrusion prevention/detection systems, and SIEM products and their placement within complex network environments.
Ability to review and assess security impact of proposed changes to system and network architecture.
Strong knowledge of TCP/IP network protocols, including common application protocols and ports.
Ability to use documentation to convert knowledge of general/theoretical concepts into network configurations on a wide range of equipment in a lab and global network environments.
Assists with the development, documentation, and deployment of security architectures and system roadmaps.
Ability to balance business needs with security policies.
Ability to work with engineers/vendors to improve capabilities, resolve issues, and increase performance of security operation devices and configurations.
Ability to adapt to new technologies, test them to failure, and identify the strengths/weaknesses of each for decision makers (research and evaluate new hardware/software).
Familiarity with network concepts, user authentication, and digital signatures.
Ability to review and assess impact of proposed scope changes to future architecture.
Organizational skills with the ability to multitask, take direction, prioritize, and manage multiple activities/tasks to achieve objectives.
Ability to work in a fast-paced, technically challenging area; ability to anticipate and manage changes or problems; assess impacts and make sound recommendations.
Must be able to communicate effectively, both orally and in writing.
Experience working as a Security Operation Center (SOC) engineer desired.
CISSP, GCIA, GCDA, GDSA, and other security certifications desired.
The selected candidate will be working with a small group of highly skilled and motivated technical staff. The Court provides appropriate in-house and outside third-party technical training. Each staff member is provided with access to high levels of technical support; an in-house library of up-to-date commercially available technical books and software; a technology lab for development and testing of technology products; and a fully equipped computer training room. In addition, the Court provides all employees free access to an in-house exercise facility/weight training room.
Education
Candidate must have a college degree (computer related) and five years security related experience.
Additional information
Working for the Supreme Court of the United States offers a comprehensive benefits package that includes, in part, paid vacation, sick leave, holidays, life insurance, health benefits, and participation in the Federal Employees Retirement System. Additional benefits include flexible spending accounts, long-term care insurance, and the SmartBenefits transit subsidy.

How You Will Be Evaluated
You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications above.
We will review and assess your application package in comparison with the posted qualifications for the position.

Background checks and security clearance
Security clearance
Not Required
Drug test required
No
Required Documents

Required Documents
The following documents are required:

OF-306 (http://www.opm.gov/forms/pdf_fill/of0306.pdf)
A resume
A cover letter

Benefits

Benefits
Review our benefits
Help
This job is open to
The public
U.S. citizens, nationals or those who owe allegiance to the U.S.
Clarification from the agency
United States Citizens Only",767,Washington
29,Senior Data Specialist,Leidos,"Washington, DC 20090 (South West area)",None,"Description
Job Description:
Be part of a dynamic team in providing legal and technical services to support the Department of Justice and other U.S. Government agencies. From emails and instant messages, to serves, electronic devices, and social media systems, we’re equipped to meet the challenge of forensically capturing, reviewing, and illuminating the “smoking gun” evidence. Join us and make a difference.
Leidos is looking for a top notch candidate to provide legal support services federal agency customers in Washington, DC on complex criminal matters.
This position is expected to start on June 1, 2021. However, employment is contingent on ability to successfully obtain a minimum of a Public Trust Waiver prior to your start date as well as the ability to obtain and maintain a Public Trust Suitability Determination for the duration of this position
Overtime and travel may be required as needed with proper authorization. Individual may support any division/section within depending on the needs of the office at time of hire.
Duties may include the following but not limited to:
May support case management team and/or filter team.
Provides oversight functions for Data Specialists performing file manipulation, loading, conversion services, exports, and productions and quality checks of loads and exports;
Develops, evaluates, and modifies methodologies and procedures for manipulating files for use with COTS products and litigation support applications;
Performs quality assurance of all EFP services;
Responsible for ensuring that incoming productions are made pursuant to the applicable ESI specifications and when deficiencies are found, provides EFP Manager with detailed notice of deficiencies;
Recommends process improvement to ensure high quality, timely and cost-effective methods are utilized;
Prior experience with supporting criminal litigation; and
Experience with audio-visual data, including the processing and the tools utilized to analyze it.
The above mentioned duties may be performed as single functions or in combination with one another. One is expected to perform duties as defined by the contract in conjunction with the statement of work.
Basic Qualifications:Proven excellent written and oral communication skills.Requires knowledge of litigation discovery process, and the Electronic Discovery Reference Model (EDRM) workflow.Working knowledge of personal computers, including Windows, document review software, and encryption methods.Experience with LAW, IPRO, Relativity or other document processing platform.At least five years’ experience performing eDiscovery roles including but not limited to electronic files processing (EFP), image and data file conversion, data culling using review tools, quality assurance, database loads and retrieval, and data analysis.Ability to perform detailed work consistently, accurately, and under pressure extremely important.Ability to work and interact professionally and effectively with all levels of staff.Ability to meet established deadlines and work as a team player in a professional office.Skilled in meeting and dealing with people in a courteous and tactful manner.Some walking, standing, bending and carrying of small office itemsAbility to obtain a security clearance.Must be a U.S. Citizen.
Preferred Qualifications:Experience working in a Government and/or Litigation Support environment in conjunction with basic qualifications, preferred.Knowledge of Government’s IT environment, including office automation networks, PC and server based applications preferred.Familiarity with ICONECT, Relativity, MS Office Suite, and West LiveNote valued.Undergraduate degree preferred-preferably in computer science or related field.Prior experience with criminal litigation support.Current or active clearance.
MEGA
External Referral Bonus:
Ineligible
Potential for Telework:
No
Clearance Level Required:
Public Trust
Travel:
No
Scheduled Weekly Hours:
40
Shift:
Day
Requisition Category:
Professional
Job Family:
Business Systems Analysis
Pay Range:",767,Washington
30,IT SPECIALIST (APPSW),US Defense Information Systems Agency,"Washington, DC","$103,690 - $134,798 a year","Duties
Summary
This position is being recruited under 10 USC 1599f into the Cyber Excepted Service and does NOT convey eligibility to be converted to the Competitive Service. It has been identified as a position necessary to carry out and support the mission of the US Cyber Command.


It is in the Professional Work Category at the Senior Work Level within the CES Occupational Structure. It is located in the DISA MISSION PARTNER ENGAGEMENT OFFICE (BD9M7) at Washington D.C. (OPM Theodore Roosevelt Building).
Responsibilities
Develops, interprets, plans and applies policy, process, procedure and strategy in the delivery of multi-discipline IT services required to achieve data and system integration/interoperability for assigned systems and applications.
Performs in-depth analysis of automated and manual systems to accomplish design and programming assignments which integrate the activities of multiple specialty areas.
Provides authoritative technical advice to customers and team members by examining and evaluating alternate means of satisfying customers' rapidly changing business requirements and the impact of rapidly evolving technology.
Reviews proposals for change that consist of objectives, scope, and customers' expectations.
Designs user interfaces and integrates hardware and software components. Maintains program(s) to support the needs of the customer.
Develops testing and implementation plans.
Travel Required
Occasional travel - You may be expected to travel for this position.
Supervisory status
No
Promotion Potential
13
Job family (Series)
2210 Information Technology Management
Requirements

Requirements
Conditions of Employment
Must be a U.S. Citizen.
Males born after 12-31-59 must be registered or exempt from Selective Service.
This national security position, which may require access to classified information, requires a favorable suitability review and security clearance as a condition of employment. Failure to maintain security eligibility may result in termination.
Qualifications
In order to qualify for this position, you must meet the requirements described below.

Basic Requirements:
Attention to Detail - experience reviewing my own information technology-related work or data and have been responsible for reviewing the work of others to ensure accuracy, completeness, and consistency with standards.

Customer Service - developing and maintaining relationships with customers, anticipating and assessing the current and future information technology needs of customers, and developing or identifying information technology products or services that are tailored to meet customer needs.

Oral Communication - briefing senior-level management and IT staff on the status of information technology systems, projects, or daily operations, including the communication of complex technical information to a non-technical audience.

Problem Solving - identifying alternatives to address unique, highly complex, or sensitive information technology-related issues. I have anticipated information technology-related problems and have identified and evaluated potential sources of information to generate alternative solutions.

AND

Qualifying Experience:

To qualify at the GG-13, your resume must describe at least one year of experience that demonstrates the competencies necessary for immediate success in the position. Experience refers to any paid or unpaid experience, including volunteer work and Military service, that would be considered equivalent to work normally performed at the next lower grade level in the federal service. For this position, qualifying experience is defined as: For this position, qualifying experience is defined as conducting the full range of testing of an organization's major automation information systems and software; Participating in IT project management tasks that include creating project plans and milestones to meet user requirements; estimating, planning, coordinating, documenting and executing test scenarios and scripts for systems test events; Analyzing causes of failure and recommending corrective actions for mainframe systems.

Candidates must describe how they meet the qualifying experience and/or selective placement factor(s) within the body of their resume. All qualifications must be met within 30 days after the closing date of this announcement.
Education


There is no substitution of education for the qualifying experienceat the GG-13 grade level
Additional information
This position is in the Excepted Service and does NOT convey eligibility to be converted to the Competitive Service. It is being recruited under 10 U.S.C. 1599f into the Cyber Excepted Service (CES) personnel system.
If you are a current Federal Career/Career-Conditional employee, you will be placed on an Excepted appointment.
This appointment does not confer eligibility to be non-competitively converted to an appointment in the competitive service.
A three year trial period may be required if you have not previously completed a trial or probationary period in the excepted or competitive service.
Telework availability will be based upon the mission requirements and supervisory determination
Individuals tentatively selected for drug testing designated positions at the Defense Information Systems Agency will be required to submit to urinalysis for illegal drugs prior to appointment or placement.
We may use this announcement to fill additional vacancies within 90 days of the closing date.
Moving costs MAY be paid.
The Tax Cuts and Jobs Act of 2017 makes certain reimbursements/payments taxable. For information on these changes and the Relocation Income Tax Allowance (RITA), for which some appointees are eligible, click here.
Recruitment, relocation, or retention incentives MAY be authorized.
The Department of Defense (DoD) policy on employment of annuitants issued March 18, 2004 will be used in determining eligibility of annuitants. It applies to former Federal civilian employees receiving a retirement annuity from the Civil Service Retirement and Disability Fund that are hired within the DoD on or after November 24, 2003. The policy also applies to annuitants (appointed in DoD on/or after November 24, 2003) who move from one position to another within DoD through voluntary reassignment, promotion, change to lower grade or transfer between military departments. Please see this policy here.
Because this position is in the Cyber Excepted Service, Veterans' Preference will be applied to preference eligible candidates, as defined by Section 2108 of the Title 5 U.S.C. in accordance with the procedures provided in DoD Instruction 1400.25, Volume 3005, ""CES Employment and Placement."" If you are a veteran claiming veteran's preference, as defined by Section 2108 of Title 5 U.S.C., you must submit documents verifying your eligibility with your application package.
For more information on the Cyber Excepted Service Personnel System, click here.
For more information on veterans' preference, click here.
For more information regarding qualifications requirements, click here.
If you are unable to apply online, view the following link for information regarding Alternate Application.


How You Will Be Evaluated
You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications above.
Once the application process is complete, a review of your resume and supporting documentation will be made and compared against your responses to the applicant questionnaire to determine if you are qualified for this job. If, after reviewing your resume and or supporting documentation, a determination is made that you have inflated your qualifications and or experience, you may lose consideration for this position. Please follow all instructions carefully. Errors or omissions may affect your rating.


You can preview the Questionnaire here:https://apply.usastaffing.gov/ViewQuestionnaire/11130210

Background checks and security clearance
Security clearance
Secret
Drug test required
No
Position sensitivity and risk
Noncritical-Sensitive (NCS)/Moderate Risk
Trust determination process
National security
Required Documents

Required Documents

FOR THIS JOB ANNOUNCEMENT THE FOLLOWING SUPPORTING DOCUMENTS ARE REQUIRED AS THEY APPLY STATED BELOW AND MUST BE RECEIVED BY THE CLOSE OF THE ANNOUNCEMENT. NOT ALL DOCUMENTS WILL APPLY TO EVERYONE.

Transcripts (if applicable) If you are substituting education for specialized experience you must submit all of your transcripts. The absence of this information will result in an ineligible rating.
SF-50 - (if applicable) Notification of Personnel Action for current or former federal employees- All applicants to include current agency employees must provide your most recent SF50 or the SF50 reflecting Career/Career-Conditional tenure and the highest grade held on a permanent basis.
Veterans Preference Documentation (if applicable): Candidates claiming Veterans Preference must submit a DD-214 (Member Copy 4), or, if you are CURRENTLY serving on active duty, a statement of service from your unit which states the date you entered on active duty, the date you are separating, and the campaign medals you have received. For those supplying the statement of service, preference will be verified by a DD-214 (Member Copy 4) upon separation from the military. Veterans with a service-connected disability must also submit a VA letter dated 1991 or later. DoD Components with CES positions apply Veterans' Preference to preference eligible candidates, as defined by Section 2108 of the Title 5 U.S.C. in accordance with the procedures provided in DoD Instruction 1400.25, Volume 3005, ""CES Employment and Placement.""
Military Spouse Preference (if applicable): Spousal Permanent Change of Station (PCS) orders, marriage certificate/license, and a MILITARY SPOUSE PPP SELF-CERTIFICATION CHECKLIST are required to claim Military Spouse Preference. The Military Spouse PPP Self-Certification Checklist can be found here: Military Spouse PPP Self-Certification Checklist .


Your complete Application Package (containing the above required documents) must be received no later than 11:59 pm Eastern Time on 06/14/2021.

WARNING: Failure to submit a complete application package including any required documentation by 11:59 PM (EST) on 06/14/2021, or at the time of application for announcements with an extended closing date, may result in an ineligible rating and loss of consideration. To verify that your application is complete, log into your USAJOBS account, select Application Status and More Information. The Details page will display the status of your application. It is the applicant's responsibility to verify that information entered, uploaded is received, legible and accurate. HR will not modify answers submitted by an applicant.
If you are relying on your education to meet qualification requirements:
Education must be accredited by an accrediting institution recognized by the U.S. Department of Education in order for it to be credited towards qualifications. Therefore, provide only the attendance and/or degrees from schools accredited by accrediting institutions recognized by the U.S. Department of Education.
Failure to provide all of the required information as stated in this vacancy announcement may result in an ineligible rating or may affect the overall rating.
Benefits

Benefits
A career with the U.S. Government provides employees with a comprehensive benefits package. As a federal employee, you and your family will have access to a range of benefits that are designed to make your federal career very rewarding. Opens in a new windowLearn more about federal benefits.
Review our benefits
Eligibility for benefits depends on the type of position you hold and whether your position is full-time, part-time, or intermittent. Contact the hiring agency for more information on the specific benefits offered.
Help
This job is open to
The public
U.S. citizens, nationals or those who owe allegiance to the U.S.
Clarification from the agency
Open to All U.S. Citizens",767,Washington
31,Senior Billing Specialist,BAE Systems,"Sterling, VA 20166",None,"This new position will be a seasoned biller, with several years of recent government contract billing experience using Costpoint 7.0 or above. The position will bill T&M, FFP and Cost Type projects (government & commercial). This position will also be needed to enter invoices in several customer portals (i.e. WAWF, IPP). Communication and coordination with internal (Program Finance, Contracts, Collections, etc.) and external customers will be expected. This position will also work with computer and desktop applications, perform reconciliations and be skilled with monitoring and tracking project funding to complete billings and assignments. This position will be needed to support all three business areas, with an emphasis on support the INTEL group.

Required Education, Experience, & Skills

In lieu of a degree, 5+ years of recent government contract billing experience to include billing cost type, T&M and fixed price contracts.
Recent experience with government portals such as IPP, WAWF, recent knowledge of MOCAS and recent experience with Costpoint 7.0 or above.
Able to perform project reconciliations and track project funding. Able to work independently on complex billing projects. Ability to solve complex invoicing issues. Ability to contribute to process improvements.
Sound oral and written communication. Ability to work in a fast-paced environment. Ability to work independently as well as in a team environment, with little to no supervision. Ability to meet recurring and ad hoc deadlines.

Preferred Education, Experience, & Skills

Cognos, proficient in Microsoft Office Suite,

About BAE Systems Intelligence & Security

BAE Systems, Inc. is the U.S. subsidiary of BAE Systems plc, an international defense, aerospace and security company which delivers a full range of products and services for air, land and naval forces, as well as advanced electronics, security, information technology solutions and customer support services. Improving the future and protecting lives is an ambitious mission, but it’s what we do at BAE Systems. Working here means using your passion and ingenuity where it counts – defending national security with breakthrough technology, superior products, and intelligence solutions. As you develop the latest technology and defend national security, you will continually hone your skills on a team—making a big impact on a global scale. At BAE Systems, you’ll find a rewarding career that truly makes a difference.

Intelligence & Security (I&S), based in McLean, Virginia, designs and delivers advanced defense, intelligence, and security solutions that support the important missions of our customers. Our pride and dedication shows in everything we do—from intelligence analysis, cyber operations and IT expertise to systems development, systems integration, and operations and maintenance services. Knowing that our work enables the U.S. military and government to recognize, manage and defeat threats inspires us to push ourselves and our technologies to new levels.


At BAE Systems, we celebrate the array of skills, experiences, and perspectives our employees bring to the table. For us, differences are a source of strength. We’re laser-focused on high performance, and we work hard every day to nurture an inclusive culture where all employees can innovate and thrive. Here, you will not only build your career, but you will also enjoy work-life balance, uncover new experiences, and collaborate with passionate colleagues.",767,Washington
32,Systems Engineer Technical Specialist,Peraton,"Chantilly, VA","Up to $200,678 a year","Peraton Overview

Peraton drives missions of consequence spanning the globe and extending to the farthest reaches of the galaxy. As the worlds leading mission capability integrator and transformative enterprise IT provider, we deliver trusted and highly differentiated national security solutions and technologies that keep people safe and secure. Peraton serves as a valued partner to essential government agencies across the intelligence, space, cyber, defense, civilian, health, and state and local markets. Every day, our 22,000 employees do the cant be done, solving the most daunting challenges facing our customers.
We are an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We consider applicants without regard to race, color, religion, age, national origin, ancestry, ethnicity, gender, gender identity, gender expression, sexual orientation, marital status, veteran status, disability, genetic information, citizenship status, or membership in any other group protected by federal, state, or local law.

As a government contractor, Peraton abides by the following provision

Pay Transparency Nondiscrimination Provision

The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of the other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractors legal duty to furnish information. 41 CFR 60-1.35(c).

Qualifications

Required:
Bachelors degree in Systems Engineering or in related technical or scientific fields such as engineering, physics, mathematics, operations research, engineering management, Computer Science, Information Technology, Management Information Systems, or related STEM degree program.
12+ years working experience in government or industry in relevant work areas including: DoD/IC Acquisition Process, Requirements Process, PPBES Process or system engineering of large complex System of Systems or Service Oriented Architecture/Cloud environments.
Experience with and strong understanding of systems engineering lifecycle.

Desired:
Masters degree in Systems Engineering or in related technical or scientific fields such as engineering, physics, mathematics, operations research, engineering management, Computer Science, Information Technology, Management Information Systems, or related STEM degree program.
Working knowledge of Model Based Systems Engineering, processes, tools and languages.
Working knowledge of Software Development Frameworks.
INCOSE Certified System Engineering Professional (CSEP) certification.
Documented work experience in the field of geospatial intelligence.
Licensure as a professional engineer.
Membership or leadership participation in any of the following professional organizations:
ACSM
ASCE
ASPRS
OGC
SAREM
USGIF
Demonstrated expertise in photogrammetry, remote sensing, image science, information sciences, geographic information systems, geomatics, or related fields.
Demonstrated knowledge of the current NSG/ASG and NRO enterprises .
Responsibilities

Senior-level Systems Engineers guide engineering teams in taking a multi-discipline approach to requirements engineering, solutions engineering, scheduling, reliability, resiliency, services development, integration, test and evaluation, maintainability and analysis across the National System of Geospatial-intelligence (NSG), Allied System of Geospatial-intelligence (ASG) and Federal Agencies to ensure timely and accurate GEOINT.

Duties include:
Guides Mid-level and Junior-level system engineers performing requirements engineering, solutions engineering, scheduling, reliability, resiliency, services development, integration, test and evaluation, maintainability and analysis across the National System of Geospatial-intelligence (NSG), Allied System of Geospatial-intelligence (ASG) and Federal Agencies.
Guides the planning, analysis/traceability of user requirements, architectures traceability, procedures, and problems to automate or improve existing systems and review cloud service capabilities, workflow, and scheduling limitations.
Guides Mid-level and Junior-level system engineers developing solutions designs based on analysis of requirements and new technology.
Assists the Government in the capture and translation of mission and customer requirements/needs into systems/capability requirements and solutions.
Supports the analyses and allocation of requirements to systems architecture components and executing programs.
Assists the Government in performing systems integration activities.
Conducts Analysis of Alternatives (AoAs), Course of Actions (CoAs), Trade Studies, and Engineering Assessments.
Assists the Government in strategic technical planning, project management, performance engineering, risk management and interface design.
Operates at the level of integrating multiple systems, services, processes, and interfaces within a Major Systems Acquisitions across organizational and agency boundaries
For Colorado Residents
Salary Minimum: $93,870.40
Salary Maximum: $200,678.40

The estimate displayed represents the typical salary range for this position, and is just one component of Perspecta's total compensation package for employees. Other rewards may include annual bonuses, short- and long-term incentives, and program-specific awards. In addition, Perspecta provides a variety of benefits to employees.",767,Washington
33,Help Desk Specialist (Senior),Vision Technologies,"Washington, DC 20004 (Downtown area)",None,"Overview:

Responds to and diagnoses problems through discussion with users. Ensures a timely process through which problems are controlled. Includes problem recognition, research, isolation, resolution, and follow-up steps. Supervises operation of help desk and serves as focal point for customer concerns. Provides support to end users on a variety of issues. Identifies, researches, and resolves technical problems. Responds to telephone calls, email and personnel requests for technical support. Documents, tracks, and monitors the problem to ensure a timely resolution. Provides second-tier support to end users for either PC, server, or mainframe applications or hardware. Interact with network services, software systems engineering, and/or applications development to restore service and/or identify and correct core problem. Simulates or recreates user problems to resolve operating difficulties. Recommends systems modifications to reduce user problems. Possesses and applies a comprehensive knowledge across key tasks and high impact assignments. Plans and leads major technology assignments. Evaluates performance results and recommends major changes affecting short-term project growth and success. Functions as a technical expert across multiple project assignments. May supervise others.
This is a professional and technical position responsible for desktop, laptop, printer and video conference set-up, patch installation, software upgrade support, and troubleshooting /diagnosing reported end-user hardware and software problems. Employees in this classification are responsible for planning, evaluating and implementing approved system changes and upgrades.
YEARS OF EXPERIENCE
Three years of relevant experience.
Experience with the customer’s installed product base is preferred.
EDUCATION
An Associate degree in Computer Science or related disciplines is preferred.
Responsibilities:

CERTIFICATION REQUIREMENTS
Relevant manufacturer certifications desirable
SECURITY CLEARANCE
Will be required to obtain a Public Trust clearance
DUTIES
The following statements describe the principal functions of this job and its scope of responsibility but should not be considered an all-inclusive listing of work requirements. Individuals may perform other duties as assigned, including working in other functional areas to cover absences or relief, to equalize peak work periods or otherwise to balance the workload.
Monitor telecom service desk queues.
Responds to and diagnoses problems through discussion with users.
Ensures a timely process through which problems are controlled and addressed.
Problem recognition, research, isolation, resolution, and follow-up steps.
Identify, research, and resolve technical problems.
Coordinate team, vendor, or escalation response for support requests and/or trouble reporting for all services or products or equipment managed within telecom.
Assists with basic administration of the Microsoft OS and tools, peripherals and phones, including end-user training on features and functionality.
Supervises operation of help desk and serves as focal point for customer concerns.
Provides support to end users on a variety of issues.
Responds to telephone calls, email and personnel requests for technical support.
Documents, tracks, and monitors problems to ensure a timely resolution.
Provides second-tier support to end users for PC, server, and mainframe applications or hardware.
Interacts with network services, software systems engineering, and/or applications development to restore service and/or identify and correct core problems.
Simulates or recreates user problems to resolve operating difficulties.
Recommends systems modifications to reduce user problems.
Possesses and applies a comprehensive knowledge across key tasks and high impact assignments.
Plans and leads major technology assignments.
Evaluates performance results and recommends major changes affecting short-term project growth and success.
Functions as a technical expert across multiple project assignments.
Ability to demonstrate the correct use of hardware and/or software.
May supervise others.
Supports end users on a variety of issues.
Complies with Helpdesk policies and procedures.
Ability to complete assignments independently and to lead others in their assignments.
Good written and oral communication skills, suitable for project leadership and reporting to management and customers.
Qualifications:

SPECIAL SKILLS (if applicable)
Support, monitor, test, and troubleshoot hardware and software problems pertaining to computer systems for the customer.
Schedule repair, install and configure workstations with approved image and additional software as approved/required.
May need to install after-market hardware to support user equipment functionality.
Move IT systems and peripherals for office relocations.
Setup, initiate, and shutdown video conferences between one or more sites.
Follow approved standard operating procedures and meet all service level agreements.
Maintain and submit updates to asset management for all equipment maintained
Update the ticket tracking system as required.
Knowledge of commonly used concepts, practices, and procedures within a particular field.
Demonstrate familiarity with Video Conference systems setup and preparation is desirable.
Rely on instructions and pre-established guidelines to perform the functions of the job.
Work under immediate supervision. Typically reports to a team leader or manager.
Provide a hands-on customer service approach.
Troubleshoot computers, peripherals and telephone equipment.
Good verbal and written communications skills.
Organized and self-motivated.
Manage multiple priorities.
Productive working independently or as part of a team.
Proficient in use of MS Office products (e.g., Word, Excel).",767,Washington
34,Telecommunications Specialist,Aleut Federal,"Washington, DC 20004 (Downtown area)",None,"Aleut Federal's Technology Services Group is seeking a Telecommunications Specialist to join our team in Washington, DC.
This position is contingent upon contract award
Telecommunications Specialist
Duties:
Ensure the EOC and all associated communications systems and equipment are maintained in a constant state of operational readiness;
Conduct operational testing and coordinate the maintenance of the EPA secure telecommunications system, secure computers, faxes, etc., and if repair or service needed, notify EOC Team Leader and PO.;
Meet D-16-1 monthly and quarterly testing requirements; ensure the facility is capable of attaining full operational capability and
Support of a full headquarters Emergency Operations Team for extended operational periods under all hazards emergency conditions; including adherence to all National Security Information protocols for secure areas;
During steady-state and emergency/extended operations, work closely with the on-duty Watch Officers (Senior Watch Officer/Watch Officer) in the preparation, development and transmission of EOC products (e.g., Daily Emergency Management Report, Spot Reports, and other EOC products).
Support, as needed, interagency liaison activities, including monitoring HSIN and contacting interagency ops centers (e.g., DHS NOC and NICC) for information when the on-duty SWO/WO are engaged in other duties.
Qualifications:
A Bachelor’s Degree in National Security Strategy, Management, Public Administration, Political Science, or other related scientific, technical, or liberal arts discipline;
Minimum of 8 years’ professional experience, of which at least four years must be specialized; and
American citizenship with a Top Secret national security clearance (current at time of contract award). Experience in secure communications equipment operation and maintenance.
(1) General experience includes field or office work in Federal emergency response activities, familiarity with environmental response activities; ability to multi-task under possibly stressful conditions.
(2) Specialized experience includes work with national security emergency program management and/or operations; catastrophic disaster and/or environmental emergency program management or operations; emergency operations center (EOC) activities; demonstrated ability to provide guidance and direction in the tasks similar to the tasks described in the statement of work.
The EEO Statement: Aleut Federal, LLC provides equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability, sexual orientation, gender identity or genetics. In addition to federal law requirements, AF complies with applicable state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment in every location in which the company has facilities. This policy applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting, hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation and training. AF expressly prohibits any form of workplace harassment based on race, color, sex, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, national origin, age, genetic information, disability, or veteran status.
#CJ
Aleut Management Services is an EEO employer - M/F/Vets/Disabled",767,Washington
35,Systems Administrator,LOCKHEED MARTIN CORPORATION,"Annapolis Junction, MD 20701",None,"Want to be at the frontlines of cybersecurity by defending key national security systems? Come join our team of specialists who work daily with groundbreaking technologies to support critical customer systems and missions. We work with our customers to develop tools, support 24x7x365 operations, and engineer systems that play a significant role in the day-day defense of critical national systems.


Program requires a Mid/Senior level System Administrator to support the customer’s Rapid Response Center (RRC). Candidate will have shown talent in coordinating the Linux Operating System, VMWare, and Windows Operating System. Confirmed grasp of basic Window’s functions to include account administration, Active Directory, file sharing, and other common administrative activities. Desired candidates must have experience working in and supporting a customer service organization and have experience using common system monitoring such as Zabbix.


In addition, ideal candidates will have experience in using a help desk ticketing system such as SysAid or Service Now. Candidate must be willing to work in a critical crucial position supporting 24x7 continuous operations. Standard work schedule includes IS 0600-1500 M-F, however the candidate is considered a back-up for our 24x7 SSA team and will be placed on an on-call list. Team size ranges from 4 – 8 System Administrators on any given day.

BENEFITS OF EMPLOYMENT:
We may not know what's going to change the world next, but chances are we're already working on it, and you can, too. As part of our culture of innovation, you’ll have excellent benefits and amenities, an inclusive work environment, ongoing career development and support, rewards and recognition to honor your hard work, and more.



HERE ARE SOME OF THE BENEFITS YOU CAN ENJOY:
Medical
Dental
401k
Paid time off
Work/life balance
Career development
Mentorship opportunities
Rewards & recognition
Whether you’re new to the area or just like being socially involved, we encourage everyone to explore among our many employee networks and employee resource groups we have on-site. Whatever your interests, there’s likely a community at Lockheed Martin for networking, becoming familiar with the area, and enjoying common activities with coworkers.

Lockheed Martin’s driven and comprehensive benefits package. (https://www.lockheedmartinjobs.com/working-here#benefits)

We support our employees, so they can support our mission.
Basic Qualifications:
16 years experience or 12 years, and a Bachelor's of Science Degree, or 10 years and a Masters
TECHNOLOGIES/TOOLS/SKILLS:
VMware – Experience will vSphere
Client/vSphere Web Client & View Client
- Centrify – Work with Active Directory in non-

Windows environments
SSH – Experience with remote command execution
RDP – Work with Remote Desktop Connection to coordinate accounts
McAfee ePO – Experience with security management software
Desired Skills:
Experience with Power shell, Perl, and Linux scripting (csh, ksh, bash)
Working knowledge of NiFi and DDS
Experience with CentOS and Openstack
Experience with common Linux commands such as mv, passwd, rm, useradd
BASIC QUALIFICATIONS:
job.Qualifications

Lockheed Martin is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.
Join us at Lockheed Martin, where your mission is ours. Our customers tackle the hardest missions. Those that demand extraordinary amounts of courage, resilience and precision. They’re dangerous. Critical. Sometimes they even provide an opportunity to change the world and save lives. Those are the missions we care about.

As a leading technology innovation company, Lockheed Martin’s vast team works with partners around the world to bring proven performance to our customers’ toughest challenges. Lockheed Martin has employees based in many states throughout the U.S., and Internationally, with business locations in many nations and territories.
EXPERIENCE LEVEL:
Experienced Professional",767,Washington
36,Senior Contract Specialist,"INTEGRATED FEDERAL SOLUTIONS, INC.","Washington, DC 20036 (Downtown area)",None,"Responsibilities:

Perform cradle-to-grave contract specialist work in professional services (finance and legal)
De-obligate unused funds on contracts, GSA Task Orders, purchase orders and Interagency Agreements
Determine the contract methods for use in developing terms and conditions of solicitations
Obtain required reviews and/or approvals, assist with planning, execution, administration, and termination of contracts through formal solicitation or negotiation procedures
Evaluate contract price proposals and perform terminations and close-out of contracts
Negotiate and discuss costs/prices and terms and conditions
Participate in source selections working with evaluation teams
Provide procurement guidance to program offices, field offices and user functions


Job Requirements & Skills:

Ability to obtain a Public Trust Security Clearance
US Citizenship (males born after 12/31/59 must be registered for the Selective Service)
Must have at least 8 years of experience in contracting or related positions
Knowledge of the federal acquisition process and applicable laws and /regulations (Federal Acquisition Regulations (FAR)
Effectively communicate orally and in writing
Able to ensure positive working relationships with internal or external customers
Successful candidate will serve a 1-year probationary period


Desired Skills:

Experience in Microsoft Office Plus and Prism (agency contract writing system)
Experience with major contract writing systems


Physical Requirements:

The physical demands described herein are representative of those which must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of the job. Employees must possess the ability to work in a standard office or conference room setting and use standard office equipment, including a computer. To visit other company sites, employees must be able to operate a motor vehicle and fly in an aircraft, both of which may require sitting for prolonged periods of time. Employees must possess vision to read printed materials and a computer screen; and hearing and speech to communicate in person, before groups and over the telephone. Standing in work areas and walking between work areas will be required. This position requires an employee to occasionally bend, stoop, kneel, crouch, crawl, climb or balance; reach, push, and pull drawers and doors open and closed. The employee must occasionally lift and/or move up to 20 pounds.


Ecke Holding Company LLC is an equal opportunity employer. Ecke does not discriminate on the basis of age, sex, race, national origin, religion, marital status, sexual orientation or identity, or disability. However, preference may be extended to qualified Native American Indian candidates in accordance with applicable federal law.",767,Washington
37,IT Specialist (Project Manager) - SME (Open to both U.S. Citizens and Federal Employees),US Office of the Secretary of Transportation,"Washington, DC","$122,530 - $159,286 a year","Duties
Summary
The incumbent serves as an IT Project Manager, responsible for managing relationships with DOT Operating Administrations, OST Offices, and overall projects pertaining to the development of modern, enterprise IT Customer Relationship Management (CRM) applications, systems, solutions, and strategies by leveraging Microsoft Dynamics 365 (D365), Microsoft Office 365 (O365) cloud services, and the Microsoft Power Platform.

Responsibilities
The IT Specialist (Project Manager):

Identifies key business and technology drivers that impact application architectures, such as end-user requirements, existing software distribution capabilities, existing application environment (including legacy and packaged systems), and performance and availability requirements. Develops long and short-range strategies.
coordinates all aspects of the project system, development life cycle, such as the planning, implementation, contracts, budget, communication and operations and maintenance.
Operations, disaster recovery, business process re-engineering, systems analysis methodologies; web-based technologies and solutions; IT planning, project management, systems development methodologies, and document and content management.
Is responsible for a high level of customer service while providing the full range of IT support services to effectively, efficiently, and economically enable the COE to execute its safety mission through the application of modern IT strategies and solutions.
Serves as a senior expert for project and contract management, product evaluation, analysis and management of the implementation of a wide-range of services, related to the work flow based, Customer Relationship Management (CRM) applications, including product and delivery to the customers within the Department.
Develops and implements project and program management plans, tools, templates, and activities. Applies management principles including issue/risk management, program and cost control strategy, quality management, system release process, change control management, and transition management. Translates project requirements into detailed designs to be implemented while balancing needs for immediate action.
Applies management principles including issue/risk management, program and cost control strategy, quality management, system release process, change control management, and transition management. Translates project requirements into detailed designs to be implemented while balancing needs for immediate action.

The ideal candidate is a dynamic project manager versed in the system development life cycle of customer relationship management (CRM) projects and application management. We are looking for an independent, self-starter with excellent organization skills and ability to manage multiple, ongoing priority tasks for highly visible Office of the Chief Information Officer.
Travel Required
Not required
Supervisory status
No
Promotion Potential
14
Job family (Series)
2210 Information Technology Management
Similar jobs
Chief Technology Officers
End-User Support Specialists
Information Systems Managers
Information Technology Project Managers
Information Technology Specialist (It Specialist)
Managers, Information Systems
Requirements

Requirements
Conditions of Employment
You must be a U.S.Citizen and eligible for consideration.
You must meet specialized experience to qualify.
Required documents must be submitted by the closing date.
Submit application and resume online by 11:59 PM EST on the closing date.
CONDITIONS OF EMPLOYMENT:

SELECTIVE SERVICE: Males born after 12/31/1959 must be registered for the Selective Service.
PROBATIONARY PERIOD: You must complete a one-year probationary period (unless already completed).
TIME-IN-GRADE: Federal applicants must have served 52 weeks at the next lower grade in the competitive or excepted service in the executive branch to satisfy time-in-grade restrictions contained in 5 CFR 300, Subpart F.
DEU REQUIREMENTS: Applicants selected under delegated examining procedures may be required to successfully complete a one-year probationary period (unless already completed).

Qualifications
To meet the minimum qualifications for this position, you must meet the specialized experience qualifications requirement.

To qualify for the Grade 14, you must have at least one year of experience equal or equivalent to the GS-13, it must include:

Experience in managing IT Customer Relationship Management (CRM) application or platform for the development, modernization and improvement of business processes.
Experience in implementation of an agency-wide IT application as a shared service within a customer service environment.
Experience in gathering requirements across multiple stakeholders to ensure the integration of business and program directives.

In addition to meeting the above described specialized experience requirements, your IT experience will be evaluated and be expected to include described experience in the following competencies:

Attention to Detail: Work is thorough and conscientious about attending to detail.
Customer Service: Working with clients and customers (that is, any individuals who use or receive the services or products that your work unit produces, including, individuals who work in the agency, other agencies, or organizations outside the Government) to assess their needs, providing information or assistance, assigning staff to resolve their problems, or satisfying their expectations; knowing about available products and services; committed to providing quality products and services.
Oral Communication: Expressing information (for example, ideas or facts) to individuals or groups effectively, taking into account the audience and nature of the information (for example, technical, sensitive, controversial); making clear and convincing oral presentations; listening to others, attending to nonverbal cues, and responding appropriately.
Problem Solving: Identifying problems; determining accuracy and relevance of information; using sound judgment to generate and evaluate alternatives, and making recommendations based on technical requirements.

For all types of consideration, experience refers to paid and unpaid experience, including volunteer work done through National Service programs (e.g., Peace Corps, AmeriCorps) and other organizations (e.g., professional; philanthropic; religious; spiritual; community, student, social). Volunteer work helps build critical competencies, knowledge, and skills and can provide valuable training and experience that translates directly to paid employment. You will receive credit for all qualifying experience, including volunteer experience.

For additional information about applying to Federal positions, please click on the following link: https://www.opm.gov/policy-data-oversight/classification-qualifications/general-schedule-qualification-policies/#url=e4
Education
Additional information
This vacancy may be used by any DOT agency to fill similar positions within 90 days.

FLSA - Exempt
Bargaining Unit 1133

Position Sensitivity - Moderate Risk

The U.S. Department of Transportation strives to ensure that equity, transparency, accountability, collaboration, and communication permeate all that we do for the betterment of the Department, the traveling public, and our nation. As such, DOT values a highly diverse workforce of persons who promote a culture of belonging by respecting the personal dignity and worth of each individual and fostering a positive environment where all feel safe and welcome. If these commitments coincide with your personal ideals and professional aspirations, please consider joining the DOT family.


How You Will Be Evaluated
You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications above.
DESCRIBING YOUR EXPERIENCE: PLEASE BE CLEAR AND SPECIFIC. WE WILL NOT MAKE ASSUMPTIONS REGARDING YOUR EXPERIENCE. If your resume/ application does not support your questionnaire answers, we will not allow credit for your response(s). Your resume must contain sufficiently detailed information upon which to make a qualification determination. Please ensure that your resume contains specific information such as position titles, beginning and ending dates of employment for each position, average number of hours worked per week, and if the position is/was in the Federal government, you should provide the position series and grade level.

To compete with U.S. Citizens: If you meet the qualification requirements, your application will be placed in one of four categories: Platinum, Gold, Silver or Bronze, which is based upon your responses to the vacancy questions. Within these categories, applicants eligible for veteran's preference that have provided supporting documents will receive selection priority over non-veterans. The top rated applications will be reviewed for the quality of your experience, education and training relevant to the position.

To compete with other competitive status government employees: If you meet the qualification requirements, your application will be scored based upon your responses to the vacancy questions. The top rated applications will be reviewed for the quality of your experience, education and training relevant to the position. If referred, all relevant documents including performance appraisals and awards submitted with your application package will be forwarded to the hiring official for review.

Eligible Federal employees also seeking consideration for noncompetitive reassignment for this position, must indicate interest in the assessment. In eligibility question 14: select Yes/Other/Former Incumbency of a Position brought into the Competitive Service. Noncompetitive federal candidates must have competitive status on a SF-50, meet minimum qualifications, have served at the same grade or higher, and held or exceeded the promotion potential of this position.

All applicants: Your application will be rated on the extent and quality of your experience, education and training relevant to the position. The answers you select in the on-line process must be substantiated in your application package. If upon review, it is determined that your described work history, competencies, and/or supporting documents do not support your answer choices, your application may be updated on your behalf or you may not be referred to the selecting official. Please ensure that your work history provides enough details to support your answers. The Automated Staffing Office is ultimately responsible for determining your final rating.

To preview questions please click here.

Background checks and security clearance
Security clearance
Not Required
Drug test required
No
Required Documents

Required Documents
RESUME - All applicants must provide a resume created within USA Jobs Resume Builder, that shows relevant experience, education and support the required specialized experience. Formatted resumes can by uploaded later in the application process.

TRANSCRIPTS are REQUIRED if there is a stated education requirement for the series OR if you are substituting education for experience. The transcripts need not be official, but must show that you meet the stated education requirements, including specific major or class requirements.

If you have already qualified and worked in the federal service in this series, you may provide an SF-50 in lieu of transcripts.

PERFORMANCE APPRAISALS/INCENTIVE AWARDS: If applicable, performance appraisals and/or Incentive award documentation may be submitted and forwarded to the selecting official in consideration of your application. To receive credit, submit a recent performance appraisal (dated within 18 months) showing the official rating of record, signed by a supervisor, or statement why the performance appraisal is unavailable (do not submit a performance plan) and/or incentive award documentation dated within the last 18 months (i.e. performance awards, special act or achievement awards, quality step increases, etc.).

VETERANS: Your last DD214 (member 4 copy), Certificate of Release or Discharge From Active Duty, that shows the type of discharge and all dates of active duty is required to verify your eligibility.

If applying to a vacancy opened to all US Citizens under category rating and wish to be considered as a preference eligible, you need to submit a copy of your DD214 (member-4 copy).
If claiming preference eligibility as a disabled veteran, you must submit proof of entitlement of this preference which is normally a valid letter from the Department of Veterans Affairs certifying to the present existence of the service-connected disability and indicating the percentage of your disability. An SF-15 is desired, but not required.
If applying to a vacancy opened Status and you are requesting consideration under Veteran's Employment Opportunity Act (VEOA) (https://www.fedshirevets.gov/job/shav/#veoa), you need to provide a copy of your last DD214 (member-4 copy), which verifies your military service dates, reason for separation, OR certification of separation that shows a discharge date within 120 days of the closing of this announcement, and eligibility for consideration under the Veterans Employment Opportunity Act.

FEDERAL APPLICANTS: You must submit SF-50(s) that verify your highest competitive grade, full performance level, and eligibility as a federal applicant. DO NOT submit an award SF-50 as these often do not verify grade or eligibility. For consideration for a promotion, Box 4 of the SF-50 must show a date that is at least 52 weeks prior to the job announcement closing. We recommend submitting your last promotion SF-50, current SF-50 or within-grade increase SF-50. Pay adjustment raise SF-50s for the current year will not support the 52 weeks’ time-in-grade requirements. https://www.usajobs.gov/Help/working-in-government/service/SF-50/

NON COMPETITIVE APPLICANTS: If requesting concurrent consideration for Non-competitive (NC) appointment eligibility, you must provide the appropriate SPECIAL APPOINTING AUTHORITY DOCUMENTS, such as PCS orders (military spouse) describing move & marriage certificate; letter from VA or DD214 describing 100% disability of spouse; letter from State Vocational Office certifying disability (schedule A), etc. For more information, visit military spouse NC appointments or Persons with Disabilities NC appointments.

DISPLACED EMPLOYEES: If requesting consideration under the Career Transition Assistance Program (CTAP) or Interagency CTAP program (ICTAP), you must meet the well qualified standards for this vacancy (meeting minimum requirements for position and scoring at least an 85 or falling in the Gold Category) and provide all of the following documents:

your most recent performance appraisal,
the proof of eligibility letter from the Agency, and
your most current SF-50, displaying current series and grade.

Displaced employees may be eligible for ICTAP or CTAP priority consideration. For more information, please review the OPM Employee's Guide to Career Transition.

Failure to submit any of the required documents by the closing date of the vacancy will result in your removal from consideration for this position. Please review your application prior to final submission and ensure you have submitted all appropriate documents. Uploading documents to USAJobs does NOT ensure inclusion with your application to our system. You must verify that the documents are in the system with your application prior to final submission.
If you are relying on your education to meet qualification requirements:
Education must be accredited by an accrediting institution recognized by the U.S. Department of Education in order for it to be credited towards qualifications. Therefore, provide only the attendance and/or degrees from schools accredited by accrediting institutions recognized by the U.S. Department of Education.
Failure to provide all of the required information as stated in this vacancy announcement may result in an ineligible rating or may affect the overall rating.
Benefits

Benefits
A career with the U.S. Government provides employees with a comprehensive benefits package. As a federal employee, you and your family will have access to a range of benefits that are designed to make your federal career very rewarding. Opens in a new windowLearn more about federal benefits.
Review our benefits
Eligibility for benefits depends on the type of position you hold and whether your position is full-time, part-time, or intermittent. Contact the hiring agency for more information on the specific benefits offered.
Help
This job is open to
Individuals with disabilities
Federal employees - Competitive service
Current or former competitive service federal employees.
Career transition (CTAP, ICTAP, RPL)
Federal employees who meet the definition of a ""surplus"" or ""displaced"" employee.
Military spouses
Family of overseas employees
Family members of a federal employee or uniformed service member who is, or was, working overseas.
Peace Corps & AmeriCorps Vista
The public
U.S. citizens, nationals or those who owe allegiance to the U.S.
Special authorities
Individuals eligible under a special authority not listed above, but defined in the federal hiring regulations.
Veterans
Clarification from the agency
Open to current and former Federal employees with competitive status, VEOA Applicants, AND All U.S. Citizens.",767,Washington
38,IT Support Specialist,Deloitte,"Arlington, VA",None,"Are you looking to make an immediate impact where you can help our clients solve their business challenges? Deloitte's Core Business Operations (CBO) portfolio operates at the center of our client's business. By joining our team, you could help C-suite and program leaders transform their organization and accelerate mission execution through emerging and disruptive technologies, innovative business models, retooled program operations and industry-driven solutions.
Work you'll do
Seeking an IT Support Specialist to provide exceptional support to an organization of 300+ clients, focusing on Security+, IAO Express, Active Directory, Office 365, and general customer IT support issues:
Strong working knowledge of all Microsoft Office 365 products and of the other apps on the Air Force standard desktop image, the Office client, Adobe, etc.
Use of IAO Express - used to add/remove security groups; also very useful in resolving a variety of account issues.
Understanding of Active Directory security groups.
Working with DoD CACs and associated IT access implications.
Identifying the different CAC certificates and their purposes.
An understanding of general systems design is very helpful. When troubleshooting unfamiliar issues knowing how various systems work together in general is often more helpful than familiarity with a specific system.


The team
Deloitte's Government and Public Services (GPS) practice - our people, ideas, technology and outcomes-is designed for impact. Serving federal, state, & local government clients as well as public higher education institutions, our team of over 15,000+ professionals brings fresh perspective to help clients anticipate disruption, reimagine the possible, and fulfill their mission promise.
The Systems Engineering offering is comprised of experienced professionals who help guide clients through their most complex technology challenges. This can include the delivery of large scale software applications & integrated systems, the development of service-oriented architecture (SOA) and other integrations solutions, and the delivery of technology enablement to support CIO services transformation. Our Systems Engineering offering focuses on key client issues that impact the core business, provide operational value, drive down the cost of quality, and enhance technology innovation.
Qualifications
Required:

Professional experience with executive-level IT helpdesk and expertise with MS Office Suite
Must be legally authorized to work in the United States without the need for employer sponsorship, now or at any time in the future
Active Secret security clearance required
CompTIA Sec+ certification
Preferred:
Prior staff experience with the DoD or any other strategic-level staff
Experience with stakeholder analysis and management
Customer service - good interpersonal skills are essential
Excellent communication skills, both planning and execution of written and verbal communication
Detail orientation, and comfort with Executive Leaders
How you'll grow
At Deloitte, our professional development plan focuses on helping people at every level of their career to identify and use their strengths to do their best work every day. From entry-level employees to senior leaders, we believe there's always room to learn. We offer opportunities to help sharpen skills in addition to hands-on experience in the global, fast-changing business world. From on-the-job learning experiences to formal development programs, our professionals have a variety of opportunities to continue to grow throughout their career.",767,Washington
39,Senior Security Specialist II (Derivative Classification),Advantage SCI,"Washington, DC",None,"Job Level : Any
Job Type : Full-Time/Regular
Date Updated : 12/21/2020
Years of Experience : Not Applicable
Job Description
Senior Security Specialist II Functional Responsibility:

This security function concerns primarily the classification, declassification, and protection of classified national defense and other sensitive information originated or controlled by Federal agencies. It is concerned with identifying information requiring protection and designating the level of protection required. Such information (documents, materials, devices, industrial processes, systems, etc.) is commonly contained within Federal facilities and systems.
Duties include developing, implementing, and monitoring policies, instructions, procedures, control systems, and methods for such functions and activities as: delegation and exercise of classification and declassification authority; development of classification guides, document marking, safeguarding, and use; personnel access controls; need to know criteria; physical storage and control; security education; and transmitting, transferring, reproducing, downgrading, and destroying information. Specialists also perform oversight reviews to monitor program implementation and practices in those areas by lower echelons and other supported organizations. Performance of this work commonly requires coordination with scientific, technical, and other subject-matter specialists to assess risk of loss, value of loss, and the classification level appropriate to information sensitivity.
Conduct Security Compliance Review Inspections

Comply with DHS/I&A procedures for the generation, processing, handling, and disposition of classified, unclassified, and sensitive information.
Review material for proper classification and protective markings.
Provide Bi-Weekly Derivative Classification Training.
Review operational procedures for the handling and disposition for classified and sensitive information.
Provide recommendation to I&A Security management on resolving identified deficiencies during Security Compliance Inspections
Support the security training and education program and serve as the Assistant Operational Security (OPSEC) coordinator.

Experience and Skills
Minimum/General Experience:

Undergraduate degree in security related discipline is preferred:
Five (5) to Seven (7) years personnel security related experience
Working knowledge of DNI Intelligence Community Directives (ICD) and Director, Central Intelligence Directives (DCID) and Executive Orders 13526;
Must be proficient with Microsoft Office applications;
Attention to detail, strong follow-through skills, and ability to maintain confidentiality;
Must possess excellent written and oral communications skills;
Must have excellent organizational skills, and the ability to work independently and as a member of the team; and
Travel within the NCR required (must have a valid driver’s license and personal vehicle; travel outside the NCR once or twice a year)
Ability to work in a fast-paced environment to meet deadlines and handle pressure situations is a must.

Mandatory Requirement:

Applicants selected for this position will be subject to a Government Security Investigation and must meet eligibility for access to classified information, (qualify for DHS Suitability) Top Secret/SCI clearance level.
Prepare material for employee security programs to include scripts, visual aids, handouts, and bulletins in both hard and soft-copy versions.
Research government requirements and guidelines for classified, unclassified, and sensitive information.
Comply with DHS/I&A procedures for the generation, processing, handling, and disposition of classified, unclassified, and sensitive information.
Coordinate security services provided to the State, local, tribal and territorial partners.
Ensure security priorities in support of the State and Local Program Office and the Homeland Secure Data Network (HSDN) Deployment contractor are in compliance with agency-wide policy standards.
Working Conditions:
Able to sit and work at a computer keyboard for extended periods of time
Able to stoop, kneel, bend at the waist and reach on a daily basis
Able to lift up to 35 pounds occasionally.
Able to walk long distance
Noise level: Low to moderate",767,Washington
40,Senior Integrated Logistics Support (ILS) Specialist,Archimedes Global,"Washington, DC 20001 (Shaw area)",None,"Archimedes Global is currently recruiting an Integrated Logistics Support Specialist to join our team in Washington, DC.

The selected individual will:
Perform Integrated Logistics Support (ILS) activities for the LRS Program, to include planning, scheduling, coordinating and estimating complex tasks associated with products or services (e.g., design, development, acquisition and maintenance) required to ensure that the C-130 aircraft, mission system, and associated equipment achieve the required readiness and sustainability posture at an affordable life cycle cost
Develop/ensure requirements and implementation strategies comply with USCG logistics directives and supportability parameters
Perform and coordinate detailed analysis to ensure integration support considerations into the planning and/or design process
Evaluate logistics deliverables for technical adequacy
Support development of logistics acquisition milestone requirements and associated procurements for C-130 logistics materials and/or services
Required Qualifications:
Bachelor’s degree and 3+ years of experience required (5yrs of experience may be used in lieu of degree)
NACI clearance required; Secret preferred
Desired Qualifications:
5+ years of experience
2+ years of experience in a C-130 depot-level maintenance environment performing aircraft upgrades and maintenance
Experience in Coast Guard (CG) procedures (CG aeronautical practices as defined in Commandant Instruction Manual CIM 13020.1 (series), utilizing FedLog, Asset Computerized Maintenance System (ACMS), Asset Logistics Management Information System (ALMIS), and Asset Maintenance Management Information System (AMMIS))
Secret security clearance
Archimedes Global, Inc. is a diversified technology company providing information and engineering solutions to government and businesses worldwide. Archimedes delivers superior results by combining deep domain expertise with technology-enabled innovations. We are proud to offer highly competitive compensation packages and outstanding benefits. If you feel you have what it takes, turn your interest into action & apply now!",767,Washington
41,Contract Support Specialist,"BlueForce, Inc.","Washington, DC 20002 (Kingman Park area)","$95,000 a year","Contract Support Specialist
Washington, D.C.

Contract Support Specialist
United States Department of State
INL/EX/GAPP office at State Annex (SA-01), Columbia Plaza,
2401 E St., NW Washington, DC

Requires: A Secret security clearance is required for this position; however, the candidate may begin work with an interim Secret security clearance.

BlueForce is seeking a qualified candidate to fill a position as a Contract Support Specialist to support the Bureau of International Narcotics and Law Enforcement Affairs’ INL’s Executive Office, Grants, Acquisitions, Procurement, and Policy (INL/EX/GAPP) Division.

The U.S. Department of State is the lead institution for the conduct of American diplomacy and the Secretary of State is the President’s principal foreign policy advisor. The Department of State’s mission is to advance U.S. national security interests, fight terrorism, protect U.S. interests abroad, and implement foreign policy initiatives that build a freer, prosperous and secure world.

INL keeps Americans safe at home by countering international crime, illegal drugs, and instability abroad. INL helps countries deliver justice and fairness by strengthening their police, courts, and corrections systems. These efforts reduce the amount of crime and illegal drugs reaching U.S. shores.

INL’s Executive Office, Grants, Acquisitions, Procurement, and Policy (INL/EX/GAPP) Division oversees the implementing mechanisms required to advance the Bureau’s foreign assistance objectives. INL/EX/GAPP includes the following sections: the Bilateral Letters of Agreement (LOA's) and Inter-Agency Agreements (IAAs) Unit, which consists of Analysts with regional and functional portfolios providing analytical and subject matter expertise related to development, formulation and oversight; the Grants Unit, which includes Grants Officers (GO) and Specialists with regional and functional portfolios executing Federal Assistance awards to provide funding opportunities for grants and cooperative agreements, in addition to executing property and travel grants; and the Contracts Unit, consisting of Contracting Officers (CO) and Specialists providing a variety of services pertaining to the planning, development and execution of service and commodity contracts, as well as Third Party Contracts (TPCs) and Personal Service Contracts (PSCs).

Duties and Responsibilities:
Contract Management:
Performs all cradle-to-grave contracting activities.
Provides guidance and training to program personnel involved in the development of procurement request packages.
Provides guidance to junior and mid-level contract management personnel in the development of procurement request packages; to include but not limited to goods and services scope of work, IGCE, inherently governmental (DS-4208) and risk mitigation plans, market research, acquisition plans both formal and informal and any other documents associated with the procurement package.
Provides guidance and training to other members of the GAPP Contracts Team.
Assists in identifying various strategic sourcing efforts and category management efforts to streamline the GAPP contracting lifecycle.
Aids in the formulation of the contracting approach to be taken that will best satisfy the requirement.
Advertises procurements, ensures that the procurement schedule is structured properly, prepares solicitations, sources to be solicited, determines the responsiveness of quotes and proposals and determines the responsibility of the apparent successful offeror based on an analysis of financial and technical information gained, and recommends award of the contract. Final determination and findings shall be forwarded to the INL CO for review and approval/action.
Under the direction and oversight of the INL CO, provides guidance in the development of the statement of work and data requirements, determines the type of contract best suited to the requirement, and develops special clauses, terms, and conditions applicable to the solicitation. Determines the sources to be solicited, receives, initially evaluates proposals using price/cost analysis, and responds to initial inquiries from vendors. Final determination and findings shall be forwarded to the INL CO for review and approval/action.
Performs market analysis to determine availability of the product or producers and service providers.
Assesses the impact of socioeconomic considerations on the procurement actions.
Aids in the development of solicitations by assisting with the determination of quantities to be included in a solicitation based on economic order quantities, market conditions, delivery requirements, production capabilities, required specifications, and pre-award samples. Supports the INL CO with establishing specific contract language and clauses, selecting the appropriate type of contract, coordinating with socio-economic specialists relative to INL programs, setting minimum or maximum order limitations, choosing the transportation and delivery types, and selecting the appropriate publication and distribution of solicitations. When not working directly with the INL CO, final determination and findings shall be forwarded to the INL CO for review and approval/action.
Determines if cost and price data submitted by offerors to support direct costs, indirect costs, and fee or profit are fair and reasonable. Final determination and findings shall be forwarded to the INL CO for review and approval/action.
Recommends award for review and action by the INL CO and follows through on all award documentation and post-award administration activities.
Outreach/Customer Service:
Responds in a timely manner to requests for information.
Interacts positively and works cooperatively with team members and points of contact to accomplish assigned work in a timely and efficient manner.
Establishes strong interpersonal relationships through excellent customer service skills, project management knowledge, and a related understanding of program offices’ unique needs and mandates.
Works closely with INL program office staff and managers, as well as the stakeholders at US embassies overseas and within other US federal agencies, to provide support on training initiatives.
Takes proactive measures and makes recommendations to improve the working environment and build teamwork.
Seeks to accomplish tasks in a manner that reduces the burden on senior management and be receptive to training and critique of work output.
Provides reports to program office stakeholders on the status of activities and makes substantive recommendations to help meet the specific requirements of assigned program offices.
Complies with all appropriate regulations, internal controls, management direction and SOPs as well as Bureau conventions to protect organizational integrity and prevent unauthorized use or misappropriation of all classified and sensitive (but unclassified) material and equipment in assigned areas; report security violations/problems to appropriate authority.
Minimum Qualifications:
U.S. Citizen.
A Bachelor's degree from an accredited institution and two to ten years’ experience at the equivalent GS-12 or higher level; or an Associate's degree from an accredited institution and a minimum of ten years’ experience at the equivalent GS-12 or higher level.
Proficient in Microsoft Office Suite.
Strong multi-tasking and organizational skills.
Excellent interpersonal and customer service skills; prior experience conducting research.
Preferred Qualifications:
Demonstrated knowledge of contracting procedures, types, and methods, including formal advertising, negotiation, fixed-price, cost contracting, and use of special provisions and incentives to enable the buyer to plan and carry out contracting assignments.
Demonstrated knowledge of cost and price procedures/techniques to evaluate offers and responsibility of contractors on the basis of competition, historical costs, reports from auditors or technical specialists, contractor cost breakdowns regarding labor, materials, overhead, and profit, or other evaluation criteria and selection processes where the information is usually available.
Demonstrated ability to communicate effectively, both orally and in writing, to prepare and present information for senior level briefings, develop and interpret policies and guidelines, defend recommendations, and resolve problems.
Demonstrated ability to interact effectively with individuals at all levels to assist in the planning and coordination of activities with other organizations; provide guidance, and advocate INL policies and positions in close coordination with INL leadership.
Demonstrated superior organization skills and ability to manage multiple concurrent activities of varying complexity, including changing priorities and short turn-around times.
Demonstrated proficiency in computer and web-based applications including Microsoft Office Suite and Adobe Acrobat.
Demonstrated ability to provide excellent customer service with all levels of management.
Demonstrated experience with and knowledge of INL or USAID programs, mission, and foreign assistance activities.
Demonstrated familiarity with Department of State (DOS) Standardized document format, and DOS systems.
Demonstrated familiarity with Department of State Acquisition Regulations (DOSAR).
Demonstrated knowledge of the Department of State Standardized Regulation (DSSR), and Federal Travel Regulations (FTR).
Demonstrated knowledge of the DOS Global Financial Management System (GFMS)-Momentum and Regional Financial Management System (RFMS)-Momentum.
BlueForce, Inc., is an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability status, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.
BLUEFORCE IS AN EQUAL OPPORTUNITY, AFFIRMATIVE ACTION EMPLOYER",767,Washington
42,Systems Administrator,DAn Solutions,"Springfield, VA",None,"REQUIRES AN ACTIVE TS/SCI WITH CI POLYGRAPH
*** TELEWORK IS NOT AN OPTION. Candidate must report to the work site ***


The System Administrator (SA) is responsible for effective provisioning, installation/configuration, operation, and maintenance of systems hardware and software and related infrastructure. This individual ensures that system hardware, operating systems, software systems, and related procedures adhere to organizational values, enabling mission success.
We seek to build a team of system administrators who can perform multiple functions. We understand that people have specialties, but seek people open to cross training and willing to apply their skills in multiple areas.

Qualified individuals will have experience in one or more of the following areas:

Desktop Image ManagementVirtual Desktop Infrastructure (VDI) Support ServicesHome Directory and Profile Support ServicesPrint, Fax and Scan Support Services
Unified Communications Support ServicesE-mail Support ServicesDesktop Software Support ServicesDesktop Entity Support ServicesDomain ServicesDirectory, Authentication and Account Mgmt- O&S - Expanded 12x5Domain Name ServicesDynamic Host Configuration Protocol (DHCP)Patch Management (Windows)
Operations and Support
Perform daily system monitoring, verifying the integrity and availability of all hardware, server resources, systems and key processes, reviewing system and application logs, and verifying completion of scheduled jobs such as backups.Perform regular security monitoring to identify any possible intrusions.Perform daily backup operations, ensuring all required file systems and system data are successfully backed up to the appropriate media, recovery tapes or disks are created, and media is recycled and sent off site as necessary.Perform regular file archival and purge as necessary.Create, change, and delete user accounts per request.Provide Tier II & III/other support per request from various constituencies. Investigate and troubleshoot issues.Repair and recover from hardware or software failures. Coordinate and communicate with impacted constituencies.MaintenanceApply OS patches and upgrades on a regular basis, and upgrade administrative tools and utilities. Configure / add new services as necessary.Upgrade and configure system software that supports GIS infrastructure applications or Asset Management applications per project or operational needs.Maintain operational, configuration, or other procedures.Perform periodic performance reporting to support capacity planning.Perform ongoing performance tuning, hardware upgrades, and resource optimization as required. Configure CPU, memory, and disk partitions as required.Create and maintain documentation to help train employees resolve day to day issues and knowledge transfer.Identify and execute process improvements and other enhancements that improve operational efficiency.
KNOWLEDGE/SKILLS:
Security +Meet the qualifications of one of the customer specified levels (0-4)

COMMUNICATIONS/INTERPERSONAL CONTACTS:

Interpret and/or discuss information with others, which involves terminology or concepts not familiar to many people; regularly provide advice and recommend actions involving rather complex issues. May resolve problems within established practices.

Primary Responsibilities
Provide PC, telephone, voice and video conference support. Quickly respond to customer issues regarding application/hardware related issues, and resolve on the spot problems.

Other duties include:
Unpacking and setting up PCsInstalling PC operating systems via scripted install packages
Installing application software on PCs via scripted install packagesProviding basic user support for the software; PC, telephone and video troubleshooting when operation errors occurProviding limited support related to microcomputer networks and providing user training in basic hardware and software functions.Performs all administration involved with PC (desktop/notebooks) distribution
Performing inventory on software and computer stock and making request for order or ordering new equipmentPerforms service center technology support which may include duties such as installing an IP phone, installing COTS – GOTS software using scripts and install packages, service center technology trouble shooting when operation errors occurWorking closely with other members of Service Operations team, Service Design and Service Transition personnel and other IT technical and applications staff.Supporting network and locally attached printersUse of the Support Center ticket database to track, update and close tickets.Creating and maintaining documentation to help train employees in resolving day-to-day issues and knowledge transfer.
Identify and execute process improvements and other enhancements that improve operational efficiency.

Basic Qualifications

Security+Must currently possess a TS/SCI with Poly to be consideredEducation/Minimum Years Experience:
 HS/GED + 12 years experience
 Associates + 10 years experience
 
Bachelors + 8 years experience


Skills & Tasks: Simple - follows established processes and checklists. Understand sand applies basic concepts. Assists more senior level technicians, specialists, and managers in their activities.
Individual Work / Teamwork or Leadership / Management: Individual Work/Teamwork - Works individually and also as team participant
Guidance:Requires moderate guidance and direction from more senior level technicians, specialists, and/or managers
Education/Min Years Experience: HS/GED - 4 years experience, Associates - 2 years experience, Bachelors - 0 years experience",767,Washington
43,Computer Security Specialist: A&A/RMF,General Dynamics Information Technology,"Arlington, VA",None,"Travel Required: Less than 10%
Requisition Type: Pipeline
GDIT is seeking a Security Computer Specialist: A&A/RMF to provide services to the JSP Enterprise Transport Management contract at the Pentagon, Arlington VA.
This position is contingent upon contract funding.
In this role, you will apply your understanding of computer security, military system specifications, and Department of Defense Information Assurance (DoD) (IA) policies, in the execution of all aspects of the systems and their Cybersecurity posture. This position is responsible for execution of the DoD Information Assurance Risk Management Framework (DIARMF), and the implementation of Cyber Security and IA boundary defense techniques, various IA-enabled network technologies and appliances to facilitate certification and security engineering tasks in support of the customer.
You will partner with IT Security Analysts and Enterprise Architects to establish, understand, and adhere to technical and IT security standards. Involved in all aspects of the technology life-cycle to ensure that non-functional and functional requirements are adhered to in design and build so solutions are stable, secure, resilient, and perform well. This position will work under general supervision to provide Cybersecurity engineering documentation services to build secure technical documentation for applications, systems, architectures, and infrastructure that are operationally viable and efficient.
Providing mid-level Assessment and Authorization support, you will lead the manual and application-based STIG evaluations for the network enterprise. This position will be responsible to plan, develop, and execute automated and manual tests to validate security posture/controls in accordance with DOD 8500.2/8510.01. This position will work directly with teams that support DoD Information Assurance Certification and Accreditation (DIACAP) and Risk Management Framework (RMF). You may also be tasked to engage the JSP CA Liaisons, SCA Reviewers, and ISSMs to discuss and obtain mitigation guidance. A typical day in this position will include:
Author DoD IA Assessment and Authorization (A&A) artifacts.
Document a system from an IA perspective
Derive, document and/or identify system CONOPS for Mission Assurance Categorization per DoDI 8500.2
Lead the research, recommend and document logical and physical solutions that prevent, detect, and correct the system to be certified and accredited
Research and apply DISA Security Technical Implementation Guides (STIGs) and NSA recommendations
Lead the identification of disagreements between as built specifications, security requirements and DoD security policies and design implementations to bring the system into compliance.
Plan, develop, execute, and document results of security test procedures
Lead the preparation and execution an Information Assurance Vulnerability Management (IAVM) Plan
Lead the preparation and production of a System Security Plan (SSP) and Plan Of Action and Milestones (POA&M)
Lead the technical support effort in identifying and specifying requirements and performing risk assessments
Lead or Develop Standard Operating Procedures (SOP)
Ensure IT solutions meet requirements for security, availability, capacity, resiliency, and performance in a way that is efficient and supportable, reducing overall support costs
Understand industry leading solutions and trends for assigned technologies and applying those as appropriate
Understand business needs and partnering with appropriate IT counterparts to recommend technology solutions
Establish and maintain an IT multi-year strategy with a focus on continuous improvement. Create and maintain solutions architecture artifacts and other strategy and system documentation
Use tools such as Host Based Security System (HBSS), Assured Compliance Assessment Solution (ACAS), Junos Space, Cisco Prime and Cisco Adaptive Security Appliance
Assist the government with input, instructions, and guidance as needed for the creation of adequate package documentation and artifacts.
Develop and present briefings to technical and senior management audiences and communicate assessment results, risk analyses, mitigation strategies, and forward plans
Required Skills:
Active Secret Security clearance
Computing environment certification – Examples include Linux+, RHCSA, RHCE, RHCSS (Other Examples – MCSE Server 2012, MCSA Server 2012, MCSE Productivity, Linux+, RHCSA, RHCE, RHCSS, LPIC-1, LPIC-2, Novell Certified Linux Engineer, Oracle Solaris System Administrator (OCA, OCP or OCF), GCUX, BSDA, CSE – Specialty in Networking and Security – HP-UX, etc.)
Certification meeting IAT Level II or Level III or IAM Level II or Level III – Department Of Defense Instruction (DODI) 8570/8140 compliance. (Examples – Security+ CE, SSCP, GSEC, CISSP, CISA, CASP, CISM, GSLC, CAP, CASP, CISM)
Degree in a Computer Science, Engineering or Information Technology related field is desired but not required. Bachelors degree in Information Technology/Systems or experience. Masters degree preferred
5 years of experience in information technology
Experience with performing both manual AND tool performed STIGs
Experience with computer networking and telecommunication architecture, the OSI model, and communications protocols
Experience in collaborating with multiple technical teams to drive solutions that requirement driven including technical subject matter experts, including hardware and software designers, operations personnel, and test engineers and communicate potential security risks and mitigations
Experience in organizing and coordinating deployments of complex systems
Experience with OS Tier 2 Support in heterogeneous operating system environments (Linux, Windows)
A working knowledge of deployment methodologies and tooling
Experience using Microsoft Office including MS Visio, MS Word, MS Excel and other appropriate tools.
Experience with DoD Certification and Accreditation (C&A) process, DoD Authorization & Accreditation including familiarity with Risk Management Framework (RMF) and the process to obtain an Authority to Operate (ATO)
Strong English communication skills with ability to communicate clearly and succinctly in written and oral presentations
Desired Skills:
Department of Defense Security Clearance of TS/SCI.
Knowledge of multiple database architectures: Cisco, Oracle, Linux, Windows, and VMWare
1-year lead experience in information technology, preferred
Experience in coordination of;
Management Networks
Out Of Band Management
Joint Regional Security Stack (JRSS) implementation
Production Monitoring Environments
Experience in ITIL framework
Conducting internal security reviews/audits of responsible government systems
We are GDIT. The people supporting some of the most complex government, defense, and intelligence projects across the country. We deliver. Bringing the expertise needed to understand and advance critical missions. We transform. Shifting the ways clients invest in, integrate, and innovate technology solutions. We ensure today is safe and tomorrow is smarter. We are there. On the ground, beside our clients, in the lab, and everywhere in between. Offering the technology transformations, strategy, and mission services needed to get the job done.

GDIT is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or veteran status, or any other protected class.",767,Washington
44,Audit Specialist,World Bank Group,"Washington, DC 20433 (Foggy Bottom area)",None,"Job #: req12258

Organization: World Bank

Sector: Audit

Grade: GF

Term Duration: 4 years 0 months

Recruitment Type: International Recruitment

Location: Washington, DC,United States

Required Language(s): English

Preferred Language(s):

Closing Date: 6/18/2021 (MM/DD/YYYY) at 11:59pm UTC

Description

Do you want to build a career that is truly worthwhile? Working at the World Bank Group provides a unique opportunity for you to help our clients solve their greatest development challenges. The World Bank Group is one of the largest sources of funding and knowledge for developing countries; a unique global partnership of five institutions dedicated to ending extreme poverty, increasing shared prosperity and promoting sustainable development. With 189 member countries and more than 120 offices worldwide, we work with public and private sector partners, investing in groundbreaking projects and using data, research, and technology to develop solutions to the most urgent global challenges. For more information, visit www.worldbank.org.
The mission of Group Internal Audit (GIA) is to protect and enhance the value of the World Bank Group (WBG) by providing independent, objective and insightful risk-based assurance and advice. GIA provides an independent view on whether processes for managing and controlling risks to achieve the WBG's goals, and overall governance of these processes, are adequately designed and functioning effectively. GIA works across all WBG institutions, covering all operational and corporate functions as well as IT systems and processes.
GIAVP is headed by the Vice President and Auditor General (AG), who is responsible for setting the mission and vision, building strong partnerships with Senior Management and the Audit Committee, and providing value-adding assurance and advisory services that would meet the institution’s needs. The Director, Strategy and Operations is responsible for supporting the AG in the effective and efficient development and execution of GIA’s work program. The Engagement Managers in GIA report to the Director and are responsible for the development and delivery of the GIA work program by leading staff auditors. Audit Specialists typically support Audit Supervisors, who lead individual engagements as the Auditor-in-Charge, and report to Engagement Managers.

SCOPE & ACCOUNTABILITIES
The Audit Specialist within the Information Technology (IT) team will be a member of the internal audit team and will be expected to participate in the execution and delivery of assurance and advisory engagements covering IT and Data Management processes and key strategic initiatives of the Bank, IFC, MIGA and ICSID. The Audit Specialist works closely with Staff and Auditors-in-Charge in the course of developing and executing GIA’s risk-based work program. The Audit Specialist will functionally report to the IT Program Manager and administratively to the Director, Strategy and Operations, who will jointly be responsible for mentoring, performance evaluation and overall learning and professional development.
Note: If the selected candidate is a current Bank Group staff member with a Regular or Open-Ended appointment, s/he will retain his/her Regular or Open-Ended appointment. All others will be offered a 5 -year renewable term appointment.

The World Bank Group is committed to achieving diversity in terms of gender, nationality, culture and educational background. Individuals with disabilities are equally encouraged to apply. All applications will be treated in the strictest confidence.

Roles & Responsibilities:
The successful candidate will have the following responsibilities:Work with Audit Supervisors in planning, executing and reporting on individual engagements in GIA’s risk-based work program, delivering results with the highest focus on quality, strategic impact and efficiency;Works closely with Audit Supervisors to support dynamic risk assessment and development of GIA’s work program;Supports multiple engagements concurrently across a range of WBG’s IT and Data Management processes;Execute major components of audits including critical technology functions, cloud-based infrastructure, emerging technology, cybersecurity, risk management, application, and data protection/privacy management, as well as in some cases lead small to medium size audits.Assists the Audit Supervisors in performing risk assessments of business units and technology operations, design and execute audit procedures to verify the effectiveness of existing controls, identify and define issues, review and analyze evidence, and document client processes and procedures.Develop process descriptions and key control narratives that can be leveraged for future reviews;Develop audit plans and perform tests of controls documented in a Risk and Control Matrices (RCM);Assist the Audit Supervisors in coordinating and conducting client interviews and securing evidence from clients to support engagement procedures;Summarize test results, identify and document issues for assurance engagements and develop recommendations for advisory reviews;Follow-up on the implementation of Management Action Plans relating to open and overdue issues raised by GIA and document the implementation status;Engage closely with key clients and stakeholders, under the guidance of the Audit Supervisors, to successfully execute the relevant engagements.Lead and coordinate integrated IT systems and application audit work as IT audit team focal point for assigned business process engagements.Support the identification of data analytics objectives and procedures for assigned engagements; including the acquisition, validation and normalization of the data, analyzing data and documenting and reporting the data analytics results.Deliver appropriate, succinct and organized information, tailoring communication style to audience.Establishes and maintains good client relations during engagements. Communicates or assists in communicating the results of some audit projects to management via written reports and oral presentations.Identify expectations of the client and take actions to support the client experience.Prepare clear, organized and complete documentation to support work performed.Gather risk information relevant to the WBG and share risk information with GIA management and staff.Self-prioritize and effectively plan own work activities managing multiple priorities and tasks across the team to deliver quality results.Coordinate with others and proactively take on additional workProvide ongoing coaching and mentoring to Audit Analysts to support staff learning and professional growth.
Selection Criteria
Master's degree in relevant field, e.g., Management Information Systems, Computer Science, Information and Communication Technology and Business Administration, or equivalent (bachelor’s degree with 10+ years of relevant experience will be considered)Certifications related to Technology or Auditing, such as Cloud provider certifications, Certified Internal Auditor (CIA), Certified Information Systems Auditor (CISA), Certified Information Systems Security Professional (CISSP), or Certified Information Security Manager (CISM)A minimum of 8 years' relevant experience or equivalent combination, preferably in financial institutions, international organizations, or similar environment. Audit/Consulting experience with Big 4 Firms is highly desired. Preferred qualifications include:
a. 5+ years of experience with IT control frameworks;
b. 2+ years of experience in planning and leading audits
c. 1+ years of conducting audits of controls in cloud-based environments or emerging technologies such as RPA, IoT and AI;Experience applying technical knowledge in at least one of the following areas: IT operations, network operations or security audits and/or ERP security and control reviews (Oracle, SAP, PeopleSoft). Knowledge of networks technology, operating systems, midrange platforms, personal computers, system development, client/server architecture;Experience in utilizing data analysis in support of internal auditing, presenting results, and drawing conclusions to provide insights into engagement with supervision and guidance. Develop logical viewpoint based on analysis and show the thought process used to arrive at conclusions;Experience in leading IT integrated, application reviews and system development life-cycle audits;High proficiency in MS Office Suite and in creating effective Power Point Presentations.
Proven track record in internal audit delivery in large, complex, multinational financial services or international organizations. A strong understanding of internal audit practices and procedures, and demonstrated ability to understand, analyze and interpret data using widely used tools like Excel, Business Intelligence, Tableau, etc.;

Excellent analytical, organizational, and communications skills; ability to successfully manage high priority projects with a variety of stakeholders, and deliver high quality work;

Excellent partnering skills and stakeholder management. The successful candidates need to successfully navigate the organization, build strong relationships, and work collaboratively with internal clients;
Effective oral and written communications skills, with ability to effectively prepare, present and discuss findings in written and oral form to convey complex ideas in an engaging manner with clarity, diplomacy and precision. Highly proficient in English, both speaking and writing;
Unquestionable ethics and integrity; Demonstrates personal integrity and adheres to professional principles, values and ethics; and
Proactive and innovative, with an open and collegial work style with ability to listen and integrate ideas from diverse views, create partnerships and collaborate with others.

Core Competencies

Lead and Innovate - Develops innovative solutions. Contributes new insights to understand situations and develops solutions to resolve complex problems. Adapts as circumstances require and manages impact of own behavior on others in context of WBG’s values and mission. Identifies and pursues innovative approaches to resolve issuesDeliver Results for Clients - Proactively addresses clients’ stated and unstated needs. Adds value by constantly looking for a better way to get more impactful results; sets challenging stretch goals for oneself. Immerses oneself in client experiences and perspective by asking probing questions to understand unmet needs. Demonstrates accountability for achieving results that have a development impact and financial, environmental and social sustainability. Identifies and proposes solutions to mitigate and manage risks.Collaborate within Teams and Across Boundaries -Collaborates across boundaries, gives own perspective and willingly receives diverse perspectives. Appropriately involves others in decision making and communicates with key stakeholders. Approaches conflicts as common problems to be solved. Actively seeks and considers diverse ideas and approaches displaying a sense of mutuality and respect. Integrates WBG perspective into work.Create, Apply and Share Knowledge - Applies knowledge across WBG to strengthen solutions for internal and/or external clients. Leverages department’s expertise and body of knowledge across WBG to strengthen internal and/or external client solutions. Seeks to learn from more experienced staff to deepen or strengthen their professional knowledge and helps others to learn. Builds personal and professional networks inside and outside the department unit.Make Smart Decisions - Interprets a wide range of information and pushes to move forward. Seeks diversity of information and inputs, researches possible solutions, and generates recommended options. Identifies and understands risks and proposes recommendations. Based on risk analysis makes decisions in a timely manner within own area of responsibility, considering the interests and concerns of stakeholders.
Poverty has no borders, neither does excellence. We succeed because of our differences and we continuously search for qualified individuals with diverse backgrounds from around the globe.",767,Washington
45,Senior Helpdesk Specialist,Fulcrum Vets,"Springfield, VA",None,"To submit your resume into our staffing database, please forward a copy to: Careers@FulcrumVets.com
The Senior Helpdesk Specialist provides superior customer service in support of customer requests when contacting the Single-Point-of-Contact IT Service Desk located in Springfield, VA.
Responsibilities
Assist in providing technical assistance and support related to computer systems, hardware, or software
Assist in responding to queries, run diagnostic programs, isolate problems, and determine and implement solutions.
Respond to email or chat messages for customers seeking help.
Walk customers through problem-solving process.
Run diagnostic programs to resolve problems.
Follow up with customers to ensure issue(s) were resolved.
Gain feedback from customers about system usage.
Run reports to determine malfunctions that continue to occur.
Create a ticket in the approved incident management system for all support calls received or route user support calls to appropriate IT Help Desk.
Utilize Attempt First Call Resolution (FCR) for all requests received.
Provide first contact account resets, unlocking, troubleshooting, and security issue/error resolution.
Other duties as assigned
Requirements
High School Diploma, / GED plus 10 years of relevant experience
Operational experience with ServiceNow
Experience in the Intelligence Community
Exhibit excellent customer service, organizational and time management skills
DoD 8140 (formerly 8570.01-M), IAT Level I: Must have current A+ CE or Security+ CE Certification


Pay based on experience. Please submit salary requirements with your resume.


Please do notapply if you do not possess the required clearance: TS/SCI",767,Washington
46,IT Specialist (Drupal),Government of the District of Columbia,"Washington, DC 20001 (Downtown area)","$87,703 - $113,002 a year","DC Public Library Office of Information Technology supports a large, multi-site networked environment of wired and wireless staff and public workstations connected to cloud-hosted servers and applications within and outside the District of Columbia.
Under the guidance of the Director of Information Technology, the IT Specialist (Drupal) serves as the lead developer for major library application platforms, such as the Library’s RDBMS, internet and intranet CMS, mobile app, and other major application platforms. The incumbent will work closely with Public Services and Business Operations Administrators to ensure planning, implementation, and coordination of Library services and applications.
Duties and Responsibilities
Provides guidance in the design, documentation, development, modification, testing, installation, implementation, and support of new or existing applications software
Assesses the feasibility of adopting new software design technologies within the current systems environment. Ensures that all applications, systems, software, and equipment used in production have been set to conform with all security guidelines and regulations,.
Lead, coordinate, and oversee the effective delivery of library services and applications by overseeing the design, installation, maintenance, documentation, security, upgrading, and troubleshooting of library application platforms, servers, and databases.
Responsible for development and maintenance of interfaces between application platforms, applications, and other systems; integration of proprietary, custom, and COTS applications using API
Provide functional support and training for all application modules; and the creation of custom reports.
Administer, configure, and optimize applications and partner products, add-ons, and extensions. Generate reports and statistics. Ensure database integrity and security.
 Contribute to the enhancement of technology services and operations by planning, coordinating, and implementing application projects, maintenance, and updates.
Works with Library staff to resolve functionality issues and improve workflow through better utilization of application platforms.
Respond/evaluate user needs by training technical and library staff and recommending appropriate actions.
Provide written and verbal communications to staff, vendors, contractors, and the public.
 Assist with technical planning, budgeting, and priority management.
Education and Experience
Bachelor’s degree in Engineering, Information Science, Information Systems, Information Technology, Computer Science, or related field required plus a minimum of five (5) years of IT experience as a technical resource that demonstrates knowledge of software design principles, methods, approaches, and procedures to design, develop, optimize and integrate system components or a minimum of one (1) year of specialized experience at the lower grade level. Library experience is desired. In addition, the following is required:
Knowledge of design, configuration, administration, management, security, operation, and documentation of RDBMS. Knowledge of cataloging principles, including MARC and RDA, is desired.
Demonstrated understanding of client/server environment, and experience with software applications needed to administer application environments. This may include Microsoft Windows Server, UNIX/Linux, Oracle, SQL Server, XML, etc.
Mastery of standard web browser display and application technologies (HTML, XML, CSS, JavaScript, CGI, XSLT), including usability, accessibility and cross-browser compatibility issues.
Ability to communicate effectively with staff, the public, vendors, and technical personnel, both verbally and in writing; to evaluate and communicate technical information; and ability to train technical and library staff as needed.
Knowledge of principles purchasing and budgeting, contractor and vendor relations, and project management
Ability to evaluate complex information and emerging issues in the use of advanced technology, communications and user needs.
Residency Requirement
A person applying for a position in the Career Service, Educational Service, Management Supervisory Service, an attorney position in the Legal Service (series 905) other than the Senior Executive Attorney Service (SEAS), or an attorney position in the Excepted Service (series 950) who is a bona fide District resident AT THE TIME OF APPLICATION for the position, may be awarded a 10-point residency preference over non-District applicants, unless the person declines the preference points. If selected the person shall be required to present no less than 8 proofs of bona fide District residency and maintain such residency for 7 consecutive years from the effective date of the appointment. Failure to maintain bona fide District residency for the 7-year period will result in forfeiture of employment.
General Suitability Screening
This position is subject to general suitability screening; verification of employment history, reference checks and degree/license, as applicable. The appointee to the position may be offered employment contingent upon receipt of a satisfactory general suitability screening.
Employment Benefits
Selectee will be eligible for health and life insurance, annual (vacation) and sick leave and will be covered under the District of Columbia government's retirement plan. However, if selectee was previously employed in the District of Columbia government under an appointment for which he/she was eligible for Civil Service Retirement (CSR), contributions to CSR will resume upon re-employment.
Licenses and Certifications
None
Working Conditions/Environment
The work is performed in an office setting.
Other Significant Factors
Emergency/Essential Designation: This position is designated as Emergency
Collective Bargaining Unit: This position is not the collective bargaining unit.
Duration of Appointment: Career Service Full Time Appointment
Telework: Telework may be granted upon surpervisory approval
Must be eligible to work in the U.S.
Equal Employment Opportunity
The District of Columbia Government is an Equal Opportunity Employer: all qualified candidates will receive consideration without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, sex, age, marital status, personal appearance, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, family responsibilities, matriculation, political affiliation, genetic information, disability. Sexual harassment is a form of sex discrimination, which is also prohibited. In addition, harassment based on any of the above-protected categories is prohibited.
Click here to review additional Employment Disclosure & Information for Applicants.",767,Washington
47,Senior Integrated Logistics Support (ILS) Specialist,Archimedes Global,"Washington, DC 20001 (Shaw area)",None,"Archimedes Global is currently recruiting an Integrated Logistics Support Specialist to join our team in Washington, DC.

The selected individual will:
Perform Integrated Logistics Support (ILS) activities for the LRS Program, to include planning, scheduling, coordinating and estimating complex tasks associated with products or services (e.g., design, development, acquisition and maintenance) required to ensure that the C-130 aircraft, mission system, and associated equipment achieve the required readiness and sustainability posture at an affordable life cycle cost
Develop/ensure requirements and implementation strategies comply with USCG logistics directives and supportability parameters
Perform and coordinate detailed analysis to ensure integration support considerations into the planning and/or design process
Evaluate logistics deliverables for technical adequacy
Support development of logistics acquisition milestone requirements and associated procurements for C-130 logistics materials and/or services
Required Qualifications:
Bachelor’s degree and 3+ years of experience required (5yrs of experience may be used in lieu of degree)
NACI clearance required; Secret preferred
Desired Qualifications:
5+ years of experience
2+ years of experience in a C-130 depot-level maintenance environment performing aircraft upgrades and maintenance
Experience in Coast Guard (CG) procedures (CG aeronautical practices as defined in Commandant Instruction Manual CIM 13020.1 (series), utilizing FedLog, Asset Computerized Maintenance System (ACMS), Asset Logistics Management Information System (ALMIS), and Asset Maintenance Management Information System (AMMIS))
Secret security clearance
Archimedes Global, Inc. is a diversified technology company providing information and engineering solutions to government and businesses worldwide. Archimedes delivers superior results by combining deep domain expertise with technology-enabled innovations. We are proud to offer highly competitive compensation packages and outstanding benefits. If you feel you have what it takes, turn your interest into action & apply now!",767,Washington
48,Systems Engineer Technical Specialist,Peraton,"Chantilly, VA","Up to $200,678 a year","Peraton Overview

Peraton drives missions of consequence spanning the globe and extending to the farthest reaches of the galaxy. As the worlds leading mission capability integrator and transformative enterprise IT provider, we deliver trusted and highly differentiated national security solutions and technologies that keep people safe and secure. Peraton serves as a valued partner to essential government agencies across the intelligence, space, cyber, defense, civilian, health, and state and local markets. Every day, our 22,000 employees do the cant be done, solving the most daunting challenges facing our customers.
We are an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We consider applicants without regard to race, color, religion, age, national origin, ancestry, ethnicity, gender, gender identity, gender expression, sexual orientation, marital status, veteran status, disability, genetic information, citizenship status, or membership in any other group protected by federal, state, or local law.

As a government contractor, Peraton abides by the following provision

Pay Transparency Nondiscrimination Provision

The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of the other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractors legal duty to furnish information. 41 CFR 60-1.35(c).

Qualifications

Required:
Bachelors degree in Systems Engineering or in related technical or scientific fields such as engineering, physics, mathematics, operations research, engineering management, Computer Science, Information Technology, Management Information Systems, or related STEM degree program.
12+ years working experience in government or industry in relevant work areas including: DoD/IC Acquisition Process, Requirements Process, PPBES Process or system engineering of large complex System of Systems or Service Oriented Architecture/Cloud environments.
Experience with and strong understanding of systems engineering lifecycle.

Desired:
Masters degree in Systems Engineering or in related technical or scientific fields such as engineering, physics, mathematics, operations research, engineering management, Computer Science, Information Technology, Management Information Systems, or related STEM degree program.
Working knowledge of Model Based Systems Engineering, processes, tools and languages.
Working knowledge of Software Development Frameworks.
INCOSE Certified System Engineering Professional (CSEP) certification.
Documented work experience in the field of geospatial intelligence.
Licensure as a professional engineer.
Membership or leadership participation in any of the following professional organizations:
ACSM
ASCE
ASPRS
OGC
SAREM
USGIF
Demonstrated expertise in photogrammetry, remote sensing, image science, information sciences, geographic information systems, geomatics, or related fields.
Demonstrated knowledge of the current NSG/ASG and NRO enterprises .
Responsibilities

Senior-level Systems Engineers guide engineering teams in taking a multi-discipline approach to requirements engineering, solutions engineering, scheduling, reliability, resiliency, services development, integration, test and evaluation, maintainability and analysis across the National System of Geospatial-intelligence (NSG), Allied System of Geospatial-intelligence (ASG) and Federal Agencies to ensure timely and accurate GEOINT.

Duties include:
Guides Mid-level and Junior-level system engineers performing requirements engineering, solutions engineering, scheduling, reliability, resiliency, services development, integration, test and evaluation, maintainability and analysis across the National System of Geospatial-intelligence (NSG), Allied System of Geospatial-intelligence (ASG) and Federal Agencies.
Guides the planning, analysis/traceability of user requirements, architectures traceability, procedures, and problems to automate or improve existing systems and review cloud service capabilities, workflow, and scheduling limitations.
Guides Mid-level and Junior-level system engineers developing solutions designs based on analysis of requirements and new technology.
Assists the Government in the capture and translation of mission and customer requirements/needs into systems/capability requirements and solutions.
Supports the analyses and allocation of requirements to systems architecture components and executing programs.
Assists the Government in performing systems integration activities.
Conducts Analysis of Alternatives (AoAs), Course of Actions (CoAs), Trade Studies, and Engineering Assessments.
Assists the Government in strategic technical planning, project management, performance engineering, risk management and interface design.
Operates at the level of integrating multiple systems, services, processes, and interfaces within a Major Systems Acquisitions across organizational and agency boundaries
For Colorado Residents
Salary Minimum: $93,870.40
Salary Maximum: $200,678.40

The estimate displayed represents the typical salary range for this position, and is just one component of Perspecta's total compensation package for employees. Other rewards may include annual bonuses, short- and long-term incentives, and program-specific awards. In addition, Perspecta provides a variety of benefits to employees.",767,Washington
49,"Supervisory Control and Data Acquisition Specialist, Senior",Booz Allen Hamilton,"Washington, DC",None,"Key Role:
Provide technical knowledge and analysis of complex problems that need a subject matter expert for effective development and implementation of solutions. Support the application of technical principles, theories, and concepts in Supervisory Control and Data Acquisition (SCADA) and other industrial control systems. Guide the completion of specific programs and projects relating to SCADA systems. Provide expert support, analysis, and research into exceptionally complex problems and processes relating to SCADA without direction. Serve as a technical expert on executive-level project teams providing technical direction, interpretation, and alternatives. Develop technical solutions to complex problems that require the regular use of ingenuity and creativity independently.
Basic Qualifications:
5+ years of experience with the engineering, design, and maintenance of Industrial Control Systems (ICS)Experience in Supervisory Control and Data Acquisition (SCADA), PLC or HMI system development with software packages from large commercial vendorsExperience with distributed hardware, software and network communication elements used to control and monitor electrical and mechanical equipmentExperience with Computer Automated Design (CAD) software, including AutoCadKnowledge of electrical and mechanical systems, including automation peripherals, including air and water flow meters, pressure transducers, temperature transmitters, and variable frequency drivesKnowledge of computer networks and communications protocols commonly used in ICS, including CP/IP, MODBUS, or BACnetKnowledge of codes and standards pertaining to mechanical and SCADA design, including NFPA 70, NFPA 70E, or UL 508Secret clearanceBS degree
Clearance:
Applicants selected will be subject to a security investigation and may need to meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information; Secret clearance is required.
We’re an EOE that empowers our people—no matter their race, color, religion, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, disability, veteran status, or other protected characteristic—to fearlessly drive change.",767,Washington
50,Systems Engineer Senior Technical Specialist,Peraton,"Chantilly, VA","From $111,218 a year","Peraton Overview

Peraton drives missions of consequence spanning the globe and extending to the farthest reaches of the galaxy. As the worlds leading mission capability integrator and transformative enterprise IT provider, we deliver trusted and highly differentiated national security solutions and technologies that keep people safe and secure. Peraton serves as a valued partner to essential government agencies across the intelligence, space, cyber, defense, civilian, health, and state and local markets. Every day, our 22,000 employees do the cant be done, solving the most daunting challenges facing our customers.
Qualifications

Required:
Masters degree in Computer Science, Information Technology, Management Information Systems, or related STEM degree program, or equivalent Expert level experience as a Cloud Architect.
Expert experience in cloud-based systems architecting.
One or more Cloud Certifications
Cloud Certified Solutions Architect
AWS Certified
Cisco Certified Networking Administrator Cloud
Cisco Certified Network Professional Cloud
IBM Certified Cloud Solution Architect
MCSE Cloud Platform and Infrastructure
VMware Certified Professional (VCP7-CMA)

Desired:
Previous working experience in government or industry, within Cloud Architect profession.
Experience architecting solutions using structured and unstructured Big Data.
Experience architecting solutions using Automation, Augmentation and Artificial Intelligence technologies.
Experience architecting solutions using Model Based Systems Engineering.
Responsibilities

Expert Cloud Architects assist in leading and overseeing the planning and development of cloud services architectures. They ensure analysis of cloud service alternatives are conducted and prioritized to ensure the Government properly architects business and mission solutions using cloud bases systems and services.

Duties include:
Assists with leading cultural change for cloud adoption.
Assists with overseeing development and coordination of cloud architectures.
Develops cloud strategies and coordinating adoption of cloud-based solutions.
Oversees the work of Senior-, Mid-, and Junior-level contractor Cloud Architects.
For Colorado Residents
Colorado Salary Minimum: $111,217.60
Colorado Salary Maximum: $237,744.00

The estimate displayed represents the typical salary range for this position, and is just one component of Perspecta's total compensation package for employees. Other rewards may include annual bonuses, short- and long-term incentives, and program-specific awards. In addition, Perspecta provides a variety of benefits to employees.",767,Washington
51,Senior Advanced Systems Admninistration Specialist,Acara Solutions,"Fairfax, VA",None,"ACARA Solutions and our client located in Fairfax, VA has a contract to direct hire position
Senior Advanced Systems Administration Specialist
As a seasoned leader, you""ll be involved with our client's decision-making process by serving as a front-line interface to users with technical issues and conducting systems analysis and development to keep systems current with changing technologies.
Your duties may include installing new software, troubleshooting, granting permissions to applications and training users.
You""ll also be responsible for the day-to-day support of server services by performing server administration for physical and virtual server operating systems and configuring, maintaining and troubleshooting of physical and virtual hardware and network related interfaces on servers.
We""ll rely on you to perform, maintain, troubleshoot and conduct a complete analysis of alerts; create scripts to automate repetitive processes; and work with customers to identify, isolate, and resolve problems with servers that are affecting other services.
We apply advanced technologies such as Artificial Intelligence, Blockchain, AR/VR, Cloud Native and Quantum Physics to solve our customers"" missions in cyber, RF, undersea, interstellar and everything in between.


Required Skills / Qualifications:
Bachelor""s degree in Computer Science
Minimum of 8 years"" experience as Senior Advanced Systems Admninistration Specialist
Minimum of 8 years"" experience in developing, deploying and supporting large-scale enterprise server solutions
Preferred Skills / Qualifications:
Master's degree
Technologies that aren""t just top-notch, they""re often top-secret
A team of bold thinkers committed to exploring what""s next
Opportunities to gain new knowledge - as it""s discovered
Advanced understanding of complex networks & server based operating systems
Design, planning, implementation, monitoring, administering and maintaining computer networks.
Palo Alto, Cisco, Taclanes, WANs, LANs, Firewalls, switches and routers.
Linux including RHEL/CentOS, specifically secure environments. Virtualized and bare metal
Infrastructure aspects of Linux related to authentication, policy, scanning, logging, storage.
Microsoft Windows 10 desktop and Microsoft Windows 2008/2012/2019
Subject matter expert (SME) with the ability to mentor others on administrating the server environment
Enhanced troubleshooting skills within the server OS as well as both networking and storage technologies
Team player who thrives in collaborative environments and revels in team success
Team player who thrives in collaborative environments and revels in team success
Broad understanding of the interrelationships within the IT environment with focus on server and services
Senior level knowledge of physical and virtual server support
Senior level knowledge of access, permissions and security that gives the clients the access to the data they need to perform their daily activities.
Additional Information:
Upon offer of employment, the individual will be subject to a background check and a drug screen.
Aleron companies (Acara Solutions, Aleron Shared Resources, Broadleaf Results, Lume Strategies, TalentRise, Viaduct, and Aleron's strategic partner, SDI) are Equal Employment Opportunity and Affirmative Action Employers. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, genetic information, sex, age, disability, veteran status, or any other legally protected basis. The Aleron companies welcome and encourage applications from diverse candidates, including people with disabilities. Accommodations are available upon request for applicants taking part in all aspects of the selection process.
Applicants for this position must be legally authorized to work in the United States. This position does not meet the employment requirements for individuals with F-1 OPT STEM work authorization status.",767,Washington
52,Management Analyst (Data Analyst),US Environmental Protection Agency,"Washington, DC","$60,129 - $94,581 a year","Duties
Summary
We are an independent office within the EPA that helps the agency protect the environment in a more efficient and cost effective manner. We perform audits, evaluations, and investigations of the EPA to promote economy and efficiency, and to prevent and detect fraud, waste and abuse. We strive to provide solutions to problems that ultimately result in making America a cleaner and healthier place. Come join the team!

Responsibilities
This position is located in the Operations Support Division (OSD), Office of Investigations (OI), Office of the Inspector General (OIG). The OSD is responsible for the OI's business analytics with the purpose of collecting and analyzing data, regularly reporting, and providing statistical data to devise, execute, and improve organizational strategies and processes.

Responsibilities
The ideal candidate will perform the following duties:

Participate with the OSD team in the planning, development, coordination, and application of advanced analytical systems and methodologies designed to detect errors, analyze trends and anomalies, and report OI and OIG strategic performance measures
Query, analyze, prepare, and present reporting options for managers at all levels.
Build, or oversee development of, reports and tools based on outcomes of performance data and customer feedback.
Participate in the development of strategic plans for obtaining the analytical capabilities necessary to support OIG’s mission and operational needs.

Travel Required
Not required
Supervisory status
No
Promotion Potential
11
Job family (Series)
0343 Management And Program Analysis
Similar jobs
Analysts, Management
Management Analysts
Requirements

Requirements
Conditions of Employment
Conditions of Employment

U.S. Citizenship Required.
Background Investigation Required.
Position has portable work and selectee may be eligible to telework.

Must be a U.S. Citizen.

This is a Public Trust Position. Employment in this position requires a background investigation. If you are selected and cannot obtain a favorable security determination within a reasonable period of time due to disclosed or undisclosed background issues, the tentative employment offer may be withdrawn.

If you are a male born after December 31, 1959 you must certify that you have registered with the Selective Service System, or are exempt from having to do so under the Selective Service Law.

Selectees will be required to complete a ""Declaration of Federal Employment"", (OF-306), prior to appointment and the appropriate background investigation forms to determine suitability for Federal employment. False statements or responses on these forms can jeopardize your employment opportunity and subject you to disciplinary action, including removal from Federal service.

The selectee will be required to complete a Personal Identity Verification (PIV) process that requires two forms of identification from the I-9 Form. We will compare information provided on the I-9 Form to records available from the U.S. Department of Homeland Security. The system confirms employee’s identity and eligibility to work in the United States. Learn more about e-verify, including your rights and responsibilities.

Depending on your status, this position may require serving a 1-year probationary period.
Qualifications
Specialized experience is experience that has equipped the candidate with the particular knowledge, skills, and abilities to perform successfully the duties of the position.

Qualifying specialized experience must demonstrate the following:

GS-09:

1) Collecting and verifying relevant data from various internal and external sources;
2) Utilizing qualitative and quantitative data methods to analyze trends, identify problems, and recommend solutions;
3) Designing routine and non-routine data audits to ensure accuracy and relevance of systems; AND
4) Developing factsheets and other high-level summaries of data to management. OR

Substitution of Education for the Specialized Experience Requirement: master's or equivalent graduate degree, or 2 full years of progressively higher level graduate education leading to such a degree, or LL.B. or J.D., if related.

GS-11:

1) Oversee the collecting and verifying of relevant data from various internal and external sources to aide management in decisions, plans, and organizational strategies;
2) Utilizing qualitative and quantitative data methods to analyze trends, identify problems, and recommend solutions;
3) Designing routine and non-routine data audits to ensure accuracy and relevance of systems;
4) Presenting statistical data of information for reports, briefings, and publications; AND
5) Participate in strategic planning with senior leaders, contributing data analytics to aide in organizational improvements and processes. OR

Substitution of Education for the Specialized Experience Requirement: Ph.D. or equivalent doctoral degree or 3 full years of progressively higher level graduate education leading to such a degree or LL.M., if related.

Evidence of the above specialized experience must be supported by detailed documentation of duties performed in positions held. Your resume is the key means we have for evaluating your skills, knowledge, and abilities as they relate to this position. Therefore, we encourage you to be clear and specific when describing your experience. We will not make assumptions regarding your experience or based on job titles alone. If your resume does not support your questionnaire answers, we will not allow credit for your response(s).

Experience refers to paid and unpaid experience, including volunteer work done through National Service programs (e.g., Peace Corps, AmeriCorps) and other organizations (e.g., professional; philanthropic; religious; spiritual; community, student, social). Volunteer work helps build critical competencies, knowledge, and skills and can provide valuable training and experience that translates directly to paid employment. You will receive credit for all qualifying experience, including volunteer experience.

Applicants must meet the qualifications for this position within thirty (30) days of the closing date of this announcement.
Education
This position does not have a mandatory education requirement.
Additional information
EPA OIG provides reasonable accommodations to applicants with disabilities on a case-by-case basis. If you need a reasonable accommodation for any part of the application or hiring process, please contact the Human Resources Specialist listed in this vacancy announcement.

Payment of relocation expenses is NOT authorized.

All the information you provide will be verified by a review of the work experience and/or education as shown on your application, by checking reference and through other means, such as the interview process. Any exaggeration of your experience, false statements, or attempts to conceal information may be grounds for not hiring you or for firing you after you begin work.

Additional selections may be made through this vacancy announcement.


How You Will Be Evaluated
You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications above.
You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications above. After the vacancy closes, we will review your application package to determine if you meet the minimum qualifications for the position. If you meet the minimum qualifications, your responses to the questionnaire, resume and supporting documentation will then be reviewed. Your resume must support your responses to the self-assessment questions or your score may be lowered. The best-qualified candidates will be identified for referral to the hiring manager and may be invited to an interview.

ICTAP candidates will be eligible if it is determined that they have exceeded the minimum qualifications for the position by attaining at least a rating of 90.

Please ensure that your resume contains specific information such as position titles, beginning and ending dates of employment for each position, average number of hours worked per week, salary, duties performed for each position, and if the position is/was in the Federal government, you should provide the position series and grade level/pay band.

To preview questions please click here.

Background checks and security clearance
Security clearance
Other
Drug test required
No
Position sensitivity and risk
Critical-Sensitive (CS)/High Risk
Trust determination process
Credentialing, Suitability/Fitness
Required Documents

Required Documents
Your package must be complete and submitted in the manner specified in this section. Packages that are submitted in any other manner without prior approval from the agency point of contact will not be considered.

A complete application includes:

Resume;
Vacancy question responses; and
Submission of any required documents. Please note that if you do not provide all required information, as specified in this announcement, you may not be considered for this position (or may not receive the special consideration for which you may be eligible).

If you are a current or former federal employee you must a copy of your most recent SF Form 50, Notification of Personnel Action, that shows: (1) permanent or career-conditional tenure (codes 1 or 2, in block 24), and (2) position occupied in the competitive service (code 1, in block 34). To be considered as a non-competitive eligible candidate, the SF-50 must show the highest grade level or promotion potential level applicant has attained competitively and grade must be equivalent or higher than the grade for which applying. Indicate on your application the highest permanent grade you have held; if this grade is different from your current grade, submit a copy of an additional SF-50 showing this grade.

For proof of Veterans Preference you must submit a DD-214 (member copy 4)and, if applicable, Standard Form 15, VA Letter. You can find additional information about Veterans' Preference at fedshirevets.

If you are eligible for special hiring authority, please indicate this when you apply, and submit the supporting documentation for proof of eligibility for the special hiring authority, such as disability, Peace Corps service, Interchange Agreement, etc. Other documents identified in this announcement.
All supplemental documents must be submitted electronically before the closing date of this vacancy announcement. You have three choices for submitting your supplemental documents:

Download from your USAJOBS account; or
Upload your file(s); or
Fax using the online Fax Cover Sheet.

Failure to submit required documents, based upon how you apply, may result in loss of consideration due to an incomplete application package. It is your responsibility to ensure all required documents have been submitted. Official documents are not required at the time of application, copies are sufficient. If selected, official documentation must be submitted prior to appointment.

If you are relying on your education to meet qualification requirements:

Education must be accredited by an accrediting institution recognized by the U.S. Department of Education in order for it to be credited
towards qualifications. Therefore, provide only the attendance and/or degrees from schools accredited by accrediting institutions recognized
by the U.S. Department of Education.

Failure to provide all of the required information as stated in this vacancy announcement may result in an ineligible rating or may affect the overall rating.
If you are relying on your education to meet qualification requirements:
Education must be accredited by an accrediting institution recognized by the U.S. Department of Education in order for it to be credited towards qualifications. Therefore, provide only the attendance and/or degrees from schools accredited by accrediting institutions recognized by the U.S. Department of Education.
Failure to provide all of the required information as stated in this vacancy announcement may result in an ineligible rating or may affect the overall rating.
Benefits

Benefits
A career with the U.S. Government provides employees with a comprehensive benefits package. As a federal employee, you and your family will have access to a range of benefits that are designed to make your federal career very rewarding. Opens in a new windowLearn more about federal benefits.
A career with the U.S. Government provides employees with a comprehensive benefits package.

As a federal employee, you and your family will have access to a range of benefits that are designed to make your federal career very rewarding. Learn more about federal benefits.

EPA OIG offers a comprehensive benefits package that includes: paid vacation, sick leave, 10 paid holidays per year, life and health insurance, Long Term Care insurance, dental and vision insurance, flexible spending account program, and retirement savings and investment plan similar to 401(k) (Thrift Savings Plan).

EAP OIG also offers a broad array of work-life flexibilities and services to employees such as, flexible work schedules, teleworking, transit subsidies, fitness center, and employee assistance and wellness programs.

Eligibility for benefits depends on the type of position you hold and whether your position is Full-time, part-time, or intermittent. Contact the hiring agency for more information on the specific benefits offered.
Review our benefits
Eligibility for benefits depends on the type of position you hold and whether your position is full-time, part-time, or intermittent. Contact the hiring agency for more information on the specific benefits offered.
Help
This job is open to
Individuals with disabilities
Federal employees - Competitive service
Current or former competitive service federal employees.
Military spouses
Peace Corps & AmeriCorps Vista
Special authorities
Individuals eligible under a special authority not listed above, but defined in the federal hiring regulations.
Veterans
Clarification from the agency
MERIT PROMOTION (MP) VACANCY ANNOUNCEMENT - Current Federal employees with competitive status; Former Federal employees with reinstatement eligibility; CTAP/ICTAP eligibles; Veterans with VOW, VEOA, or 30% disability; Military Spouses. Those eligible under an OPM interchange agreement.",767,Washington
53,Sr. Industry Specialist,"Amazon Dev Center U.S., Inc.","Herndon, VA",None,"
5+ years of experience in information security and audit as an industry security specialist or security analyst, auditor, security engineer/architecture, security or compliance program manager, or other related experience.
5+ years of project management experience and demonstrated knowledge of program management best practices
Skilled in risk management, business risk analysis, and making complex business/risk trade-off recommendations and decisions.
5+ years of experience with implementation of security controls and driving rollout of controls.
Up to 20% travel may be required.

Amazon Web Services (AWS) is the leading cloud provider, for such services as virtual infrastructure, storage, networking, analytics, and enterprise applications to help global organizations move faster, lower IT costs, and scale. Businesses, from start-ups to enterprises, and Government organizations, run their operations and applications on AWS’s multi-tenant infrastructure. Security is the #1 concern of customers moving to the cloud and the AWS Cryptography team is dedicated to providing the security features our customers need. We enable customers to confidently move sensitive workloads to the cloud where they can benefit from strong security controls that help meet internal and external compliance requirements. AWS CloudHSM provides cloud-based hardware security modules (HSMs) that enable customers to easily generate and use their own encryption keys on the AWS Cloud.

As a Senior Information Security Specialist in AWS CloudHSM, you will build and execute our program for evaluating compliance with industry standards (ISO, SOC, PCI), federal regulations (FedRAMP/NIST, DOD), and customer contractual requirements. You will have complete ownership and accountability of programs from start to finish, aimed at improving compliance and risk monitoring for service. The successful candidate is comfortable interacting with both technology and business leaders across the organization at all levels. You will drive consensus among stakeholders and verify that controls are effective, or remediated to become effective. We value personality, insight, intellectual flexibility, and sound business judgment.

Your responsibilities will include the following:

Translate customer compliance requirements into useable and scalable engineering and operational actions. Create documentation, compliance reports and articles to enable customer and auditor inquiries.
Define, build and maintain compliance program(s), including scope identification and validation, periodic assessments, and continuous monitoring and guidance on evolving compliance requirements. Drive automation of evidence artifact collection and control automation with engineering teams.
Create & refine compliance-related requirements for hardware suppliers and system integrators. Engage with AWS stakeholders to plan and conduct site audits and compliance reviews for new and existing vendors/partners.
Develop weekly/monthly reports that capture key business trends, highlights, lowlights, and metrics as the compliance programs are conducted. Provide status, recommended updates, and detailed metrics and evidence.
Clearly communicate vision, deliverables, and project status to management and key technical and business stakeholders.
Establish credibility and maintain strong working relationships with groups involved with compliance matters (Security Assurance, InfoSec, Data Center Operations, Physical Security, Legal, Business Development, Internal Audit, Developer Community, Networking, Systems, etc.). Serve as the single threaded owner for compliance issues for CloudHSM.

Here at AWS, we embrace our differences. We are committed to furthering our culture of inclusion. We have ten employee-led affinity groups, reaching 40,000 employees in over 190 chapters globally. We have innovative benefit offerings, and we host annual and ongoing learning experiences, including our Conversations on Race and Ethnicity (CORE) and AmazeCon (gender diversity) conferences. Amazon’s culture of inclusion is reinforced within our 14 Leadership Principles, which remind team members to seek diverse perspectives, learn and be curious, and earn trust.

Our team is dedicated to supporting new members. We have a broad mix of experience levels and tenures, and we’re building an environment that celebrates knowledge sharing and mentorship.
Our team also puts a high value on work-life balance. Striking a healthy balance between your personal and professional life is crucial to your happiness and success here, which is why we aren’t focused on how many hours you spend at work or online. Instead, we’re happy to offer a flexible schedule so you can have a more productive and well-balanced life—both in and outside of work.


Experience with physical security hardware, Intrusion Detection Systems, and/or Access Control System.
Experience with payments card data security or other payments-related systems and controls.
Experience with service-oriented architectures and web services security.
Previous QSA or ISA experience.
Security control and compliance experience in various frameworks including: PCI DSS, PCI PA-DSS, PCI PTS, PCI P2PE, PCI-PIN, PCI-HSM, GLBA, NYDFS, ISO, NIST, etc.
Bachelor's degree in Engineering, Computer Science, Information Systems, Information Security or comparable experience.

Amazon is committed to a diverse and inclusive workplace. Amazon is an equal opportunity employer and does not discriminate on the basis of race, national origin, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, protected veteran status, disability, age, or other legally protected status. For individuals with disabilities who would like to request an accommodation, please visit https://www.amazon.jobs/en/disability/us.",767,Washington
54,Information Technology Specialist,US Office of the Inspector General,"Washington, DC","$87,198 - $134,798 a year","Duties
Summary
This position is with the Office of Inspector General, Information Technology Division. This office is responsible for providing IT customer service support to the Office of Inspector General staff. As an Information Technology Specialist, the incumbent is expected to perform audio/video services to OIG senior executives and other OIG staff members in a high energy fast paced work environment.

Responsibilities
As an Information Technology Specialist, GS-2210-12/13, you will perform the following major duties:

Provides support to OIG executives, included but not limited to audio/video services, installation and configuration of Apple mobile devices, such as iPhones, iPads and Apple iOS applications.

Provides remote and deskside support; imaging laptops, performing data retention, supporting mobile devices, developing scripts, configuring file and printer servers, develop/draft documentation and user guides; conduct user training as needed.

Diagnoses and resolves problems in response to reported incidents; uses a wide variety of software applications, computer hardware, desktop operating systems, anti-virus software, Office suites and network client setup.

Performs IT systems security related tasks, using prescribed methods, and tools in support of cyber and information security standards.

May correspond via telecommunication devices or in person to peers, supervisors, managers, and customers; provides troubleshooting and customer support via phone, live video feeds.

Ensures rigorous application of information security/assurance policies, principles, and practices in the delivery of technical services; notifies the unit supervisor or senior IT staff on any IT issues, problems, and concerns.
Travel Required
Not required
Supervisory status
No
Promotion Potential
13
Job family (Series)
2210 Information Technology Management
Similar jobs
Computer Network Support Specialists
Computer Security Specialists
Computer Support Specialists
Computer User Support Specialists
Desktop Support Specialists
Information Technology Specialist (It Specialist)
Requirements

Requirements
Conditions of Employment
U.S. citizenship is required.
Successful completion of a background investigation.
May be required to complete a one year probationary period.
OGE-450, Confidential Financial Disclosure Report may be required.
Time-in-grade requirement - Federal applicants must have served 52 weeks at the next lower grade to satisfy time-in-grade restrictions contained in 5 CFR 300, Subpart F.

Qualifications
All qualification requirements must be met by the closing date of this announcement.

Basic Requirement:


Your resume must reflect information technology related experience in the federal service or private or public sector demonstrating the following four competencies:
Attention to Detail - Is thorough when performing work and conscientious about attending to detail.
Customer Service - Works with clients and customers (that is, any individuals who use or receive the services or products that your work unit produces, including the general public, individuals who work in the agency, other agencies, or organizations outside the Government) to assess their needs, provide information or assistance, resolve their problems, or satisfy their expectations; knows about available products and services; is committed to providing quality products and services.
Oral Communication - Expresses information (for example, ideas or facts) to individuals or groups effectively, taking into account the audience and nature of the information (for example, technical, sensitive, controversial); makes clear and convincing oral presentations; listens to others, attends to nonverbal cues, and responds appropriately.
Problem Solving - Identifies problems; determines accuracy and relevance of information; uses sound judgment to generate and evaluate alternatives, and to make recommendations.
And

In addition to the basic requirements above, applicants for the GS-12 and GS-13 must meet one year of the specialized experience listed below to be considered for each grade:

Specialized Experience for the GS-12:

To qualify for the GS-12 level, you must possess at least one year (52 weeks) of specialized experience equivalent to the GS-11 level in the Federal Service or equivalent experience in the private or public sector, performing ALL of the following:

1. Provide IT support in a high-energy, fast paced environment;

2. Provide assistance with installing, configurating and troubleshooting Apple mobile devices (iPhones, iPads, etc.) and Apple iOS applications;

3. Utilizing a variety of IT applications to include, but not limited to Windows 10, Microsoft Bitlocker, Microsoft Outlook 365, Microsoft OneDrive and the suite of Office 365 productivity applications; and

4. Communicate technical information to staff to assist with security problems issues.


Specialized Experience for the GS-13:

To qualify for the GS-13 level, you must possess at least one year (52 weeks) of specialized experience equivalent to the GS-12 level in the Federal Service or equivalent experience in the private or public sector, performing ALL of the following:

1. Providing a variety of IT support services to a fast-paced work environment to include, but not limited to researching, evaluating, and training staff members;

2. Installing, configurating and troubleshooting Apple mobile devices (iPhones, iPads, etc.) and Apple iOS applications;

3. Utilize a variety of IT applications and the ability to troubleshoot complex issues, to include but not limited to, Windows 10, Microsoft Bitlocker, Microsoft Outlook 365, Microsoft OneDrive and the suite of Office 365 productivity applications; and

4. Applying in depth knowledge on cybersecurity concepts, principals, and standards.
Education
There is no education substitute for this vacancy announcement.
Additional information
Applicants must meet initial and periodic suitability determinations based on favorable background investigations and updates.
Additional selections may be made within 90 days from the closing date of this vacancy announcement.

Career Transition Assistance Programs: These programs apply to employees who have been involuntarily separated from a Federal service position within the competitive service or Federal service employees whose positions have been deemed surplus or no longer needed. To receive selection priority for this position, you must: (1) meet CTAP or ICTAP eligibility criteria; (2) be rated well-qualified for the position with a score of 85 or above; and, (3) submit the appropriate documentation to support your CTAP or ICTAP eligibility. For more information visit: http://www.opm.gov/rif/employee_guides/career_transition.asp.

Noncompetitive Appointment Authorities: For more information on noncompetitive appointment authority eligibility requirements:

Special Hiring Authorities for VeteransSpecial Hiring Authority for Certain Military Spouses

Reasonable Accommodation Requests: If you believe you have a disability (i.e., physical or mental), covered by the Rehabilitation Act of 1973 as amended and Americans with Disabilities Act 1990 as amended, that would interfere with completing the USA Hire Competency Based Assessments, you will be granted the opportunity to request a reasonable accommodation in your online application. Requests for Reasonable Accommodations for the USA Hire Competency Based Assessments and appropriate supporting documentation for Reasonable Accommodation must be received prior to starting the USA Hire Competency Based Assessments. Decisions on requests for Reasonable Accommodations are made on a case-by-case basis. If you meet the minimum qualifications of the position, after notification of the adjudication of your request, you will receive an email invitation to complete the USA Hire Competency Based Assessments. You must complete all assessments within 48 hours of receiving the URL to access the USA Hire Competency Based Assessments, if you received the link after the close of the announcement. To determine if you need a Reasonable Accommodation, please review the Procedures for Requesting a Reasonable Accommodation for Online Assessments here: https://help.usastaffing.gov/Apply/index.php?title=Reasonable_Accommodations_for_USA_Hire


How You Will Be Evaluated
You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications above.
Applicants will be evaluated based on their possession of the following competencies:
Ability to Communicate Information to Senior Officials
Knowledge of Video Telecommunication

After the closing date of the announcement, we will review your resume per Category Rating or Numerical Scoring procedures to ensure that qualification and eligibility requirements are met. If we use the Category Rating procedure, and it is determined that you meet the minimum qualification requirements, your application will then be placed in one of three categories: Best Qualified, Well Qualified, or Qualified based on the degree that your application demonstrates possession of:
Knowledge of computer hardware and software development and systems as they apply to the conception, specification, analysis, planning, development, installation, test, modification

Skill in applying IT security principles; and installing, configuring and testing software on customer workstations

Skill in oral communication to present technical information and concepts in a clear and understandable manner to end users, peers, and management

In addition to the application and application questionnaire, this position requires an online assessment. The online assessment measures critical general competencies required to perform the job.

Note: If a determination is made that qualifications and/or experience have been inflated, your score will be adjusted to more accurately reflect your abilities. You are required to select eligibility and submit supporting documents. Applicants who disqualify themselves will not be evaluated further.

Background checks and security clearance
Security clearance
Not Required
Drug test required
No
Position sensitivity and risk
Non-sensitive (NS)/Low Risk
Trust determination process
Suitability/Fitness
Required Documents

Required Documents
All documentation, applicable to you, must be submitted by the closing date of this announcement. Failure to submit the required documents will disqualify you from further consideration for this position.

Resume (required) - Your resume must sufficiently describe how your experience fully meets the specialized experience requirements as stated in this announcement for each grade level(s) you are applying (see ""Qualifications"" section). Your resume must also support your responses to the assessment questionnaire. Credit will be given for paid and unpaid experience. We cannot assume you have performed the experience required for this position regardless of your employment history or academic career. We strongly recommend you use the USA Jobs online Resume Builder to submit a resume. If you choose to use your own formatted resume, you must ensure it contains all of the following for each experience/position listed: job title, name of employer, beginning and ending dates of employment (month/day/year format), hours worked per week, detailed description of duties performed, and if a Federal position, series and grade or equivalent. We will not access web pages linked on your resume to determine your qualifications. Do not include a photograph or video of yourself, or any sensitive information.
SF-50 Notification of Personnel Action - Documenting proof of competitive status, tenure, position, grade level, and step. Please do not submit award SF-50s as they do not provide the needed information.

Performance Appraisal and Awards - While not required, due weight will be given to appraisals and awards submitted during the interview/selection process conducted by the hiring manager. Such documents will not be used in determining if you meet the experience requirements.

CTAP/ICTAP Eligibility - Such as a RIF separation notice, certificate of expected separation, SF-50 Notification of Personnel Action stating you were separated by RIF, OR a letter from your agency documenting your priority consideration status.

Veteran's Preference Documentation -If applying under VEOA, you must include your DD-214 member 4 copy, SF-15, and VA letter (if applicable). If you are still on active duty, you may submit a statement of service from your unit which states the date you entered active duty and the date you are separating. Your separation date must be within 90 days of the closing date of this announcement.

Military Spouse - If applying as a Military Spouse Eligible under E.O. 13473 and you are a spouse of a member of the armed forces on active duty, the spouse of a 100 percent disabled member of the armed forces, and/or the spouse of a deceased member of the armed forces you must submit acceptable documentation of your appointment eligibility which may include the following:
A copy of the service member's permanent change of station orders, the specific location to which the member is assigned, reassigned, or transferred to permanent change of station orders, and the effective date of the permanent change of station; and
Verification of the marriage to the service member if not listed on orders (i.e., a marriage license or other legal documentation verifying marriage);
Verification of the member's 100 percent disability; and/or
Verification of the member's death while on active duty.

If you are requesting a reasonable accommodation to the USA Hire Competency Based Assessments, submit documentation to support your request, including the Reasonable Accommodation Request Form found here.
Benefits

Benefits
A career with the U.S. Government provides employees with a comprehensive benefits package. As a federal employee, you and your family will have access to a range of benefits that are designed to make your federal career very rewarding. Opens in a new windowLearn more about federal benefits.
Review our benefits
Eligibility for benefits depends on the type of position you hold and whether your position is full-time, part-time, or intermittent. Contact the hiring agency for more information on the specific benefits offered.
Help
This job is open to
Career transition (CTAP, ICTAP, RPL)
Federal employees who meet the definition of a ""surplus"" or ""displaced"" employee.
Federal employees - Competitive service
Current or former competitive service federal employees.
Land & base management
Certain current or former term or temporary federal employees of a land or base management agency.
Military spouses
Veterans
Clarification from the agency
CTAP/ICTAP, Current or former career or career-conditional Federal employees in the competitive service, Veterans who are preference eligible's, or who have been separated from the armed forces with an honorable discharge, Government employees eligible through an Interchange agreement, Current or former time-limited employees eligible under the Land Management Workforce Flexibility Act and Military Spouses may apply.",767,Washington
55,IT Specialist (INET),US Smithsonian Institution,"Washington, DC","$103,690 - $134,798 a year","Duties
Summary
The National Air and Space Museum (NASM) maintains the largest collection of aviation and space artifacts in the world. The Museum reaches a national and international audience through its website, social media, and third-party platforms. Serves as a senior web developer (full stack) and technical lead responsible for strategic application development, systems integration, and platform management across the Museum's digital initiatives.
This position is inside the bargaining unit

Responsibilities
Leads the technical design, implementation and maintenance of the Museum’s websites, web-based platforms, and digital initiatives.
Serves as the Museum's primary expert on technical matters concerning web, mobile, semantic web, and other software applications. Researches existing and emerging technologies to determine and directly implement appropriate methods of content delivery and presentation. Advises on applications and systems. Writes technical documentation and specifications.
Ensure ongoing maintenance and compliance with organizational directives and system and software changes as they arise. Troubleshoot and resolve technical issues, perform regular upgrades or enhancements to improve efficiency and performance.
Configures and optimizes the museum’s digital environment, system architecture and integrations. Develops connections between digital content management system (CMS), Smithsonian enterprise information systems, linked data, application programming interfaces (APIs), and other shared systems, web services, and data sources.

Travel Required
Not required
Supervisory status
No
Promotion Potential
13 - This position is at the Full-Performance Level (FPL).
Job family (Series)
2210 Information Technology Management
Similar jobs
Developers, Web
Web Developers
Requirements

Requirements
Conditions of Employment
Pre- and post-appointment background investigation
U.S. citizenship
May be required to serve a one-year probationary period.
Males born after 12/31/59 must be registered with Selective Service.
Qualification requirements must be met within 30 days of the job opportunity announcement closing date.

For information on qualification requirements, see Qualification Standards Handbook for General Schedule Positions viewable on the web at http://www.opm.gov/qualifications.
Qualifications
Specialized Experience: Experience that equipped the applicant with the particular knowledge, skills, and abilities to perform successfully the duties of the position, and that is typically in or related to the work of the position to be filled. To be creditable, specialized experience must have been equivalent to at least the next lower grade level in the normal line of progression for the occupation. Applicants who have the 1 year of appropriate specialized experience, are not required to have general experience, education above the high school level, or any additional specialized experience to meet the minimum qualification requirements.

For this position, applicants must have 1 year of specialized experience equivalent to at least the next lower grade level, GS-12, in the Federal Service or equivalent.

For this position, specialized experience is defined as: managing projects and developing web applications for an organization's public-facing website; developing applications across multiple platforms (web, mobile, tablets); interfacing with content management systems; advising staff on technical issues; and planning and implementing web interfaces that involve integration of multiple systems and data sources. Experience must include writing code and working with Drupal, PHP, JavaScript, XML, HTML, JSON, databases, and APIs.

PART-TIME OR UNPAID EXPERIENCE: Credit will be given for appropriate unpaid work on the same basis as for paid experience. Part-time experience will be credited on the basis of time actually spent in appropriate activities. To receive credit for such experience you must indicate clearly the nature of the duties and responsibilities in each position held and the average number of hours per week spent in such employment on your online resume.

Note: Your specialized experience must have been in a position(s) equivalent to duties for the occupation at the next lower grade level for the position being filled as defined by applicable Federal standards.
Education
Education can not be substituted for experience at the GS-13 grade level.
Additional information
Flexible Spending Accounts - http://www.fsafeds.com/fsafeds/index.asp
Health Insurance - http://www.opm.gov/insure/health/index.asp
Leave - http://www.opm.gov/oca/leave/index.asp
Life Insurance - http://www.opm.gov/insure/life/index.asp
Long Term Care Insurance - http://www.ltcfeds.com
Retirement Program - http://www.opm.gov/retire/index.asp


How You Will Be Evaluated
You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications above.
Your application will be evaluated first for the basic qualifications described above. The applications that meet the basic qualifications will be evaluated further against the following criteria:

Ability to design, develop, and produce complex websites and applications, with expert knowledge of web best practices.

Expert knowledge of content management systems (CMS) and web development frameworks including Drupal. Ability to create, edit, or modify templates for a CMS or web development framework.

Ability to lead analysis of requirements of web, mobile, semantic web, and other software applications, server and systems integrations, define optimal solutions, and manage implementation.

Knowledge of server and software administration best practices and ability to troubleshoot and optimize application performance.

Expert skills in optimizing system performance, architecture and integrations.

Knowledge of linked data and semantic web technologies such as RDF, XML, and JSON. Expert knowledge of REST and JSON with ability to leverage multiple APIs to optimize the front-end user experience.

Important Note:
Your resume and supporting documentation will be compared to your responses to the occupational questionnaire or other assessment tool for consistency. If a determination is made that you have rated yourself higher than is supported by your resume, you will be assigned a rating commensurate to your described experience.

Your resume should provide detailed information regarding how your education and experience relate to this position, including the major duties and qualifications criteria listed.

To preview questions please click here.

Background checks and security clearance
Security clearance
Not Required
Drug test required
No
Position sensitivity and risk
Moderate Risk (MR)
Trust determination process
Credentialing, Suitability/Fitness
Required Documents

Required Documents
Your application package should include the following documents:

Detailed resume that includes number of hours worked weekly.
Proof of current/prior federal service such as the latest SF-50, Notification of Personnel Action, if applicable.
Unofficial school transcripts, if the position has an education requirement or if you are using education to qualify. If selected for the position, you must provide an official transcript before appointment.
Proof of U.S. accreditation for foreign study, if applicable.
Proof of Veteran's Preference - DD214 (Member 4 Copy) if you are requesting a special appointment authority, such as VRA or VEOA.
Proof of severe disability if you are requesting special placement consideration
Proof of eligibility for a military spouse appointment, such as a permanent change station military order
Proof of eligibility for any other special appointing authority not specifically mentioned here.

If you are relying on your education to meet qualification requirements:
Education must be accredited by an accrediting institution recognized by the U.S. Department of Education in order for it to be credited towards qualifications. Therefore, provide only the attendance and/or degrees from schools accredited by accrediting institutions recognized by the U.S. Department of Education.
Failure to provide all of the required information as stated in this vacancy announcement may result in an ineligible rating or may affect the overall rating.
Benefits

Benefits
A career with the U.S. Government provides employees with a comprehensive benefits package. As a federal employee, you and your family will have access to a range of benefits that are designed to make your federal career very rewarding. Opens in a new windowLearn more about federal benefits.
The Smithsonian offers a comprehensive benefits package that includes, in part, vacation and sick leave, holidays, commuter benefits, health/life insurance, and accidental insurance.

Please see Benefits at www.sihr.si.edu for a complete description.
Eligibility for benefits depends on the type of position you hold and whether your position is full-time, part-time, or intermittent. Contact the hiring agency for more information on the specific benefits offered.
Help
This job is open to
Federal employees - Competitive service
Current or former competitive service federal employees.
Land & base management
Certain current or former term or temporary federal employees of a land or base management agency.
Veterans
Clarification from the agency
Open to current and former Federal employees with permanent status, or reinstatement eligibility, land management eligibles or individuals who are eligible for a special appointing authority. Also advertised as 21R-TL-306477-DEU-NASM for U.S. Citizens, nationals, or those who owe allegiance to the U.S. To be considered for each vacancy, apply to BOTH jobs.",767,Washington
56,Security Associate,Quantech Services,"Chantilly, VA 20151",None,"The Security Administrative Specialist provides support primarily to the Office of Security and Counterintelligence (OS&CI) senior managers in areas of division and operational administrative security functions. The services may also support other NRO Directorates and Offices as required.
SECURITY ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST-INTERMEDIATE
Tasks:
Provide recommended guidance to Government personnel regarding security specific needs for office renovations and move management activities, such as, but not limited to, review of furniture for classified information, review of facilities for SCI Facility requirements, working with facilities and communication personnel to assist in defining requirements, scheduling moves, etc.
Assist with work pertaining to the procurement, inventory control, and destruction of cryptographic material utilized by the NRO
Assist the Government OS&CI Custodial Property Officer in tracking security related equipment and accountable property for the respective branches
Conduct security in-briefings and de-briefings related to security compartmented programs and office specific programs
Support field offices, including polygraph, to include generating tasking lists, providing program and personnel security requests for examinations
Interface in person and telephonically with outside federal agencies, requesting reports, referring and scheduling examinations, and answering general questions about the NRO polygraph program
Work with NRO Program Security Officers to process requests for examinations, gather or provide information about prospective examinees
Research, record, and report population statistical data for analysis and making recommendations to Government personnel regarding planning of operational polygraph travel missions
Make recommendations regarding the collection, interpretation, and production of weekly, monthly and yearly branch reports and statistics which includes multiple data reports from APICS
Schedule, organize, and prepare read-aheads for the adjudication board and log/prepare all customer correspondence packages from the branch for mailing
Provide administrative support for case tracking and provide monthly reports to management
Assist in development and coordination of OS&CI yearly Instructor Led Training (ILT) and Computer Based Training, to include user testing, training schedule, and advertising course offerings
Coordinate registration and confirmation for OS&CI ILT courses, checks clearances for students attending courses and provides day to day correspondence with students and addresses questions
Coordinate logistics for off-site locations, provide logistical class configurations and reproduction of course materials
Update and archive student training records with OS&CI provided courses
Execute Special Access Programs (SAP) and Integrated Joint Special Technical operations (IJSTO) administrative security actions, in compliance with governing documents, to ensure customers are postured to support interfaces with the SAP and IJSTO communities
Make recommendations regarding classification review of SAP documents prior to release
Maintain billet rosters for all IJSTO accessed individuals through the NRO and Air Force SAPs
Assist in establishing and disestablishing SAP Facilities for discussion, processing and storage of sensitive program data
Assist customers in establishing Co-use and Joint-use Agreements as related to SAP and IJSTO programs
Job Requirements
Bachelor's Degree and Targeted 3 years of experience or High school diploma or GED and Targeted 5 years of experience.
TS/SCI with CI Poly.
Desired Skill Set:
Demonstrated experience with personnel security policies and practices
Demonstrated experience in access control, security personnel and physical security functional areas, to include but not limited to access control software and systems,
personnel security policies and procedures, and facility physical security requirements
Demonstrated experience working in an environment with compartmented programs

Security clearance required
TSSCI CI Poly
Travel
0 - 10%
Bachelor's Level Degree",767,Washington
57,Operations Specialist II (Watchstander),TENICA and Associates LLC,"Washington, DC 20374 (Anacostia area)",None,"ACTIVE DOD SECRET CLEARANCE REQUIRED TO BE CONSIDERED FOR THIS POSITION

Position Description:

As a Operations Specialist II (Watchstander) in Navy Regional Operations Centers (Washington, DC) you will support the monitoring, collection and sharing of all aspects of information and knowledge management using Command, Control, Communications, Computer and Intelligence (C4I) tools in the Operations Centers. The requirements include maintaining 24/7 situational awareness and situational understanding in accordance with the Commander's Critical Information Requirements, local directives, and Standard Operating Procedures. Position requires working shift work (12 hours a day for 7 days; then 7 days off) working day or night shifts, and occasional surge work in support of Regional Operations.”

Responsibilities:

Provide 24/7 situational awareness and situational understanding of activities of interest in the Region
Prepare oral and written briefings and disseminate briefings
Maintain and track status of equipment in ROC
Provide immediate response to situations requiring immediate action or notification regarding ongoing activities in Region
Support crisis action management in support of Region operations
Screen, categorize and distribute incoming messages
Control access into the Regional Operations Center
Execute Continuity of Operations activities
Prepare execute summaries and other reports as directed and required by policy and Standard Operating Procedures
Receive and process information into situational awareness displays
Provide all-hazards warnings
Coordinate with core Protection Ashore capabilities including Fire and Emergency Services, Anti-Terrorism, and Emergency Management staffs

Qualifications:

Secret Clearance
Knowledge of DOD Title 10 responsibilities desired
Knowledge of Navy/DOD organization, role of CNIC, and Navy/DOD mission
Demonstrate the ability to analyze information and make recommendations under rapidly changing conditions
Demonstrate the ability to articulate complex issues and resolutions both orally and verbally
Ability to work as part of a multi-disciplinary team
Outstanding organizational skills, attention to detail, and the ability to prioritize, meet deadlines and work under constant pressure
Skills in applying complex fact-finding, analytical, and problem solving methods and techniques
Skill in written and oral communications sufficient to prepare and present findings and recommendations to senior officials
Ability to work multiple actions concurrently
Must be a U.S. Citizen


Education and/or Experience:

High School diploma required, Bachelor's Degree desired
Ten Years of Military Experience Recommended
Five years DOD or DHS operations center environment experience recommended

Requirements/Abilities:

 Experience using Navy Protection Ashore C4I Suite desired

 Must complete the following on-line courses before work start date:

FEMA Course ICS 100, Introduction to Incident Command System
FEMA Course ICS 200, ICS for Single Resources/Initial Action
FEMA Course IS-700, National Incident Management System
FEMA Course IS-800, National Response Plan

Geographic Location: Washington, DC

Travel: Minimal

TENICA and Associates is a provider of government services and consulting solutions in the areas of national defense, homeland and cyber security. TENICA provides knowledgeable and experienced subject matter experts to perform a variety of professional services, logistics and supply chain management, crisis prevention and response, and information technology solutions to solve dynamic security challenges. Founded in 2008 and based in Chantilly, Virginia, TENICA is a Service Disabled Veteran Owned, Woman Owned, Small Business (SDVOB and WOSB) and is a participant in the Small Business Administration’s 8(a) business development program. www.TENICA.biz.

TENICA is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, or protected veteran status and will not be discriminated against on the basis of disability.",767,Washington
58,Senior Analysis and Technical Support Specialist,"Amyx, Inc.","Washington, DC 20001 (Shaw area)",None,"Overview:

Amyx is seeking to hire a Senior Analysis and Technical Support Specialist to support our Department of Homeland Security client in Washington, D.C.
Responsibilities:
Support development of program performance goals and metrics based on Strategic Plans, Annual Operating Plans, and 5 Year Plans.
Collect inputs on performance against baselined objectives and initiatives and provide analysis of interdependencies and impact to leadership.
Conduct trend analysis of program and operational performance to identify opportunities for process improvement.
Update goals and metrics based on evolving requirements.
Maintain performance metrics dashboards and databases in JIRA or other applicable tools.
Maintaining ongoing communications with, and serving as a point of contact to access subject matter experts relevant to ongoing strategic efforts;
Analyzing, advising, developing programmatic and technical solutions to manage projects. Examples may include but are not limited to: Cloud Security, Industrial Control Systems, Supply Chain Risk Management, Unified Workflow Processes, and Building Resilient Architecture,
Identifying opportunities and develop strategies to integrate related technical capabilities;
Evaluating the scientific and engineering credibility of proposed technical projects and deliverables for ongoing projects;
Providing quality control and quality assurance on technical products;
Assist in conducting in-depth studies and writing analytic reports on topics identified by leadership and driven by requirements as determined by Agency leadership, subcomponents and external customers;
Microsoft Office products, JIRA
Qualifications:
Master's degree (MA/MS) and 10+ years of professional, relevant experience OR Bachelor's degree (BA/BS) and 18+ years of professional, relevant experience
Currently hold, or the ability to obtain, a DHS Suitability
Highly proficient in Microsoft Office products
Exceptional written and verbal skills
Ability to work independently and as part of a team
Please contact talent@amyx.com with any questions!
Amyx is an Equal Opportunity employer. Amyx is committed to providing equal employment opportunity to all job seekers. Every qualified applicant receives focused consideration for employment and no one is discriminated against on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, disability or protected veteran status. In addition to federal law requirements, Amyx complies with applicable state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment in every location in which the company has facilities. This applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting, hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation and training. Equal Opportunity Employer- Minorities/Females/Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity. Amyx is an E-Verify employer.

Amyx proudly and proactively takes affirmative action to advance employment of individuals who are minorities, women, protected veterans and individuals with disabilities.



Physical Demands

Employee needs to be able to sit at a workstation for extended periods; use hand(s) to handle or feel objects, tools, or controls; reach with hands and arms; talk and hear. Most positions require ability to work on desktop or laptop computer for extended periods of time reading, reviewing/analyzing information, and providing recommendations, summaries and/or reports in written format. Must be able to effectively communicate with others verbally and in writing. Employee may be required to occasionally lift and/or move moderate amounts of weight, typically less than 20 pounds. Regular and predictable attendance is essential.",767,Washington
59,Advanced Systems Administration Specialist (Linux / Networking),"General Dynamics Mission Systems, Inc","Fairfax, VA 22033",None,"Basic Qualifications :

Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, a related field or equivalent experience is required plus a minimum of 5 years of relevant experience; or Master's degree plus 3 years of relevant experience.


CLEARANCE REQUIREMENTS:
Department of Defense Secret security clearance is required at time of hire. Applicants selected will be subject to a U.S. Government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information. Due to the nature of work performed within our facilities, U.S. citizenship is required.
Responsibilities for this Position:

At General Dynamics Mission Systems, we create the technologies, products and services that help our nation’s heroes keep our nation safe. The work we do is so advanced, we are continuously moving the boundaries of what’s possible. Here you’ll work with the best and your talent will be front and center on projects that impact the world. Are you up to the challenge?

We apply advanced technologies such as Artificial Intelligence, Blockchain, AR/VR, Cloud Native and Quantum Physics to solve our customers’ missions in cyber, RF, undersea, interstellar and everything in between.


As an Advanced Systems Administration Specialist, you’ll serve as a front-line interface to users with technical issues by conducting systems analysis and development to keep systems current with changing technologies. Your duties may include installing new software, troubleshooting, granting permissions to applications and training users. You’ll also be responsible for the day-to-day support of server services by performing server administration for physical and virtual server operating systems and configuring, maintaining and troubleshooting of physical and virtual hardware and network related interfaces on servers. And, you’ll perform OS and vendor software patching on servers and monitor physical and virtual servers performance using monitoring tools.
What you’ll experience:
Technologies that aren’t just top-notch, they’re often top-secret
A team of bold thinkers committed to exploring what’s next
Opportunities to gain new knowledge - as it’s discovered
What you bring to the table:
A Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, a related field or equivalent experience plus a minimum of 5 years of relevant experience; or Master's degree plus 3 years of relevant experience
Advanced understanding of complex networks & server based operating systems:
Design, planning, implementation, monitoring, administering and maintaining computer networks.
Cisco, Taclanes, WANs, LANs, Firewalls, switches and routers.
Linux including RHEL/CentOS, specifically secure environments. Virtualized and bare metal
Infrastructure aspects of Linux related to authentication, policy, scanning, logging, storage.
Microsoft Windows 10 desktop and Microsoft Windows 2008/2012
Enhanced troubleshooting skills within the server OS as well as both networking and storage technologies
Hands-on experience developing, deploying and supporting large-scale enterprise server solutions
What sets you apart:
Team player who thrives in collaborative environments and revels in team success
Team player who thrives in collaborative environments and revels in team success
Broad understanding of the interrelationships within the IT environment with focus on server and services
Senior level knowledge of physical and virtual server support
Senior level knowledge of access, permissions and security that gives the clients the access to the data they need to perform their daily activities
NOTE: The position requires you to be on site in our Fairfax, VA. facility
#CJ2
Company Overview:

General Dynamics Mission Systems (GDMS) engineers a diverse portfolio of high technology solutions, products and services that enable customers to successfully execute missions across all domains of operation. With a global team of 12,000+ top professionals, we partner with the best in industry to expand the bounds of innovation in the defense and scientific arenas. Given the nature of our work and who we are, we value trust, honesty, alignment and transparency. We offer highly competitive benefits and pride ourselves in being a great place to work with a shared sense of purpose. You will also enjoy a flexible work environment where contributions are recognized and rewarded. If who we are and what we do resonates with you, we invite you to join our high performance team!

General Dynamics is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer that is committed to hiring a diverse and talented workforce. EOE/Disability/Veteran",767,Washington
60,Senior Help Desk Specialist,Ironclad Technnology Services,"Arlington, VA",None,"Ironclad Technology Services is a Virginia based Information Technology and Business Consulting services company focused on supporting public and private sector customers as they tackle their most daunting information technology and business challenges. We focus on solving real world business problems through innovative thinking, a talented staff, and hard work.
Ironclad Technology Services is hiring a Senior Help Desk Specialist to join our growing team in Arlington, VA.
Responsibilities
Monitor and track all service requests.
Assess each issue/request to determine appropriate course of action.
Keep users apprised of service request resolution status.
Escalate service requests to subject matter experts.
Provide desk-side assistance to resolve customer service requests.
Resolve account and access management issues
Support software and equipment install, move, add, change requests.
Configuring, troubleshooting, and maintaining end-user devices and peripherals
Tailor directory service entries-organizational mailboxes, distribution lists, etc.
Maintain hardware and software inventory accounting and asset management processes.
Install patches and perform systems updates
Install and configure portable storage devices
Provide setup and basic troubleshooting with audio and video teleconference (VTC) operations.
Minimum Qualifications
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science or Management Information Systems
6 years of relevant experience including Electronic Documentation, System Administration, Network Administration, and Database Administration
Active Secret Security Clearance
Physical Demands
Remains in a stationary position less than 50% of the time during the work day
Operates a computer and performs desk-based computer tasks; viewing a computer screen less than 50% of the time during the work day
Frequently lifting, carrying, pushing, pulling objects and/or equipment that weighs up to 50 pounds
Ability to move about the office to complete job requirements multiple times throughout the day
Balancing. Maintaining body equilibrium to prevent falling and moving, standing or crouching on narrow, slippery, or erratically moving surfaces.
Climbing, ascends/descends stairs, ladder, ramps, etc. in performance of duties more than 50%
Constantly positions self to maintain computers, hardware/ equipment in the office, including under desks and in a server closet
Ironclad Technology Services is an Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer (EEO/AA). All employment and hiring decisions are based on qualifications, merit, and business needs without regard to race, religion, color, sexual orientation, nationality, gender, ethnic origin, disability, age, sex, gender identity, veteran status, marital status or any other characteristic protected by applicable law. Ironclad offers a comprehensive compensation package including Health and Dental Insurance, Vision and Life Insurance, Short-Term & Long-Term Disability, 401(K) + company match, Paid Time Off (PTO), Paid Company Holidays, Tuition Assistance Program and more.
If you are a qualified individual with a disability and/or a disabled veteran, you may request a reasonable accommodation if you are unable or limited in your ability to access job openings or apply for a job on this site as a result of your disability. You can request assistance by contacting HRSupport@ironcladts.com or calling 757-493-3572.
#cjpost",767,Washington
61,Systems Deployment Specialist Senior,Amentum,"Springfield, VA 22153",None,"Job Summary:

The Systems Deployment Specialist Senior is responsible for installation of new Windows\Unix based computer systems remotely as well as onsite at client facilities. Perform configuration and installation of new system to include restoring client data, applications, mappings, mailboxes, etc. and ensuring network connectivity and functionality. Install and support network communication equipment, including LAN/WAN systems. Ensure the integration and operability of installed components, systems, and network solutions. Brief customer on installation progress, issues, and resolution of issues.

Principal Accountabilities
(Typical duties include the following, although specific duties vary by assignment or contract)
Lead small teams of Systems Deployment Specialists in the deployment of new Windows based computer systems to replace existing systems as part of any ongoing hardware refresh program.
Participate in large scale deployment projects.
Participate in the training of new Systems Deployment Specialists on proper processes and procedures.
Ensure communication, both prior to and during the installation, is clear, complete and concise.
Perform pre-installation integration and staging of refresh hardware.
Coordinate planned outages and data migration activities to minimize downtime.
Migrate user data and ensure data accessibility and integrity following the migration.
Provide excellent customer service to the government clients throughout the refresh process.
Provide systems training and familiarization as part of systems turnover procedures
Decommission refreshed hardware in accordance with proper procedure.
Complete and submit all reporting requirements in a timely manner.
Familiar with international travel requirements such as visa, medical, and passport.
Minimum Requirements:
Minimum five (5) years’ experience in IT systems administration, systems installation or systems support.
Bachelor’s degree in an associated discipline.
Two (2) years’ experience in related field can be substituted for each year of the 4 years of college.
Top Secret Security Clearance required, or Secret Clearance with the ability to obtain a Top Secret.
Excellent customer service and communication skills are required.
Excellent analytical and troubleshooting skills.
Must be able to work independently or as part of a small team.
Must be able to participate in cross-functional project teams, as needed.
Must be able to work in a time-sensitive environment installing mission-critical systems.
Must be able to develop, maintain, and follow defined processes and document any issues/problems clearly.
Advanced knowledge and experience in mid to large scale server hardware refreshes/deployments in a domestic and/or overseas environment a plus
Solid working knowledge and experience deploying and administering Windows Server 2008/2012, Active Directory, VMWare ESXi v5 or later, NetApp Clustered Data ONTAP, Microsoft Exchange 2010/2013, Citrix XenApp / XenDesktop, Cisco Catalyst and Nexus Switches, Cisco UCS Director. Advanced level knowledge/experience in any of the above technologies is preferred.
Ability to bend and lift equipment up to 50 pounds, and engage in labor related duties of connecting computer and networking equipment.
Must be a US Citizen
Preferred Qualifications:
Familiarity with Department of State Networks a plus
Microsoft MCSE, VMWare, NetApp, or Cisco certifications is preferred.",767,Washington
62,Security Specialist,VTG,"Chantilly, VA 20151",None,"Position Overview:

We are seeking a Security Administrative Specialist located in Chantilly, VA.
Responsibilities:
The Security Administrative Specialist provides support to the Office of Security and Counterintelligence (OS&CI) senior managers in areas of division and operational administrative security functions. The services shall support the offices of the NRO and others as required.
This labor category has three skill levels: Entry, Intermediate, and Senior.
Qualifications:
TS/SCI with Poly
BS Degree plus 1 year (Entry), 3 years (Intermediate) or 5 years (Senior)
Knowledge of Microsoft Office and standard computer applications
Oral and written communication skills sufficient to compose and deliver responses to customers' routine questions in a clear and concise manner
Knowledge of security specific systems, databases, websites, and software, including Facility and Information Security Accreditation Tool, VRBS, APICS, Scattered Castles, Joint Personnel Adjudication System or their successors
Intermediate level must also have ability to:
Experience with personnel security policies and practices
Experience in access control, security personnel and physical security functional areas, to include but not limited to access control software and systems, personnel security policies and procedures, and facility physical security requirements
Experience working in an environment with compartmented programs.
Senior Level must also have the ability to:
Experience performing adjudicative support
Expertise in eliciting information, articulating information, and documenting information in a well-organized manner;
Advanced ability to lead a team of security professionals encompassing multiple disciplines
Familiarity with Intelligence Community Directive (ICD) 705 regulations, to include requirements pertaining to Co-Use agreements",767,Washington
63,Security Operations Center Specialists,QOMPLX,"Tysons, VA 22102",None,"About QOMPLX:
Developer of enterprise operating systems designed to support the development and management of decision platforms in virtually any business domain. The company's system delivers customers advanced detection and monitoring, adaptive response, and risk optimization capabilities against advanced attackers, enabling clients to quickly and easily integrate all of the disparate data sources across the enterprise into a unified analytics infrastructure to make better decisions.
Security Operations Center Specialists – All Signals Analyst
(Sr. role is based on experience not responsibility)
To hold this role, you are expected to engage with and have a passion for signals analysis (alerts, incidents, events, etc.) and threat intelligence. You want to find ways to make your work more effective by tackling a problem and documenting the solution so it can be repeated and eventually automated.
You seek to provide better insight into the events you review and provide our clients with actionable decisions they can make to adapt and respond to possible cyber-incidents. You have a passion for solving interesting problems and teaching others because the problem you just solved was interesting.
This role requires a unique blend of technical analyst, an expert in the interactions of technology and events, and investigator, someone who can draw lines between seemingly unconnected acts to find
patterns and anti-patterns. Understanding of how systems interact with each other and how people interact with systems really adds your value above being a simple human monitoring system.
When you do not have the right tool for the job, you are the one who finds or proposes a solution. The ability to communicate and document how you need the tools to work is also as critical as communicating your technology gap. Working with development and the organizational technology
team, you provide the insight and requirements needed to expand the capability of the functions you use every day to accomplish the task of watching the walls of the client castle better and more efficiently.
This is not a position that watches the clock. Incidents and events can occur at any time, and in this role, you are expected to be available and responsive to assist the client. That said, flexibility comes from
leveraging your team, so this role is also one where you coordinate with peers and train junior and senior members through your experience. Demonstrating leadership is an expectation of every team member at every level – ingenuity and innovation do not have a title.

Qualities:

A passion for problem solving and critical decision making – curiosity and a resistance to static answers in dynamic situations.
Comfort with writing procedural or narrative practices – document the story of what you did and build a repeatable method that others will follow.
Solid translation skills – take the technical details and convert them to common sense explanations, assisting any audience to quickly understand the problem while providing guidance and options for action and solutioning.
Mentor and eternal student – the problems we face are constantly changing, sharing our knowledge, and learning from each other is the only way to keep up. Thorough understanding of the application of Information Security – it’s not just theory, its people and process and not just technology – you need to understand how people work, not just what are the controls around them.

Responsibilities:

Perform analysis around cyber-events by conducting research; evaluating the effect and impacts generated by the event, developing or recommending analytic approaches of solutions to problems with incomplete information.Identification of cyber threats through common methodology such as the MITRE ATT & CK frameworkCoordination and communication with client technical staff to prepare assessment reports, briefing and action reports in response to identified security events, tailoring analysis and options for the client operational environment.Utilize multiple analytic tools, databases and techniques to perform signal analysis and provide documented outcomes.Provide feedback and drive continuous improvement of internal processes, products and services.Share information with fellow analysts to improve the efficiency and response capabilities of the SOC organization and services.

Skills:

Technical acumen with various technology solutions and platforms to research and analyze provided signals around security events.
Conversational knowledge of SIGMA, HELK, ELK, YARA open-source projectsKnowledge in SOAR, CASB, UEBA 4-7 years of hands-on experience in operational using SEIM, firewall, IDS/IPS, proxy, DLP, and/or virtualization tools in support of detection, response, mitigation, and/or reporting of cyber threats affecting systems and networks 3 or more years working in a 7/24 security operations environment with hands-on event analysisProficient working with various Infrastructure tools/technologies such as SCCM, GPO, ActiveDirectory/KerberosStrong background in Microsoft Windows and Linux/UnixExperience in developing and deploying critical security architecture solutions such as SEIM, Firewalls, IDS/IPS, Proxies, DLP, Virtualization, and Host security solutions.Experience with Vulnerability scanners like Nessus, MVM, Qualys, etc.Knowledge of Networking protocols and technologies, e.g. TCP/IP, firewalls, routers, etc. Understanding of Infrastructure Security and its impact on Security Operations, Vulnerabilities, Reporting, Analytics and Monitoring.Broad knowledge of security best practices, security solutions, and methodologies for conducting advance security assessments, to include manual assessments and malicious user testingKnowledge and understanding of network protocols, network devices, multiple operating systems, and secure architectures.Knowledge and understanding in computer evidence seizure, computer forensic analysis and data recovery, network forensics and system log analysis.Experience with current cyber threats and the associated tactics, techniques and procedures used to exploit computer networks.Knowledge of performing risk, business impact, control and vulnerability assessments.Direct involvement in data source normalization techniques and methods

Qualifications:

Reside in the greater Washington D.C. area or able to relocateBachelor’s degree or 4 years of relevant work experienceMinimum of 4-7 years of experience in roles related to cyber security operations performing cyber security analysis, process and proceduresWilling to work shifts to support 7/24 operations, including weekend and on-call coverage
Compensation & Benefits:
Competitive salary
Full range of benefits, including 401(k) and medical, dental & vision coverage
Flexible “Personal Time Off (PTO)” plan and 10+ paid holiday days per year
Contact Us
Apply for this role at QOMPLX.com/careers",767,Washington
64,Operations Specialist II (Watchstander),TENICA and Associates LLC,"Washington, DC 20374 (Anacostia area)",None,"ACTIVE DOD SECRET CLEARANCE REQUIRED TO BE CONSIDERED FOR THIS POSITION

Position Description:

As a Operations Specialist II (Watchstander) in Navy Regional Operations Centers (Washington, DC) you will support the monitoring, collection and sharing of all aspects of information and knowledge management using Command, Control, Communications, Computer and Intelligence (C4I) tools in the Operations Centers. The requirements include maintaining 24/7 situational awareness and situational understanding in accordance with the Commander's Critical Information Requirements, local directives, and Standard Operating Procedures. Position requires working shift work (12 hours a day for 7 days; then 7 days off) working day or night shifts, and occasional surge work in support of Regional Operations.”

Responsibilities:

Provide 24/7 situational awareness and situational understanding of activities of interest in the Region
Prepare oral and written briefings and disseminate briefings
Maintain and track status of equipment in ROC
Provide immediate response to situations requiring immediate action or notification regarding ongoing activities in Region
Support crisis action management in support of Region operations
Screen, categorize and distribute incoming messages
Control access into the Regional Operations Center
Execute Continuity of Operations activities
Prepare execute summaries and other reports as directed and required by policy and Standard Operating Procedures
Receive and process information into situational awareness displays
Provide all-hazards warnings
Coordinate with core Protection Ashore capabilities including Fire and Emergency Services, Anti-Terrorism, and Emergency Management staffs

Qualifications:

Secret Clearance
Knowledge of DOD Title 10 responsibilities desired
Knowledge of Navy/DOD organization, role of CNIC, and Navy/DOD mission
Demonstrate the ability to analyze information and make recommendations under rapidly changing conditions
Demonstrate the ability to articulate complex issues and resolutions both orally and verbally
Ability to work as part of a multi-disciplinary team
Outstanding organizational skills, attention to detail, and the ability to prioritize, meet deadlines and work under constant pressure
Skills in applying complex fact-finding, analytical, and problem solving methods and techniques
Skill in written and oral communications sufficient to prepare and present findings and recommendations to senior officials
Ability to work multiple actions concurrently
Must be a U.S. Citizen


Education and/or Experience:

High School diploma required, Bachelor's Degree desired
Ten Years of Military Experience Recommended
Five years DOD or DHS operations center environment experience recommended

Requirements/Abilities:

 Experience using Navy Protection Ashore C4I Suite desired

 Must complete the following on-line courses before work start date:

FEMA Course ICS 100, Introduction to Incident Command System
FEMA Course ICS 200, ICS for Single Resources/Initial Action
FEMA Course IS-700, National Incident Management System
FEMA Course IS-800, National Response Plan

Geographic Location: Washington, DC

Travel: Minimal

TENICA and Associates is a provider of government services and consulting solutions in the areas of national defense, homeland and cyber security. TENICA provides knowledgeable and experienced subject matter experts to perform a variety of professional services, logistics and supply chain management, crisis prevention and response, and information technology solutions to solve dynamic security challenges. Founded in 2008 and based in Chantilly, Virginia, TENICA is a Service Disabled Veteran Owned, Woman Owned, Small Business (SDVOB and WOSB) and is a participant in the Small Business Administration’s 8(a) business development program. www.TENICA.biz.

TENICA is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, or protected veteran status and will not be discriminated against on the basis of disability.",767,Washington
65,Computer Security Systems Specialist - Senior (3.2 SECURITY ENGINEERING SUPPORT),"Technical and Management Resources, Inc.","Annapolis Junction, MD 20701",None,"Overview:

TMR is looking for a Computer Security Systems Specialist to support the Department of Transportation Administration (TSA), Office of Information Technology (IT), Technology Solutions Division (TSD). TSD will be adding additional IT systems to support the TSA Pre✓® expansion effort. All systems are used to improve the security of our nation’s transportation systems by applying dynamic risk-based, intelligence driven vetting procedures and enhancing its use of technology. This position is located in Annapolis Junction, MD.
Responsibilities:

Provide Information Systems Security Officer (ISSO) support services that involves Security Engineering and Security Compliance for TSA’s mission critical systems, including Secure Flight (SF), Screening Gateway (SG), Transportation Vetting System (TVS), Technology Infrastructure Modernization (TIM) System, and the Security Threat Assessment Mission Platform (STAMP) that will significantly improve security operation of our nation’s traveling public.
Qualifications:

Required:
Must have 15 years of experience.
Computer Security Systems Specialists must possess a Batchelor’s Degree or higher and have an active Certified Information Systems Security Professional (CISSP) certification or Certified Information Security Manager (CISM) certification.
US Citizen able to obtain/maintain Public Trust clearance
Preferred:
The following certifications are preferred but not required: Linux+, Network+, CCNA, CAP, CEH, ESCA, and OSCP.
The following experience is preferred, but not required: Security Development lifecycle management, DevSecOps, and CI/CD integration.
The Specialist should have experience with a variety of Programming Languages including Java, PHP, C, .NET as well as experience with various Operating Systems including Windows, Linux and Unix.",767,Washington
66,Supervisory IT Specialist (INFOSEC),US DHS Headquarters,"Washington, DC","$144,128 - $172,500 a year","Duties
Summary
Direct Hire Authority: This position will be filled through the Office of Personnel Management's Direct Hire Authority. The ""Rule of Three"", Category Rating and Veterans Preference will not apply to this vacancy.

All DHS-HQ announcements have a 5 business day open period due to the number of applications received. This announcement will be open for 5 business days OR until the first 100 applications have been received, whichever happens first.
Responsibilities
This position is located in the Department of Homeland Security, Office of the Chief Information Officer (OCIO), Office of the Chief Technology Officer (OCTO), Washington, District of Columbia.

The primary purpose of this position is to serve as the OCTO Operations Manager providing the strategic roadmap for IT across DHS, including strengthening cybersecurity practices and IT security policy for DHS.

Duties performed:

Manage, oversee, and provide technical direction for IT efforts including the development of program and/or security assessment and evaluation criteria.
Supervise a group of IT Specialists in the performance of work related to strategic planning, capability planning and execution of program goals, ensuring the confidentiality, integrity, and availability of systems, networks, and data.
Perform full-range of supervisory duties, including set and adjust short-term priorities, assign and evaluate work, and hear and resolve complaints.
Work with colleagues and senior management to lead IT initiatives, including managing a budget and assessing contractor performance.
Represent the organization to discuss DHS IT and Network Defense capability to agency staff and external partners.

Travel Required
Occasional travel - You may be expected to travel 1-5 nights per month for this position.
Supervisory status
Yes
Promotion Potential
None
Job family (Series)
2210 Information Technology Management
Similar jobs
Chief Technology Officers
Officers, Chief Technology
Requirements

Requirements
Conditions of Employment
You must be a U.S. citizen to apply for this position.
You must successfully pass a background investigation. This may include a credit check, a review of financial issues, as well as certain criminal offenses and illegal use or possession of drugs.
Males born after 12/31/59 must be registered or exempt from Selective Service (see http://www.sss.gov/).
One-year probationary period may be required.
A pre-employment drug test may be required.
If you receive a conditional offer of employment for this position, you will be required to complete an Optional Form 306, Declaration for Federal Employment, and to sign and certify the accuracy of all information in your application.
DHS uses e-Verify, an Internet-based system, to confirm the eligibility of all newly hired employees to work in the United States.
All Federal employees are required to have Federal salary payments made by direct deposit to a financial institution of their choosing.
License required: No
Pre-employment physical required: No
Bargaining Unit Position: No
Permanent Change of Duty Station (PCS) Expenses will not be paid.
Financial Disclosure: If you are hired, you may be required to complete a Confidential Financial Disclosure Report (OGE Form 450) within 30 days after appointment.
Promotion Potential: This position is at the full performance level.
Supervisory Probationary Period: This is a supervisory position. Under provisions of the Civil Service Reform Act, first time supervisors and/or managers will be required to serve a 1-year probationary period. You may also be required to complete an appropriate supervisory training course within one year of assignment to this position.

Qualifications
Applicants must demonstrate that they meet the 4 IT Competencies AND Specialized Experience requirements as noted below.

4 IT Competencies (must meet all 4 listed below):
Attention to Detail- Developing and implementing long-range IT plans for an organization.
Customer Service- Addressing customer issues by identifying and removing barriers in IT systems.
Oral Communication- Collaborating with technical partners to provide guidance and address cybersecurity issues within an organization.
Problem Solving- Identifying and assessing cybersecurity threats to determine the impact on an organization's IT program.


AND


Specialized Experience:
GS-15: Applicant must demonstrate at least one year of specialized experience equivalent in difficulty and responsibility to the GS-14 level in the Federal service that included:
Identifying and piloting emerging IT security technologies to mitigate cyberspace vulnerabilities for an organization.
Evaluating an organization's IT program to ensure policies are in alignment with cybersecurity laws and regulations.
Providing oversight of an IT program, including monitoring a budget and implementing strategic plans to meet organizational mission.
Providing leadership and direction to IT Staff, including planning, organizing, and evaluating work to accomplish IT activities for an organization.


All qualification requirements must be met by the closing date of this announcement. Qualification claims will be subject to verification.


NOTE: Experience refers to paid and unpaid experience, including volunteer work done through National Service programs (e.g., Peace Corps, AmeriCorps) and other organizations (e.g., professional; philanthropic; religious; spiritual; community, student, social). Volunteer work helps build critical competencies, knowledge, and skills and can provide valuable training and experience that translates directly to paid employment. You will receive credit for all qualifying experience, including volunteer experience.
Education
Education is not applicable for this position.

Additional information
Note: DHS continues to take necessary steps to keep our workforce safe amid the COVID-19 pandemic. If you receive a final job offer to onboard, please complete the onboarding forms and submit them electronically in an expeditious manner. Your start date may be delayed if the action above is not completed.


Background Investigation: To ensure the accomplishment of its mission, the Department of Homeland Security (DHS) requires each and every employee to be reliable and trustworthy. To meet those standards, all selected applicants must undergo and successfully complete a background investigation for Sensitive Compartmented Information (SCI) clearance as a condition of placement in this Special-Sensitive position. This review includes financial issues such as delinquency in the payment of debts, child support and/or tax obligations, as well as certain criminal offenses and illegal use or possession of drugs.

Pursuant to Executive Order 12654 and DHS policy, DHS is committed to maintaining a drug-free workplace and, therefore, conducts random and other drug testing of its employees in order to ensure a safe and healthy work environment. Headquarters personnel in safety- or security-sensitive positions are subject to random drug testing and all applicants tentatively selected for employment at DHS Headquarters are subject to drug testing resulting in a negative test result.

Current or Former Political Appointees: The Office of Personnel Management (OPM) must authorize employment offers made to current or former political appointees. If you are currently, or have been within the last 5 years, a political Schedule A, Schedule C, Non-career SES or Presidential Appointee employee in the Executive Branch, you must disclose this information to the Human Resources Office.

Interagency/Career Transition Assistance Program (ICTAP/CTAP): This program applies to Federal service employees whose positions have been deemed surplus or no longer needed, or employees who have been involuntarily separated from a Federal service position within the competitive service. To receive selection priority for this position, you must: 1) meet eligibility criteria for CTAP or ICTAP; 2) be rated well-qualified for the position; and 3) submit the appropriate documentation to support your CTAP or ICTAP eligibility. Well-Qualified includes those applicants whose knowledge, skills, and abilities clearly exceed the minimum qualification requirements for the position. For information on eligibility criteria and required documentation, go to: http://www.opm.gov/rif/employee_guides/career_transition.asp

Selective Service: Males born after 12/31/59 must be registered or exempt from Selective Service (see http://www.sss.gov/).

How You Will Be Evaluated
You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications above.
Direct Hire Authority: These positions will be filled through the Office of Personnel Management's Direct Hire Authority. The ""Rule of Three"", Category Rating and Veterans Preference will not apply to this vacancy. For more information on Direct Hire Authority, please see: OPM Direct Hire Fact Sheet.

Veterans: Under the provisions of the Direct-Hire Authority, veterans' preference does not apply. However, applicants who are eligible for Veterans Preference are still encouraged to include that information in their application and submit supporting documentation (i.e. DD-214, or other substantiating documents). View information on veterans' preference.

We will review your resume and supporting documentation to ensure you meet the minimum qualification requirements. If you are qualified, you may be referred to the hiring manager for consideration and may be called for an interview.

To preview the assessment questionnaire, click the following link: https://apply.usastaffing.gov/ViewQuestionnaire/11118038

Background checks and security clearance
Security clearance
Sensitive Compartmented Information
Drug test required
Yes
Position sensitivity and risk
Special-Sensitive (SS)/High Risk
Trust determination process
National security
Required Documents

Required Documents
To apply for this position, you must submit a complete Application Package which includes:

1. Your resume showing a detailed description of your job-related qualifications that includes beginning and ending dates with the month and year and hours worked per week (if less than 40) for each paid and non-paid work experience job title listed.
2. Other supporting documents (only submit if applicable to you):

Are you claiming special priority selection rights under the Career Transition Assistance Program (ICTAP/CTAP)? If so, submit:
A copy of your RIF separation notice, notice of proposed removal for failure to relocate, notice of disability annuity termination, or certification from the National Guard Bureau or Military Department that you are eligible for disability retirement;
A copy of your SF-50 ""Notification of Personnel Action'', documenting your RIF separation, noting your positions, grade level, and duty location, and/or Agency certification of inability to place you through RPL, etc.;
A copy of your latest performance appraisal including your rating; and
Any documentation from your agency that shows your current promotion potential.
Are you a current or former political Schedule A, Schedule C, Non-career SES or Presidential Appointee employee? Submit a copy of your applicable SF-50, along with a statement that provides the following information regarding your most recent political appointment:
Position title;
Type of appointment (Schedule A, Schedule C, Non-career SES, or Presidential Appointee);
Agency; and
Beginning and ending dates of appointment.
Benefits

Benefits
A career with the U.S. Government provides employees with a comprehensive benefits package. As a federal employee, you and your family will have access to a range of benefits that are designed to make your federal career very rewarding. Opens in a new windowLearn more about federal benefits.
Review our benefits
Eligibility for benefits depends on the type of position you hold and whether your position is full-time, part-time, or intermittent. Contact the hiring agency for more information on the specific benefits offered.
Help
This job is open to
Career transition (CTAP, ICTAP, RPL)
Federal employees who meet the definition of a ""surplus"" or ""displaced"" employee.
The public
U.S. citizens, nationals or those who owe allegiance to the U.S.
Clarification from the agency
All U.S. Citizens through Direct Hire procedures",767,Washington
67,IT Support Specialist,IT Concepts,"Vienna, VA",None,"What will you be doing?: Handle daily responses to user requests for IT support services by providing IT support to users both onsite and in remote locationsWork with senior technical managers and staff to provide support for application design (including systems requirements), development, testing, and maintenance supportDevelop, maintain, and use applications in Workstation/Local Area Network (IWS/LAN) environments. Maintains and supports applications, computer and/or network operating systems, and other system softwareImage, configure and deploy workstations and laptops, and install, configure, and troubleshoot desktop and network printersProvide administration support for SharePoint including: Customizing SharePoint web pages, creating custom workflows using SharePoint Designer;Managing SharePoint content in lists and librariesMigrating SharePoint sites from one location to another;Managing SharePoint site permissionsSetup, configure, administer, support and troubleshoot Microsoft Exchange email accountsCreate, support, administer and troubleshoot Microsoft Exchange distribution lists, individual and group mailboxes, and move mailboxes, user accounts across domains and update user information in the Global Address ListSupport, administer and troubleshoot issues with Windows Operating Systems, Adobe, and Microsoft software, Office 365 including but not limited to Outlook including personal folders, Word, Excel, Access, PowerPoint, Project, Visio, SharePoint Designer, and similarInstall, support and troubleshoot third-party auxiliary softwareProvide setup and support of Windows file, print and database servers including setup and administration of file shares and manage, support and troubleshoot file and folder permissionsTroubleshoot network, internet\intranet and wireless network connectivity issuesProvide iPhone / Android setup, configuration, troubleshooting and provide onsite and remote support for iPhone / Android users; and Create technical documentation such as “how to” documentsRequirementsExpertise with Windows OSiOS and Android device supportBasic knowledge of networking, router, and switch managementLaptop hardware/software troubleshooting and/or repairInventory management including but not limited to provisioning and refurbishing laptopsKnowledge of VOIP systems and hardwareMaintain office security, including management of electronic entry system and surveillance systemInstallation and maintenance of various electronic peripherals such as monitors, TV, tablets, etc.Other miscellaneous IT/office supportHighly preferred: Experience with Office 365 cloud services including Azure and IntuneExperience with Mac OS XExperience with SharePointExperience with WordPressPossible travel within 15 miles of office: UPS and/or other shipping drop off locationsLocal retailer for electronic hardwareShredding servicesBenefitsThe Company: Founded in 2003, IT Concepts was established with a simple yet important promise to “deliver technology concepts that work.” This founding principle, which permeates throughout our team and company culture, has propelled ITC to the upper echelons of the industry. With award-winning services and unflinching dedication to country and clients, ITC remains committed to teamwork, innovation, and collaboration.We’re an SBA 8(a) and CVE certified Service-Disabled Veteran Owned Small Business focused on providing best in class IT Services, Management Consulting, and Data Services Solutions to our clients.We’re ISO 27001:2013, ISO 20000-1:2011, and ISO 9001:2015 certified and have CMMI DEV and SVC ML3 ratingsWe’ve been named part of:  Inc 5000’s Fastest Growing Private Companies in 2016, 2018, 2020 and 2021; Washington Business Journal’s Fastest Growing Companies in 2015, 2016, 2017 and 2019; Washington Business Journal’s Best Places to Work in 2015, 2016, 2017 and 2019.The Employer: We offer great benefits – Competitive Paid Time Off, Medical, Dental and Vision Insurance, Identity Protection, Pet Insurance, 401(k) with company matching and Profit SharingWe invest in our employees – Each ITC employee is provided with a LinkedIn Learning Account for endless training. In addition, every employee is provided with a stipend to invest in certifications, a master’s degree, or even a doctorate.We work hard, we play hard -Nationals Games, Happy Hours, Holiday events, philanthropic endeavors, etc…at ITC we enjoy working together but also take time to connect with each other and our community through various events and activities.IT Concepts is an Affirmative Action/Equal Opportunity employer. As such, any personnel decisions (hire, promotion, job status, etc.) on applicants and/or employees are based on merit, qualifications, competence and business needs, not on race, color, citizenship status, national origin, ancestry, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, religion, creed, physical or mental disability, pregnancy, childbirth or related medical condition, genetic information of the employee or family member of the employee, marital status, veteran status, political affiliation, or any other factor protected by federal, state or local law.To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. Reasonable Accommodations may be made to enable qualified individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.Job Type: Full-timeSchedule:8 hour shift",767,Washington
68,IT SPECIALIST (SYSANALYSIS),US Defense Information Systems Agency,"Fort Meade, MD","$103,690 - $134,798 a year","Duties
Summary
This position is being recruited under 10 USC 1599f into the Cyber Excepted Service and does NOT convey eligibility to be converted to the Competitive Service. It has been identified as a position necessary to carry out and support the mission of the US Cyber Command.


It is in the Professional Work Category at the Senior Work Level within the CES Occupational Structure. It is located in the DISA Development and Business Center Cyber Development Directorate (ID23).
Responsibilities
Incumbent provides technical support and guidance to staff in matters relating to information management (IT) issues.
Provides occupational, technical, and analytical advice to the staff.
Performs needs analyses to define opportunities for new or improved business process solutions; consults with customers to identify and specify requirements.
Develops overall functional and systems requirements and specifications; conducts business process reengineering.
Develops cost estimates for new or modified systems.
Subject matter expert in areas such as information technology; and/or life cycle system development.
Travel Required
Occasional travel - You may be expected to travel for this position.
Supervisory status
No
Promotion Potential
13
Job family (Series)
2210 Information Technology Management
Requirements

Requirements
Conditions of Employment
Must be a U.S. Citizen.
Males born after 12-31-59 must be registered or exempt from Selective Service.
This national security position, which may require access to classified information, requires a favorable suitability review and security clearance as a condition of employment. Failure to maintain security eligibility may result in termination.
Drug Test Position.
Qualifications
In order to qualify for this position, you must meet the requirements described below.

Basic Requirements:
IT-related experience demonstrating the following:
Attention to Detail
Customer Service
Oral Communication
Problem Solving


Qualifying Experience:

To qualify at the GG-13, your resume must describe at least one year of experience that demonstrates the competencies necessary for immediate success in the position. Experience refers to any paid or unpaid experience, including volunteer work and Military service, that would be considered equivalent to work normally performed at the next lower grade level in the federal service. For this position, qualifying experience is defined as: data communication technology, data base information management, distributive data processing, client/work server architectures, web (Inter/Intranet) processing/implementation, acquisition, implementation and life-cycle management processes and modernization of office automation system/support to review, analyze, and resolve information management system problems.

Candidates must describe how they meet the qualifying experience and/or selective placement factor(s) within the body of their resume. All qualifications must be met within 30 days after the closing date of this announcement.
Education
There is no substitution of education for the qualifying experienceat the GG-13 grade level
Additional information
This position is in the Excepted Service and does NOT convey eligibility to be converted to the Competitive Service. It is being recruited under 10 U.S.C. 1599f into the Cyber Excepted Service (CES) personnel system.
If you are a current Federal Career/Career-Conditional employee, you will be placed on an Excepted appointment.
This appointment does not confer eligibility to be non-competitively converted to an appointment in the competitive service.
A three year trial period may be required if you have not previously completed a trial or probationary period in the excepted or competitive service.
Telework availability will be based upon the mission requirements and supervisory determination
Individuals tentatively selected for drug testing designated positions at the Defense Information Systems Agency will be required to submit to urinalysis for illegal drugs prior to appointment or placement.
We may use this announcement to fill additional vacancies within 90 days of the closing date.
Moving costs MAY be paid.
The Tax Cuts and Jobs Act of 2017 makes certain reimbursements/payments taxable. For information on these changes and the Relocation Income Tax Allowance (RITA), for which some appointees are eligible, click here.
Recruitment, relocation, or retention incentives MAY be authorized.
The Department of Defense (DoD) policy on employment of annuitants issued March 18, 2004 will be used in determining eligibility of annuitants. It applies to former Federal civilian employees receiving a retirement annuity from the Civil Service Retirement and Disability Fund that are hired within the DoD on or after November 24, 2003. The policy also applies to annuitants (appointed in DoD on/or after November 24, 2003) who move from one position to another within DoD through voluntary reassignment, promotion, change to lower grade or transfer between military departments. Please see this policy here.
Because this position is in the Cyber Excepted Service, Veterans' Preference will be applied to preference eligible candidates, as defined by Section 2108 of the Title 5 U.S.C. in accordance with the procedures provided in DoD Instruction 1400.25, Volume 3005, ""CES Employment and Placement."" If you are a veteran claiming veteran's preference, as defined by Section 2108 of Title 5 U.S.C., you must submit documents verifying your eligibility with your application package.
For more information on the Cyber Excepted Service Personnel System, click here.
For more information on veterans' preference, click here.
For more information regarding qualifications requirements, click here.
If you are unable to apply online, view the following link for information regarding Alternate Application.


How You Will Be Evaluated
You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications above.
Once the application process is complete, a review of your resume and supporting documentation will be made and compared against your responses to the applicant questionnaire to determine if you are qualified for this job. If, after reviewing your resume and or supporting documentation, a determination is made that you have inflated your qualifications and or experience, you may lose consideration for this position. Please follow all instructions carefully. Errors or omissions may affect your rating.


You can preview the Questionnaire here:https://apply.usastaffing.gov/ViewQuestionnaire/11142190

Background checks and security clearance
Security clearance
Sensitive Compartmented Information
Drug test required
Yes
Position sensitivity and risk
Special-Sensitive (SS)/High Risk
Trust determination process
National security
Required Documents

Required Documents

FOR THIS JOB ANNOUNCEMENT THE FOLLOWING SUPPORTING DOCUMENTS ARE REQUIRED AS THEY APPLY STATED BELOW AND MUST BE RECEIVED BY THE CLOSE OF THE ANNOUNCEMENT. NOT ALL DOCUMENTS WILL APPLY TO EVERYONE.

Transcripts (if applicable) If you are substituting education for specialized experience you must submit all of your transcripts. The absence of this information will result in an ineligible rating.
SF-50 - (if applicable) Notification of Personnel Action for current or former federal employees- All applicants to include DISA agency employees must provide your most recent SF50 or the SF50 reflecting Career/Career-Conditional tenure and the highest grade held on a permanent basis.
Veterans Preference Documentation (if applicable): Candidates claiming Veterans Preference must submit a DD-214 (Member Copy 4), or, if you are CURRENTLY serving on active duty, a statement of service from your unit which states the date you entered on active duty, the date you are separating, and the campaign medals you have received. For those supplying the statement of service, preference will be verified by a DD-214 (Member Copy 4) upon separation from the military. Veterans with a service-connected disability must also submit a VA letter dated 1991 or later. DoD Components with CES positions apply Veterans' Preference to preference eligible candidates, as defined by Section 2108 of the Title 5 U.S.C. in accordance with the procedures provided in DoD Instruction 1400.25, Volume 3005, ""CES Employment and Placement.""
Military Spouse Preference (if applicable): Spousal Permanent Change of Station (PCS) orders, marriage certificate/license, and a MILITARY SPOUSE PPP SELF-CERTIFICATION CHECKLIST are required to claim Military Spouse Preference. The Military Spouse PPP Self-Certification Checklist can be found here: Military Spouse PPP Self-Certification Checklist .


Your complete Application Package (containing the above required documents) must be received no later than 11:59 pm Eastern Time on 06/17/2021.

WARNING: Failure to submit a complete application package including any required documentation by 11:59 PM (EST) on 06/17/2021, or at the time of application for announcements with an extended closing date, may result in an ineligible rating and loss of consideration. To verify that your application is complete, log into your USAJOBS account, select Application Status and More Information. The Details page will display the status of your application. It is the applicant's responsibility to verify that information entered, uploaded is received, legible and accurate. HR will not modify answers submitted by an applicant.
If you are relying on your education to meet qualification requirements:
Education must be accredited by an accrediting institution recognized by the U.S. Department of Education in order for it to be credited towards qualifications. Therefore, provide only the attendance and/or degrees from schools accredited by accrediting institutions recognized by the U.S. Department of Education.
Failure to provide all of the required information as stated in this vacancy announcement may result in an ineligible rating or may affect the overall rating.
Benefits

Benefits
A career with the U.S. Government provides employees with a comprehensive benefits package. As a federal employee, you and your family will have access to a range of benefits that are designed to make your federal career very rewarding. Opens in a new windowLearn more about federal benefits.
Review our benefits
Eligibility for benefits depends on the type of position you hold and whether your position is full-time, part-time, or intermittent. Contact the hiring agency for more information on the specific benefits offered.
Help
This job is open to
The public
U.S. citizens, nationals or those who owe allegiance to the U.S.
Clarification from the agency
All US Citizens",767,Washington
69,Senior Systems Engineer,iN2STEM Solutions Inc,"Reston, VA 20190",None,"iN2STEM Solutions, Inc. is hiring Systems Engineers to support our MBSE Digital Transformation Team. Our Systems Engineering team uses a Model-Based Systems Engineering (MBSE) approach and Product Lifecycle Management to develop and implement solutions. The selected candidates will be responsible for the implementation of model structures and elements supporting the effort in specific modeling focus areas, designated programs, and project modeling activities. The team has the potential to work remotely, with some limited travel to the Washington, DC metropolitan area and the Southeast USA.

About the Program: Our client has considered an organization-wide initiative to reengineer the entire mission-based operations & maintenance process, incorporating the latest approaches in Digital Engineering and Model Based Systems Engineering (MBSE), and requiring sets of related models that describe and analyze the desired systems. The initiative requires experts, with a variety of Science, Technology, Engineering, and Mathematics (STEM) skills, who can develop creative solutions to complex systems engineering challenges.

Why iN2STEM Solutions, Inc.:
As a minority and Veteran-owned small business, iN2STEM Solutions, Inc. is a technology & innovation solutions company, that can reduce risk and uncertainty, and optimize performance and results. We enable our clients to achieve their business and mission goals by helping them to become more efficient, and to realize these improvements in significantly less time. Our proven quantitative methods validate our solutions for your operations, prior to building any system.
We use a Model-Based Systems Engineering (MBSE) approach and model driven architectures (MDA) with a business/mission lifecycle focus to solutions development to help us to guide both our commercial and government clients to the appropriate levels of technology to help them realize their solutions.

We also provide surge support offering solutions engineers and architects, project managers, and additional support to help our clients when they need it the most, whether on contract, or for proposals and capture efforts.

Our unique methodology, the iN2End SolutionTM, is a nimble approach to systems and software solutions, with a unique combination of proven processes, innovative tools, experienced people, and real-time team collaboration to optimize solutions. We can adapt to any development or acquisition environment and provide:

Greater visibility into projects and portfolios
Improved decision making, earlier in the process
Simplified and speedy applications development
Ease of maintenance, reuse, and updates and
Improved software quality

At iN2STEM Solutions, Inc., we view problems and solutions differently. We are engineers, scientists, economists, project/program managers, operations specialists and leaders who communicate, collaborate, innovate, integrate, and analyze problems, quantitatively and qualitatively, with a wholistic systems approach. We respect everyone’s contribution and consider a variety of alternatives to come to an optimum solution.

iN2STEM Solutions, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer, “Empowering the Next Generation” of our people no matter their race, color, religion, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, disability, or Veteran status. We strive to create a diverse, inclusive, and respectful work culture that values all.

Duties and Responsibilities:

Develop and maintain systems models in support of the NAVFAC MBSE effort.
Review existing models and documentation to determine compliance with best practices in systems engineering, modeling, and MBSE.
Review and characterize new or updated technologies for possible incorporation into NAVAFAC MBSE efforts.
Provide guidance to junior system engineers and modelers in model development, including detailed advice related to the use of their expertise to resolve model development challenges.
Collect and verify information to be included in modeling efforts, in coordination with program stakeholders and team members.
Engage with program and project leadership to maintain communication and to provide effective recommendations for MBSE implementation.
Maintain proficiency and expertise in the most current MBSE concepts, tools, techniques, and practices.
Review and characterize new or updated technologies for possible incorporation into NAVAIR MBSE efforts.
Collect and verify information to be included in modeling efforts, in coordination with program stakeholders and team members.
Engage with program and project leadership to maintain communication and to provide effective recommendations for MBSE implementation.
Maintain proficiency and expertise in the most current MBSE concepts, tools, techniques, and practices.

Qualifications

Required Education & Experience:

A BS/MS/PhD or BE/ME/DS/DE degree from an accredited college or university in Engineering, Mathematics, Physics, or a related scientific discipline.
Experience in developing system models at the project and facility level.
Knowledge and experience of INCOSE-based Systems Engineering processes and methods.
Experience with requirements modeling, use-case analysis, interface representation, parametric definition, or profile creation using a variety of languages and tools including SysML, Lifecycle Modeling Language (LML) MagicDraw, Cameo System Modeler, Cameo Enterprise Architect, SPEC Innovations Innoslate® lifecycle management tool, Siemens PLM Suite TeamCenter® and SolidEdge®.
Experience with systems engineering analyses and using the results with other engineering models to draw conclusions and optimize performance, schedule, timing, costs and etc.
Knowledge of one or more of these concepts as they apply to MBSE: inheritance, aggregation, metadata chains, design patterns, loose coupling, high cohesion, abstraction, value properties, and methods.
Experience in and understanding of Systems Engineering concepts.
Willing to learn a unique approach to using systems engineering to solve a variety of problems.

Security Clearance Requirement:

Must be a US Citizen with the ability to obtain an Interim DOD Secret clearance prior to start date.

Desired Qualifications:
DAU Acquisition Certification as Engineer II or higher
INCOSE Certification as ASEP, CSEP, or CSEE
DoD Acquisition Workforce experience",767,Washington
70,Information Technology Specialist (Enterprise Architect),US Food Safety and Inspection Service,"Washington, DC","$60,129 - $113,362 a year","Duties
Summary
This position is in the Office of the Chief Information Officer (OCIO), Office of the Chief Technology Officer. OCIO provides information technology (IT) planning and design, application development, systems administration, telecommunications, security, information management, and IT customer support for FSIS.

The Office of the Chief Technology Officer provides strategic leadership and technical guidance on technologies that best support the organization's business objectives.
Responsibilities
Collaborates with the other Enterprise Architects, and is responsible for documenting and evaluating architectures systems/components for Enterprise use.
Develops and evaluates mission/activity business processes providing effective planning, organizing, directing, coordinating, evaluating, and controlling of Enterprise Architecture (EA) activities to reduce architecture complexity, redundancies, etc.
Independently conducts research on emerging technologies for core system technology stack, and documents product capability/categorization for the senior Enterprise Architect to review.
Collaborates with other Enterprise Architects in monitoring OCIO's investment portfolio by analyzing FSIS's portfolio to ensure accurate investment to segment architecture alignment.
Serves as an advisor to customers and communicates EA-related information regarding change recommendations, assessments, feasibilities, data calls, modifications/additions to EA, etc.
Travel Required
Occasional travel - You may be expected to travel for this position.
Supervisory status
No
Promotion Potential
12
Job family (Series)
2210 Information Technology Management
Similar jobs
Architects, Systems
Chief Technology Officers
Information Architect
Officers, Chief Technology
Systems Architects
Requirements

Requirements
Conditions of Employment
You must be a US Citizen or US National
Males born after 12/31/1959 must be Selective Service registered or exempt
Subject to satisfactory adjudication of background investigation and/or fingerprint check
Successful completion of one-year probationary period, unless previously served.
Direct Deposit - Per Public Law 104-134 all Federal employees are required to have federal payments made by direct deposit to their financial institution
Successfully pass the E-Verify employment verification check. To learn more about E-Verify, including your rights and responsibilities, visit E-Verify at https://www.e-verify.gov/
The full performance level of this position is GS-12; however, it may be filled at developmental grades GS-11 or GS-09 as a multi-grade career ladder.
Qualifications
Applicants must meet all qualifications and eligibility requirements by the closing date of the announcement, including the basic requirement, and specialized experience or education, as defined below.

BASIC REQUIREMENT: Experience must be IT-related; the experience may be demonstrated by paid or unpaid experience and/or completion of specific, intensive training (for example, IT certification), as appropriate. Individuals must have IT-related experience demonstrating each of the four competencies listed below.
Attention to Detail - Is thorough when performing work and conscientious about attending to detail;
Customer Service - Works with clients and customers (that is, any individuals who use or receive the services or products that your work unit produces, including the general public, individuals who work in the agency, other agencies, or organizations outside the Government) to assess their needs, provide information or assistance, resolve their problems, or satisfy their expectations; knows about available products and services; is committed to providing quality products and services;
Oral Communication - Expresses information (for example, ideas or facts) to individuals or groups effectively, taking into account the audience and nature of the information (for example, technical, sensitive, controversial); makes clear and convincing oral presentations; listens to others, attends to nonverbal cues, and responds appropriately; and
Problem Solving - Identifies problems; determines accuracy and relevance of information; uses sound judgment to generate and evaluate alternatives, and to make recommendations.

In addition to meeting the Basic Requirement above, applicants must also meet the Minimum Qualifications below.
MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS: To be considered minimally qualified for this position, you must demonstrate that you have the required specialized experience or education for the respective grade level(s) to which you are applying:

GS-09
Specialized Experience: You must have at least one year of specialized experience equivalent to the GS-07 grade level in the Federal service that includes:
Applying enterprise architecture (EA) reference models, goals, and objectives to participate in developing preliminary design specifications;
Monitoring changes in policy, guidelines, legislation, and sources of technical data for potential impact on EA;
Weighing the impact of variables such as cost, variations in electronic and other equipment characteristics, and equipment availability; and
Resolving questions and problems in program requirements or other conditions;

OR
Education: Master's degree or equivalent graduate degree, or 2 full years of progressively higher level graduate education leading to a master's degree or equivalent graduate degree. Degree must be in computer science, engineering, information science, information systems management, mathematics, operations research, statistics, or technology management, or be a degree that provided a minimum of 24 semester hours in one or more of the fields identified above and required the development or adaptation of applications, systems, or networks.

GS-11
Specialized Experience: You must have at least one year of specialized experience equivalent to the GS-09 grade level in the Federal service that includes:
Developing procedures and guidelines to supplement established technical regulations;
Evaluating existing software and hardware solutions to ensure adherence to enterprise architecture (EA) standards;
Identifying new technologies for enterprise-level business solutions; and
Ensuring information technology (IT) systems are up-to-date and conform to EA plan requirements;
OR
Education: Ph.D. or equivalent doctoral degree, or 3 full years of progressively higher level graduate education leading to a Ph.D. or equivalent doctoral degree. Degree must be in computer science, engineering, information science, information systems management, mathematics, operations research, statistics, or technology management, or be a degree that provided a minimum of 24 semester hours in one or more of the fields identified above and required the development or adaptation of applications, systems, or networks.

GS-12
Specialized Experience: You must have at least one year of specialized experience equivalent to the GS-11 grade level in the Federal service that includes:
Applying enterprise architecture (EA) reference models, goals, and objectives to identify and document software components, function, and relationships;
Applying EA structure, configuration management principles and methods, and reference model design and documentation techniques to develop recommendations to identify and provide solutions;
Accomplishing studies, technical review, planning, and policy development to define information technology (IT) requirements, program objectives, methodology, and technological aspect of systems and subsystems; and
Evaluating approaches for satisfying communications requirements by defining, coordinating, and planning user requirements for equipment, systems, and/or services.
Specialized experience is experience that has equipped the applicant with the particular competencies/knowledge, skills, and abilities to successfully perform the duties of the position and is typically in or related to the work of the position to be filled. Such experience is typically gained in the IT field or through the performance of work where the primary concern is IT.

Experience refers to paid and unpaid experience, including volunteer work done through National Service programs (e.g., Peace Corps, AmeriCorps) and other organizations (e.g., professional; philanthropic; religious; spiritual; community, student, social). Volunteer work helps build critical competencies and can provide valuable training and experience that translates directly to paid employment. You will receive credit for all qualifying experience, including volunteer experience.

IN DESCRIBING YOUR EXPERIENCE, PLEASE BE CLEAR AND SPECIFIC. WE MAY NOT MAKE ASSUMPTIONS REGARDING YOUR EXPERIENCE. If your resume does not support your questionnaire answers, we will not allow credit for your response(s).
Education
All academic degrees and coursework must be from accredited or pre-accredited institutions.
Additional information
Career Transition Assistance Plan (CTAP), Reemployment Priority List (RPL), or Interagency Career Transition Assistance Plan (ICTAP): Visit the OPM website for information on how to apply as a CTAP, RPL, or ICTAP eligible. To exercise selection priority for this vacancy, CTAP/RPL/ICTAP candidates must meet the basic eligibility requirements and all selective factors. CTAP/ICTAP candidates must be rated and determined to be well qualified (or above) based on an evaluation of the competencies listed in the How You Will Be Evaluated section. When assessed through a score-based category rating method, CTAP/ICTAP applicants must receive a rating of at least 85 out of a possible 100.

Persons with disabilities who require alternative means for communication of program information (Braille, large print, audiotape, etc) should contact: USDAs TARGET Center at 202-720-2600 (voice and TDD).

It is the policy of the Government not to deny employment simply because an individual has been unemployed or has had financial difficulties that have arisen through no fault of the individual. To see more information visit CHCO Council.

Multiple positions may be filled from this announcement.

If you are selected for a position with further promotion potential, you will be placed under a career development plan, and may be non-competitively promoted if you successfully complete the requirements and if recommended by management. However, promotion is neither implied nor guaranteed.

How You Will Be Evaluated
You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications above.
Applications will be evaluated in accordance with Office of Personnel Management's (OPM) Delegated Examining Procedures and USDA policy using category rating. Applicants who meet basic minimum qualifications will be placed in one of two or three categories: Best Qualified, Well Qualified, or Qualified. Within these categories, applicants eligible for veteran's preference will receive selection priority over non-veterans. Category placement will be determined based on applicants' quality of experience and the extent they possess the following knowledge, skills, and abilities (KSA) or competencies:

Attention to Detail
Customer Service
Oral Communication
Problem Solving
Your application, including the online Assessment Questionnaire, will be reviewed to determine if you meet (a) minimum qualification requirements and (b) the resume supports the answers provided to the job-specific questions. Your resume must clearly support your responses to all the questions addressing experience and education relevant to this position. Those determined to be in the best qualified category will be referred to the selecting official for consideration.

Note: If, after reviewing your resume and/or supporting documentation, a determination is made that you have inflated your qualifications and or experience, your score may be adjusted to more accurately reflect your abilities, or you may be found ineligible. Please follow all instructions carefully. Errors or omissions may affect your rating. Providing inaccurate information on Federal documents could be grounds for non-selection or disciplinary action up to including removal from the Federal service.

To preview the application questionnaire, please visit: https://apply.usastaffing.gov/ViewQuestionnaire/11092205

Background checks and security clearance
Security clearance
Not Required
Drug test required
No
Position sensitivity and risk
Non-sensitive (NS)/Low Risk
Trust determination process
Credentialing, Suitability/Fitness
Required Documents

Required Documents
The following documents are required for your applicant package to be complete. Our office cannot be responsible for incompatible software, your system failure, etc. Encrypted documents will not be accepted. Failure to submit required, legible documents may result in loss of consideration.

Resume that includes:1) personal information such as name, address, contact information; 2) education; 3) detailed work experience related to this position as described in the major duties including work schedule, hours worked per week, dates of employment; title, series, grade (if applicable); 4) other qualifications.
College Transcripts: If you are using education to meet a qualification requirement, you must submit a legible copy of your college transcripts. An unofficial copy is sufficient with the application; however, it must include student name, school name, and enough information to validate qualifications such as course names, prefixes, grades, semester or quarter credit hours, date degree was awarded, etc. Further, if you are selected, you will be required to submit official transcripts prior to entering on duty. Education must have been successfully obtained from an accredited school, college, or university, visit Dept of Education Accredited Schools. If any education was completed at a foreign institute, you must submit with your application evidence that the institute was appropriately accredited by an accrediting body recognized by the U.S. Department of Education as equivalent to U.S. education standards. There are private organizations that specialize in this evaluation and a fee is normally associated with this service. For a list of private organizations that evaluate education, visit NACES. All transcripts must be in English or include an English translation.
If claiming veteran's preference, you must submit a DD214, Certificate of Release from Active Duty, which shows dates of service and discharge under honorable conditions .If currently on active duty, you must submit a statement of discharge/certification of release or an official written document from the armed forces that certifies you are expected to be discharged or released from active duty service under honorable conditions no later than 120 days from the date the certification is signed. Enlisted Record Briefs and military identification do NOT qualify as official documentation. The certification letter should be on letterhead of the appropriate military branch of the service and contain (1) the military service dates including the expected discharge or release date; and (2) the character of service. Veteran's preference must be verified prior to appointment. Without this documentation, you will not receive veteran's preference and your application will be evaluated based on the material(s) submitted.
If claiming 10-point veteran's preference you must provide the DD214 or certification requirements (see above bullet), plus the proof of entitlement of this preference as listed on the SF-15 Application for 10-point Veterans' Preference. The SF-15 should be included but is not required. Failure to submit these documents could result in the determination that there is insufficient documentation to support your claim for 10-point preference. For more information on veterans' preference visit FEDSHIREVETS
Surplus or displaced employees eligible for CTAP, RPL, or ICTAP priority must provide: proof of eligibility (RIF separation notice, notice of proposed removal for declining a transfer of function or directed reassignment to another commuting area, notice of disability annuity termination), SF-50 documenting separation (as applicable), and your most recent SF-50 noting position, grade level, and duty location with your application per 5 CFR 330.

If you are relying on your education to meet qualification requirements:
Education must be accredited by an accrediting institution recognized by the U.S. Department of Education in order for it to be credited towards qualifications. Therefore, provide only the attendance and/or degrees from schools accredited by accrediting institutions recognized by the U.S. Department of Education.
Failure to provide all of the required information as stated in this vacancy announcement may result in an ineligible rating or may affect the overall rating.
Benefits

Benefits
A career with the U.S. Government provides employees with a comprehensive benefits package. As a federal employee, you and your family will have access to a range of benefits that are designed to make your federal career very rewarding. Opens in a new windowLearn more about federal benefits.
Eligibility for benefits depends on the type of position you hold and whether your position is full-time, part-time, or intermittent. Contact the hiring agency for more information on the specific benefits offered.
Help
This job is open to
Career transition (CTAP, ICTAP, RPL)
Federal employees who meet the definition of a ""surplus"" or ""displaced"" employee.
The public
U.S. citizens, nationals or those who owe allegiance to the U.S.",767,Washington
71,Advanced Systems Administration Specialist (Linux / Networking),"General Dynamics Mission Systems, Inc","Fairfax, VA 22033",None,"Basic Qualifications :

Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, a related field or equivalent experience is required plus a minimum of 5 years of relevant experience; or Master's degree plus 3 years of relevant experience.


CLEARANCE REQUIREMENTS:
Department of Defense Secret security clearance is required at time of hire. Applicants selected will be subject to a U.S. Government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information. Due to the nature of work performed within our facilities, U.S. citizenship is required.
Responsibilities for this Position:

At General Dynamics Mission Systems, we create the technologies, products and services that help our nation’s heroes keep our nation safe. The work we do is so advanced, we are continuously moving the boundaries of what’s possible. Here you’ll work with the best and your talent will be front and center on projects that impact the world. Are you up to the challenge?

We apply advanced technologies such as Artificial Intelligence, Blockchain, AR/VR, Cloud Native and Quantum Physics to solve our customers’ missions in cyber, RF, undersea, interstellar and everything in between.


As an Advanced Systems Administration Specialist, you’ll serve as a front-line interface to users with technical issues by conducting systems analysis and development to keep systems current with changing technologies. Your duties may include installing new software, troubleshooting, granting permissions to applications and training users. You’ll also be responsible for the day-to-day support of server services by performing server administration for physical and virtual server operating systems and configuring, maintaining and troubleshooting of physical and virtual hardware and network related interfaces on servers. And, you’ll perform OS and vendor software patching on servers and monitor physical and virtual servers performance using monitoring tools.
What you’ll experience:
Technologies that aren’t just top-notch, they’re often top-secret
A team of bold thinkers committed to exploring what’s next
Opportunities to gain new knowledge - as it’s discovered
What you bring to the table:
A Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, a related field or equivalent experience plus a minimum of 5 years of relevant experience; or Master's degree plus 3 years of relevant experience
Advanced understanding of complex networks & server based operating systems:
Design, planning, implementation, monitoring, administering and maintaining computer networks.
Cisco, Taclanes, WANs, LANs, Firewalls, switches and routers.
Linux including RHEL/CentOS, specifically secure environments. Virtualized and bare metal
Infrastructure aspects of Linux related to authentication, policy, scanning, logging, storage.
Microsoft Windows 10 desktop and Microsoft Windows 2008/2012
Enhanced troubleshooting skills within the server OS as well as both networking and storage technologies
Hands-on experience developing, deploying and supporting large-scale enterprise server solutions
What sets you apart:
Team player who thrives in collaborative environments and revels in team success
Team player who thrives in collaborative environments and revels in team success
Broad understanding of the interrelationships within the IT environment with focus on server and services
Senior level knowledge of physical and virtual server support
Senior level knowledge of access, permissions and security that gives the clients the access to the data they need to perform their daily activities
NOTE: The position requires you to be on site in our Fairfax, VA. facility
#CJ2
Company Overview:

General Dynamics Mission Systems (GDMS) engineers a diverse portfolio of high technology solutions, products and services that enable customers to successfully execute missions across all domains of operation. With a global team of 12,000+ top professionals, we partner with the best in industry to expand the bounds of innovation in the defense and scientific arenas. Given the nature of our work and who we are, we value trust, honesty, alignment and transparency. We offer highly competitive benefits and pride ourselves in being a great place to work with a shared sense of purpose. You will also enjoy a flexible work environment where contributions are recognized and rewarded. If who we are and what we do resonates with you, we invite you to join our high performance team!

General Dynamics is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer that is committed to hiring a diverse and talented workforce. EOE/Disability/Veteran",767,Washington
72,Senior Systems Engineer - VDI - Top Secret Clearance,MKS2 Technologies,"Springfield, VA",None,"Founded in 2008, MKS2 Technologies has helped Federal government customers design, implement and sustain mission-focused IT solutions focusing on cyber security support, enterprise application development, and instructional design and training. MKS2 is a Service-Disabled Veteran-Owned Small Business (SDVOSB) headquartered in Austin, Texas, with regional offices in Colorado Springs, CO, Monterey, CA, Portland, ME, and Washington, D.C.

Our full-time staff works on Federal services contracts in 27 states and the District of Columbia to provide mission-critical support to the Department of Veterans Affairs, The U.S. Army, and the U.S. Navy.

Description
The Senior Systems Engineer – Virtual Desktop Infrastructure (VDI) serves as the Subject Matter Expert (SME) in the technologies, systems, applications, and services which make up the Activity’s IT Enterprise VDI solution. Specifically, the Senior Systems Engineer will be responsible for the designing, implementing, managing, maintaining, securing, and life-cycle management of the CitrixXenDesktop and NetScaler solutions deployed on multiple sets of enterprise-level IT systems in support of the Activity’s data center environments.

The Senior Systems Engineer directly supports the Activity’s Operations and Maintenance (O&M) teams in overseeing all VDI-based tasking of deployed operational Infrastructure Citrix solutions. This will include, but may not be limited to, all Guest Virtual Machine (VM) activities for the CirtixXenDesktop applications (delivery controller, storefront direction, etc.), machine catalogs, delivery groups, Persistent and Non-Persistent images, and physical and virtual NetScaler models, to include NetScaler FIPS models. Desktop images will be regularly updated, tested, and deployed with both Operating System (OS) and third-party vendor application updates to maintain compliance, Information Assurance (IA), and Security (InfoSec) requirements.

When VDI issues, incidents, and/or problems arise, the Senior Systems Engineer provides direct troubleshooting and problem resolution support, to include Root Cause Analysis (RCA). The Senior Systems Engineer also produces and maintains documentation of the VDI solution to include the system, sub-system, and components in the Activity’s IT Hosting portfolio, including as-built documentation, capacity/performance plans, and all other areas of system life-cycle planning.

The Senior Systems Engineer also works directly with the Activity’s IT Architecture and Engineering (A&E) team to consistently explore, investigate, research, analyze, assess, implement, and transition new technologies to an operational state to modernize and improve upon existing infrastructure solutions

Qualifications
Shall have 7 or more years of progressive experience in a VDI systems engineering, or similar, role capturing requirements, designing, engineering, implementing, securing, and operating and maintaining enterprise-level VDI solutions for a globally dispersed IT enterprise.
Shall have 5 or more years of experience designing, engineering, implementing, and maintaining solutions in secure processing environments which must adhere to U.S. Government Information
Assurance and Security standards such as the Defense Information Systems Agency (DISA) Security Technical Implementation Guides (STIGs).
Shall have 3 or more years of proven hands-on experience performing O&M of VDI solutions that are using the Citrix XenDesktop 7 suite and Citrix NetScaler 11, or newer, to provide enterprise-level virtual desktop and application offerings.
Demonstrated experience with utilizing, supporting, and maintaining Windows Server 2012 R2 and/or Windows Server 2016 operating system (OS) as a VDI server platform and Windows 7 and/or
Windows 10 OS as a desktop platform in a VDI environment as part of an all-encompassing VDI solution.
Demonstrated experience implementing and supporting application virtualization through an assortment of technologies including Citrix XenApp, AppLayering, and/or Enterprise Layer Manager (ELM).
Demonstrated experience monitoring and assessing virtualization and storage infrastructure systems and solutions proactively for performance degradation and tuning and optimization opportunities.
Shall meet the Cyber IT/Cybersecurity Workforce (CSWF) Research and Development Specialist (661); Intermediate Level for SECNAV M-5239.2 compliance. (See Navy Cool WebSite)

Education: Bachelor Degree from accredited University; OR

Training: NEC 741A Information System Security Manager; or
NEC 742A Network Security Vulnerability Technician; or
NEC H08A Advanced Network Analyst; OR

Certification: Certified Authorization Professional (CAP); or
Cisco Certified Network Associate (CCNA) Routing and Switching *Retired; or
CompTIA Security+ ce; AND

OJT: NAVEDTRA 43469 Watchstation 302 - Information Assurance Technician Level II (Privileged User); AND

Continuous Learning: DoD requires 20 hours Continuous Learning each calendar year. This requirement is in addition to any industry certification Continuous Learning requirement. [Note: DoD 20 hours Annually - Industry certification Continuous Learning may be applied towards DoD 20 hour annual requirement. However, not all DoD Continuous Learning hours can be applied to industry certification Continuous Learning requirement, check with certification agency on what may be accepted.]; AND
Operating System/Computing Environment Certificate: Operating System/Computing Environment (OS/CE) certificate of training, as dictated by Command Cyber IT/CSWF-PM; AND
Sign Privileged Access Statement: System Authorization Access Request (SAAR) with Privileged Access agreement as required by Local Command.

Desired Qualifications:
Strongly desired to be Citrix Certified Professional – Virtualization (CPP-V) and CCP – Networking (CPP-N) certified.
Technical certifications in enterprise-level virtualization and OS vendor technologies, such as Microsoft, Nutanix, and/or VMware are also a plus.
Demonstrated experience operating and maintaining Citrix XenDesktop 7.15 Long-Term Service Release (LTSR) or newer.
Demonstrated experience operating and maintaining Citrix NetScaler 12.0 and later. Additionally, experience with supporting the unique nature of FIPS model NetScalers is also a plus.
Demonstrated experience in the O&M of Citrix Machine Creation Services (MCS) and/or Provisioning Services (PVS) for desktop servicing.
Demonstrated experience in leveraging vendor and industry product documentation, to include best practices, and software-based tools to research, engineer, build, and deploy right-sized and properly tuned and configured VDI desktops.
Demonstrated experience in implementing, configuring, securing, and maintaining NetScaler Firewalls, High Availability (Active-Active, Active-Passive), Load Balancers (to include Global Service Load
Balancing (GSLB)), Logging, and Two-Factor Authentication through RADIUS integration.
Demonstrated experience utilizing, supporting, and maintaining Citrix monitoring products like Command Center, Director, Insight, and/or NetScaler Management and Analytics System (NMAS).
Demonstrated experience leveraging Microsoft PowerShell for the purposes of automating and orchestrating routine, as well as complex, administrative and operational tasking. Experience using
Microsoft PowerShell to support Infrastructure as Code (IAC) and Configuration as Code (CAC) in a production enterprise environment is a plus.
Familiarity with proactively monitoring VDI implementations for performance degradation and tuning and optimization opportunities.
Familiarity with Public Key Infrastructure (PKI) and Secure Socket Layer (SSL) certificate generation, use, and upkeep as it pertains to Citrix-based solutions.
Familiarity with hyper-converged infrastructure (HCI) technologies, such as the Nutanix Enterprise Cloud Platform, and their capabilities to offer scalable converged compute and storage for enterprise-level virtual workloads. Prior experience using Nutanix ECP as the Hosting platform for VDI solutions is a plus.
Familiarity with basic Networking troubleshooting concepts and approaches.
Security Clearance
This position will require U.S. citizenship and a Top Secret/SCI clearance with counterintelligence (CI) polygraph (in-scope within the past 7 years).",767,Washington
73,Junior Contract Support Specialist,JASINT,"Washington, DC 20037 (Foggy Bottom area)",None,"Job Title: Junior Contract Support Specialist
Location(s): Washington, DC INL/EX/GAPP Hours: Regular Full-Time
Clearance Requirements:
This position requires a current and active Secret at the time of application.
What you will be doing:
Provide support to Contracts Unit in performing all cradle-to-grave contracting activities.
Work will primarily be in support of INL’s third party contracts portfolio but may also include commodity and other service requirements (to include personal services).
Assist with providing guidance and training to program office personnel in the development of procurement request packages.
Assist with market research to determine the commercial availability of a product or service and to identify the contracting approach that will best satisfy the requirement.
Assist in determining how procurement actions should be set-aside in order to comply with socioeconomic utilization goals established by the Department of State and Small Business Administration.
Assist with preparing solicitations, determining sources to be solicited, advertising solicitations, and ensuring that the procurement schedule is structured properly.
Upon receipt of quotes, assist with determining the responsiveness and responsibility of offerors.
Aid in the analysis of contractor quotes to determine technical acceptability and price fairness/reasonableness. Final determination and findings shall be forwarded to the Contracting Officer for review and approval/action.
Assist in the preparation of contract award documents for final approval by the Contracting Officer.
Provide input on award recommendations and assist with full range of post-award functions.
Provide contract administration support by preparing unilateral and bilateral contract modifications to exercise optional periods of performance, add work within the scope, deobligate ULO balances, and close out contracts.
Coordinate with program officers, contracting officer’s representatives, financial management analysts, and other Contracts Unit staff to identify and validate contracts with unliquidated obligations (ULOs).
When ULO balances are deemed invalid, assist with obtaining necessary release of claims documentation from the contractor and de-obligating unused funding.
Provide assistance with special projects and office initiatives in support of process
improvements.
Assist with retrieving and assembling relevant metrics (e.g., award data, contractor staffing patterns, contract information, etc.) for GAPP and INL leadership.
Maintain comprehensive documentation of all actions taken and file documentation in accordance with INL and Department of State policies.

Outreach/Customer Service:
Respond in a timely manner to requests for information
Interact positively and work cooperatively with team members to accomplish assigned work in a timely and efficient manner
Establish strong interpersonal relationships through excellent customer service skills and an understanding of program offices’ unique needs and mandates
Work closely with INL program office staff and managers, as well as stakeholders at U.S. Embassies overseas and within other U.S. federal agencies
Take proactive measures and make recommendations to improve the working environment and build teamwork
Seek to accomplish tasks in a manner that reduces the burden on senior management
Be receptive to training and critique of work output
Provide reports to program office stakeholders on the status of activities and make substantive recommendations for achieving office priorities
Comply with all appropriate regulations, internal controls, management direction and SOPs as well as Bureau conventions to protect organizational integrity and prevent unauthorized use or misappropriation of all classified and sensitive (but unclassified) material and equipment in assigned areas; report security violations/problems to appropriate authority

Position Requirements
Minimum Qualifications
U.S. Citizenship
Bachelor’s degree from an accredited institution
Minimum Experience
Zero to two years of acquisition experience or other relevant professional experience

Required Skills:
Demonstrated proficiency in oral communication sufficient to obtain information, present and defend recommendations, and explain policies, procedures, etc.
Demonstrated ability to communicate with a wide variety of audiences, including senior leadership and those from diverse cultural backgrounds
Demonstrated ability to write procurement-related documents and routine business correspondence in a concise, logical, and grammatically correct manner
Demonstrated ability to effectively manage multiple priorities, adjust priorities as circumstances dictate, and adapt to frequent changes in workload
Demonstrated ability to provide excellent customer service to all levels of staff
Demonstrated ability to work independently and identify more effective processes for completing work
Demonstrated proficiency in Microsoft Office Suite, Adobe Acrobat, Cisco Webex,Microsoft Teams, and other relevant computer or web-based applications

Preferred Qualifications:
Demonstrated knowledge of contracting principles and procedures sufficient to procure and/or administer contracts for a variety of supplies and services
Demonstrated familiarity with the Federal Acquisition Regulation (FAR) and/or the Department of State Acquisition Regulation (DOSAR) U.S. Department of State IDIQ #: 191NLE19D0006 International Narcotics and Law Enforcement Affairs Task Order Proposal Request: TPC-21-054-INL SBU - CONTRACTING AND ACQUISITIONS
Demonstrated experience with or knowledge of INL or United States Agency for International Development (USAID) programs, mission, and foreign assistance activities
Demonstrated experience using the Department of State’s Global Financial Management System (GFMS), Regional Financial Management System (RFMS), or the Momentum Acquisitions contract writing suite
Demonstrated knowledge of the Department of State Standardized Regulation (DSSR) and/or the Federal Travel Regulation (FTR)

Why JASINT?
At JASINT we are proud to boast a “together we can” attitude. That is only possible with a strong talented team. Our goal is to answer the call to provide top mission and Warfighter support at all levels and that’s why we are seeking you!
We understand and respect the dedication and sacrifice that is required to serve our nation’s greatest efforts, and our commitment in turn is to support YOU!
JASINT cares about your work life balance and offers competitive benefits to help you at every stage of your personal and professional life: Retirement/401k, health, dental, vision, flexible spending accounts, (HSA/FSA), STD/LTD, professional development, tuition reimbursement, spot award recognition, PTO, Holidays…even an additional day off for your birthday.
*** JASINT offers both internal and external referral bonuses for all cleared exceptional talent we hire! Friends of yours, are friends of JASINT!***

JASINT provides equal employment opportunities to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, ancestry, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, marital status, religion, age, disability, gender identity, results of genetic testing, or service in the military. Equal employment opportunity applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leave of absence, compensation, and training.",767,Washington
74,Senior Functional Specialist,Veterans Enterprise Technology Solutions,"Washington, DC 20001 (Shaw area)",None,"Overview:

Staffing Pros, a division of VETS Inc., is recruiting for a Senior Functional Specialist in Charleston (SC), Salt Lake City (UT), St. Louis (MO), or Washington (DC). Ability to obtain/maintain a Government security clearance is required.
If you have additional questions not answered by the information contained within this posting, please contact our team directly at StaffingPros@vets-inc.com.
Responsibilities:
Provide functional and/or technical expertise to plan, analyze, define and support the delivery of future functional and technical capabilities for an application or group of applications
Assist in facilitating impact assessment efforts and in producing and reviewing estimates for client work requests
Provides technical expertise, leadership, and project coordination services to support and maintain continuity of the organizations computer systems and networks
Monitors systems usage and needs
Researches, identifies, and recommends software and applications that will improve the stability of systems and networks
Researches, identifies, and recommends new hardware, software, and applications to support future and/or complex management information systems (MIS) needs
Recommends and implements policies and practices to maximize resource utilization
Takes a lead role in the development, implementation, and maintenance of the data recovery aspects of the organizations disaster recovery plan
Maintains knowledge on developments, trends, and best practices in technology and business networks
Performs other related duties as assigned
Qualifications:
Ability to obtain/maintain a Government security clearance is required
Masters Degree in in engineering, or a related scientific or technical discipline is required (10 years of additional relevant experience may be substituted for education)
10 years experience required
Must have experience working with customers, users and project leads in analyzing, designing, implementing and supporting a wide variety of IT business systems covering many diverse applications such as healthcare and financial systems
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
Excellent interpersonal skills with a bility to explain technical issues to technical and nontechnical staff
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills
Superior understanding of computer and networking hardware and software systems
Excellent time management skills
Proficient with Microsoft Office Suite or related software
Proficient with or able to quickly learn to use a broad array of networking and systems hardware and software
EEO Statement: Staffing Pros a division of VETS-inc is an Equal Opportunity Employer/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities. The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor’s legal duty to furnish information.",767,Washington
75,Configuration Management Specialist - Clearance Required,Logistics Management Institute,"Fort Belvoir, VA 22060",None,"Overview:
LMI is seeking a skilled Configuration Management Specialist at a client site in Ft. Belvoir VA. Successful LMI Configuration Management Specialist will demonstrate competency in senior level configuration management while upholding the highest standard of ethical behavior.

LMI is a consultancy dedicated to improving the business of government, drawing from deep expertise in advanced analytics, digital services, logistics, and management advisory services. Established as a private, not-for-profit organization in 1961, LMI is a trusted third party to federal civilian and defense agencies, free of commercial and political bias. We operate completely free of political and commercial bias, and we are entirely aligned with the goals of our clients. Our clients value our specialized services in logistics, intelligence, homeland security, health care, and energy and environment markets. We believe government can make a difference, and we seek talented, hardworking people who share that conviction. We offer a generous compensation package with excellent benefits that start the first day of employment. Business casual dress, flex time, and tuition reimbursement are a few of our many work-life benefits available to our employees.
Responsibilities:
Responsibilities
Provide assistance in configuration management of all necessary documentation for the Government to undertake and manage project system acquisitions.
Establish and administer the documentation library and maintain the Configuration Management Library in accordance with the Army Records.
Prepare engineering change proposal forms and related documentation and distribute official change notice forms and document change pages based on control board approvals.
Maintain official configuration management records, documents, distribution lists, correspondence and maintain all applicable configuration baseline documentation.
Provide technical assistance and administrative support for the Requirements Control Boards (RCB) and other governance forums requiring functional participation, and facilitation of Subject Matter Expert (SME) workshops.
Support the presentation of Release Plans to the Engineering Control Board (ECB) for vetting, RCB for stakeholder approval, and Configuration Control Board (CCB) for contract approval.

Qualifications:
Qualifications
Active DoD Secret clearance. Please note that only U.S. citizens are eligible for a security clearance.
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science or related field preferred
8-10 years of related experience performing a variety of Configuration Management functions, including complete traceability of all requirements, configuration change control and systems specifications",767,Washington
76,Adjudicative Specialist – Senior,CENCORE LLC,"Chantilly, VA",None,"Responsibilities:

Adjudicative Specialists will provide adjudicative support to assist in meeting the needs of end customers throughout the customer’s organization.
Adjudicative Specialists, at all levels, are expected to complete on average, twenty-three (23) cases per month.
Completed cases are defined as closed by a staff lead in the designated system of record when all elements of the investigation have been received and an appropriate, accurate, and adjudicative summary has been reviewed and found to meet acceptable quality standards.
The Adjudicative Specialist shall organize and assess investigative file material against required coverage for all case types specific to the assigned program.
The Specialist will ensure routine background investigation coverage, polygraph, and National Agency Checks are completed according to standards for the level of access requested and can identify cases that meet outlined thresholds and investigative results that may warrant review of case material by subject matter experts.
When required by the Government, the Specialist shall present case facts, analysis, and recommendations to the Adjudication Board in the presence government personnel.
The Specialist must be capable of preparing products that capture relevant case details and present facts in a logical manner.
The Specialist must be able to compose and formalize adjudicative closing documents utilizing all investigative and/or polygraph results required to render a decision based on ICD 704 standards for access to national security information.
In addition, the Specialist must be able to submit analysis and recommendations with clear nexus between issues and/or non-issues according to ICD 704 standards.
This analysis and recommendation will include identifying, supporting, and implementation of appropriate risk-mitigation strategies when appropriate.
The Specialist must be able to identify, as early as possible, any significant derogatory information that may alter the course of routine processing or warrant immediate action, and be capable of clarifying facts, able to elicit new or additional information and, if necessary, further investigate questions relevant to final adjudication.
The Specialist must be able to track cases throughout the processing stages to ensure investigative information is reviewed for relevance as it comes to completion; and be capable of preparing and providing the Statement of Reasons, investigative files, executive case summaries, and First Level Review recommendations.
All new information generated throughout the adjudication process is scanned and/or electronically uploaded to the electronic file.

Requirements

Top Secret security clearance with SCI (TS/SCI) and polygraph
Demonstrate analytical ability and the ability to handle a medium to large, semi complex workload
Demonstrate high level of personal integrity and the ability to discreetly handle sensitive, personal and classified case information
Ability to comprehend complex and multi-source data into succinct and supportable final reports
Expertise with Intelligence Community Directive (ICD) 704 regulations
Knowledge and ability to use computer operating systems/tools such as Microsoft Office Suite
Experience performing adjudicative support
Ability to elicit information during an interview with minimal direction and work effectively with variety of individuals
Demonstrate ability to provide on-the-job training to new team members and colleagues
Experience working in an environment with compartmented programs
Prior experience supporting customer’s clearance processing operations
Broad experience performing adjudicative support
Expertise in eliciting information, articulating information, and documenting information in a well-organized manner
Advanced ability to lead a team of security professionals encompassing multiple disciplines
Bachelor’s degree (or equivalent experience)
Five (5) years of experience

Additional Desired Qualifications

Identifying complex problems and reviewing related information to develop and evaluate options and implement solutions.
Critical Thinking — use logic and reasoning to identify the strengths and weaknesses of alternative solutions, conclusions or approaches to problems
Ability to work in a dynamic and challenging environment
Experience performing adjudicative support
Demonstrate ability to provide on-the-job training to new team members and colleagues
Seven (7) years of experience
Three (3) years of customer experience
Equivalent experience for Bachelor’s degree is one (1) year working experience in a relevant field (this is in addition to the specified minimum years of experience identified)

CenCore, LLC is an equal opportunity employer and offers a professional work environment designed to enhance your personal career growth.

Job ID: 735-0137",767,Washington
77,FOIA Specialist I / II / III,"Ahtna Professional Services, Inc.","Washington, DC",None,"As a FOIA Specialist, you will process FOIA/PA (Freedom of Information Act/Privacy Act) requests; from ""cradle to grave."" research and analyze FOIA/PA information to respond to requests and develop status reports to support reporting requirements; prepare responses to FOIA/PA requesters and management as requested; liaison as directed by management with agencies on FOIA/PA related matters; conducts research on applicable case law, federal regulations on FOIA/PA requests to resolve issues; use information technology such as computers in administering, and managing information, as well as for a wide variety of record keeping, correspondence, and tracking operations throughout the government information management lifecycle. The specialist will conduct independent analysis and apply FOIA and PA exemptions and/ or exclusions as appropriate. The FOIA specialist should have experience applying the following exemptions: Exemptions 4,5,6, and 7.
Auto req ID
1438BR
Subsidiary
Ahtna Professional Services, Inc.
Job Location (State)
District Of Columbia
Posting Title
FOIA Specialist I / II / III
Posting Type
External & Internal
Posting Subtype
Open Continuous (Pool)
Salary
DOE
Essential Duties & Responsibilities
Review, analyze, and perfect FOIA requests; contact the requester either by phone, email or
mail for clarifications about the request. If necessary, provide the requester with explanations concerning the timeline, availability, format, and content of the requested documentation/information.
Prepare and send “submitter notices” to submitters and request that they provide arguments and explanations related to the withholding of potentially confidential commercial informationPrepare and transmit to the requester a standard acknowledgement letter using USAID’s
templates. The contractor will exercise judgement to determine when letters must be tailored to meet unique circumstances concerning the request or requester.
Based on the requester's stated need, the contractor will be responsible for tasking and obtaining the requested documentation from the appropriate USAID operating units and the corresponding release recommendations per ADS 507; provide those operating units with complete and clear instructions on what is required and how to formulate release recommendations and justifications for withholding of information in accordance with USAID policy and procedures. Send reminders to USAID’s offices that are delinquent in responding to search action requests.Analyze documentation provided by the operating units for responsiveness and releasability. If necessary, work with the operating units and/or USAID's Office of the General Counsel (GC) to determine the detrimental effects (i.e., foreseeable harm) of releasing the requested documents. When operating units request withholdings which cannot be justified and thus, upheld under the FOIA/PA, provide explanations to the operating units on why the information must be released.Prepare/transmit formal FOIA responses for a variety of audiences such as requesters, business submitters, and government officials. Responses must conform to Agency standards and clearance procedures. Responses must be modified as appropriate by explaining, for example, the disposition of responsive documents, what is being released/withheld, page counts, and include a citation to the appropriate exemptions/exclusions.Prepared required records, logs and files for each request; assisted in the closure of seven or more FOIA backlog cases, utilized Adobe Redax Software and Microsoft Office SuiteIndependently handled the quality analysis of simple and complex agency records in accordance with FOIA/PA and agency implementing instructions; identified inconsistencies, new and unusual issuesFOIA Exemptions utilized, as applicable to the agency’s FOIA Office: Exemption (b)(3), (b)(4), (b)(5), (b)(6), (b)(7)(C), (b)(7)(D) and (b)(7)(E); utilized Adobe Redax Software; Established and assisted the team members with their individual projected goals; consolidated the ""Status Reports"" and regularly prepared the final copy for the Program Manager and Client.Review, analyze, and process Freedom of Information Act, Privacy requests of a simple and routine nature including the analysis of problems of a factual or procedural nature dealing with readily identifying legal issues which may be easily found in written guidelines, procedures, standards, and administrative/organizational practicesEvaluate sensitive request for information to determine whether to recommend release or denial of the requested information based on the Privacy Act or FOIAMaintain an accurate and complete administrative record of the actions taken throughout the
processing of FOIA/PA requests per USAID’s standards..
Perform FOIA/PA, audits, and data callsOther duties as assigned.
Qualification Requirements
1. Must have U.S. citizenship
2. Ability to interpret and apply regulations and procedures concerning all FOIA Exemptions
3. Have experience applying the following exemptions: Exemptions 4; 5; 6; and 7
4. Must be familiar with database operations and word processing systems
5. Must be proficient in the use of Microsoft Office Suite
6. Must have strong researching and resolution skills in the use of internet, email, databases, and the use of computer software
7. Must be familiar with FOIAXpress operating system.
8. Ability to do repetitive tasks while remaining prepared to take on auxiliary duties on short notice
9. Excellent verbal and written communication skills
10. Comprehensive knowledge of MS Office
11. Excellent analytical skills
12. Ability to work independently under general guidance
13. Understanding of the Freedom of Information Act (FOIA) and Privacy Act (PA)
14. Willingness to learn and invest in self-development
15. Demonstrated ability to produce consistently high-quality work under fluid conditions
16. Strong organizational, clerical and customer service skills
17. Must be fluent in speaking and writing in English. Must be able to communicate verbally and in writing in an effective, efficient, and professional manner.
18. Pre-Employment Screening: Must be able to pass criminal background screen, drug test and physical exam.
19. Post Hire Certifications: Must certify under customer requirements and maintain all security clearances.
20. Security Clearance: Must have a Department of Defense clearance.

Level I (Junior-Level FOIA Specialist)
Two (2) to five (5) years or more FOIA experience. Must be familiar with database operations and word processing systems. Familiarity with FOIAXpress is preferred. Must have research skills in the use of the internet, email, databases, and the use of computer software, especially the Microsoft Office Suite.
Level II (Mid-Level FOIA Specialist)
Five (5) to seven (7) years or more FOIA experience. Must be familiar with FOIAXpress operating system. Must have research skills in the use of the internet, email, databases, and the use of computer software, especially the Microsoft Office Suite. Associates and/or bachelor's degree preferred.
Level III (Senior FOIA Specialist)
Seven (7) to ten (10) years or more FOIA experience. Must be familiar with FOIAXpress operating system. Must have research skills in the use of the internet, email, databases, and the use of computer software, especially the Microsoft Office Suite. Associates and/or bachelor's degree preferred
Level III (Senior FOIA Specialist/Technical Writer)
Seven (7) to ten (10) years or more FOIA experience with a demonstrated background in drafting FOIA/PA regulations, policies, procedures, notices, and other related communications. Must be familiar with FOIAXpress operating system. Must have research skills in the use of the internet, email, databases, and the use of computer software, especially the Microsoft Office Suite. Associates and/or bachelor's degree preferred.

Preferred Qualifications
Shareholder Preference
Pursuant to PL 93-638, as amended, preference will be given to qualified Ahtna Native Corporation Shareholders, Descendants, and Spouses in all phases of employment.
Physical Demands (Note: Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential job functions.)
While performing the duties of this job the employee is frequently required to sit, talk or hear, stand, walk, use hands to handle, or operate objects, tools or controls; and reach with hands and arms. The employee is occasionally required to climb or balance; stoop, kneel, and taste or smell. Firearms and other defensive/offensive weapons are also tools utilized in the performance of this position.The employee occasionally lifts and/or moves anything from 10 to 100 pounds. Specific vision abilities required by this job includes close vision, distance vision, color vision and peripheral vision, depth perception and the ability to focus.Work requires computer usage with strength, dexterity, coordination and visual acuity to use keyboard and video display terminal and other office equipment.Moderate travel required subsidiary offices and other project locations as needed.
Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
Supervision
Non-Supervisory Position.
Work Environment
Generally, indoors. While outdoors may be subject to construction site conditions, confined spaces, changes in temperature, weather conditions and noise levels.",767,Washington
78,Network and Computer Systems Administrator,ActioNet,"Washington, DC 20024 (Southwest Federal Center area)",None,"ActioNet is recruiting for Information Security Analysts of varying seniority levels at Wright Patterson AFB, OH, Tinker AFB, OK, Hill AFB, UT, and Robins AFB, GA. These positions require a Top Secret clearance with SCI eligibility. ActioNet is an IT service provider and solutions integrator headquartered in Vienna, VA that works with the Federal Government and Department of Defense.
What is in it for you?
Being able to work in a dynamic, mission critical environment
Duties and Responsibilities
Possesses and applies expertise on multiple complex work assignments. Assignments may be broad in nature, requiring originality and innovation in determining how to accomplish tasks. Operates with appreciable latitude in developing methodology and presenting solutions to problems. Contributes to deliverables and performance metrics where applicable.
More senior levels possess and apply a comprehensive knowledge across key tasks and high impact assignments. Plans and leads major technology assignments. Evaluates performance results and recommends major changes affecting short-term project growth and success. Functions as a technical expert across multiple project assignments.
Install, configure, and support an organization's local area network (LAN), wide area network (WAN), and Internet systems or a segment of a network system. Monitor network to ensure network availability to all system users and may perform necessary maintenance to support network availability. May monitor and test Web site performance to ensure Web sites operate correctly and without interruption. May assist in network modeling, analysis, planning, and coordination between network and data communications hardware and software. May supervise computer user support specialists and computer network support specialists. May administer network security measures.
Basic Qualifications:
Must have an active Top Secret clearance with SCI eligibility
Education requirements vary by seniority level
Experience working in a TS/SCI environment and are aware of the nuances involved in those environments and technologies.
Domain knowledge of networking and system administration requirements in a TS/SCI environment
Are you ready to make a difference?
ActioNet is an equal opportunity employer and value diversity at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status.",767,Washington
79,Senior Protocol & Special Event Specialist,"IntellecTechs, Inc.","Bethesda, MD",None,"IntellecTechs is currently seeking a Senior Protocol & Special Event Specialist for a potential contract to provide administrative and management support services for the Assistant Chief of Staff, Deputy Assistant Chief of Staff Health Systems Administrator, and Department Head at Walter Reed National Military Medical Center in Bethesda, MD.Job Summary: This position is a contract job and shall provide support as a Senior Protocol and Events Specialist for the Executive and Legislative Affairs Department at Walter Reed National Military Medical Center (WRNMMC).Responsibilities: Provide expertise and experience in Protocol at the Executive Level, coordinates and facilitates WRB protocol support for U.S and foreign dignitaries including U.S. elected, appointed and military leaders and diplomatic leadership partners.Coordinate official command visits to WRNMMC with the Action Officers representing leadership for all uniformed services, federal agencies, foreign embassies and other CEO equivalent visitors and their staff.Execute full range of protocol activities held at WRNMMC which showcase the health care delivery processes, research activities or congressionally mandated programs at the direction of the Department Chief.Possess expert knowledge of ceremonial honors, courtesies, observances, etiquette, and other protocol precedents for military and civilian entities. Apply this knowledge to complex protocol activities and exceptionally difficult matters relating to protocol planning, management, and utilization of protocol resources.Formulate and recommend best practice policies and processes governing the protocol functions for Executive Services.Showcase world-class dynamic programs by coordination and execution of official visits to build and sustain relationships which advance the Department of Defense (DoD) and service leadership goals.Coordinate logistical engagement of WRNMMC leaders, colleagues and staff interface with senior officials and members of nation’s elected / appointed and military leadership.The Protocol Specialist will brief the Chief of Executive Services on the coordination details of the visit, who will greet on behalf of the Command, what subject matter experts will be present, parking/transportation arrangements, any briefs to be given, etc. Contractor does not provide subject matter briefings, but brief the Department Chief on the overall facilitation of the visit.Mentor command participants to ensure that program structure and command / individual efforts reflect the philosophy and tone of the Commander, WRNMMC.Develop and promulgate background materials, itineraries, intended themes, talking points and protocol guidance for leadership and subject matter experts to establish and ensure protocol continuity and practice.Develop, implements and execute protocol activities in support of special events, nationally recognized and local ceremonies, official visits and briefings for senior elected/appointed officials and U.S. military / foreign dignitaries based on protocol precedents and by demonstration of current training and knowledge of protocol customs and courtesies.Formulate / recommend policies and procedures governing protocol management, ensuring protocol programs are consistently clear, relevant, concise, well organized and appropriate to target audience.Create and distribute event invitations and reception cards both digitally and for embossed / engraved print.Prepare seating plans for key briefings, special events and ceremonials based on protocol precedents.Track responses, addresses accessibility requirements and parking considerations working directly with leader’s executive office staff, command, service and federal security agencies.Create, manage and maintain a current dignitary database to facilitate preparation of invitations, background information on senior visitors and points of contact within their offices.Manage and maintain a current protocol reference library which includes the White House, key White House executive staff, Cabinet Members and each Military Service at a minimum.Coordinate and track all Executive Services disposition of Command Medallions/official gifts.Facilitate and assist legal/security review of official gifts received by foreign and domestic sources as requested by the Command.Special Qualifications: Minimum of 5 years’ experience in a Headquarters level protocol office is required.Certification as a Meeting Professional (CMP), in Meeting Management (CMM) or Government Meeting Professional (CGMP) is highly desired.Must be skilled in presenting ideas clearly, concisely and forcefully both orally and in writing.Must establish and maintain effective relationships, applying a high level of independent judgment and discretion.Must be able to walk long distances and up/down stairs).Must have Professional Protocol Training from a source like the U.S. Department of State or a respected commercial vendor like the Protocol School of Washington.Membership in a professional Protocol Organization like Protocol Diplomacy International is a huge benefit due to having your CV, Curriculum Vitae, reviewed and accepted.Professional Protocol Officer with Headquarters' experience, professional training and expertise.Must be an expert on Military Protocol or coordination of Diplomatic Engagements, Official Ceremonials or Senior Level meetings/briefings.Army Protocol experience is highly desirable and valuable in support of the requirements of the Executive Services Department.Expert ability in the use of personal computers and associated software, including Microsoft Outlook, Internet Explorer, and specifically, all programs of the Microsoft Office Suite.Establish and maintain professional and courteous rapport with all levels of inter-personal contacts including distinguished visitors, their staff, patients, families and medical center personnel.Demonstrate high standards of personal/professional conduct and appearance.Maintains proficient and open communication with counterpart protocol offices within the Federal Executive Branch and civilian equivalent.Possess expert knowledge of ceremonial honors, courtesies, observances, etiquette, and other protocol precedents for military and civilian entities.About IntellecTechs:  IntellecTechs, Inc. is a premier provider of Information Technology (IT), Training and Professional Technical and Administrative Services to federal and commercial customers. Our project management experience and commitment to client relationship enables us to provide creative and cost-effective solutions regardless to the size of the mission. By eliminating boundaries, collaborating in new ways, and continually seeking improvement, IntellecTechs is helping clients at all levels to connect, protect, and serve citizens better than ever. Our headquarters is located in Virginia Beach, VA and is also a certified testing center authorized to administer Prometric and Pearson VUE exams. IntellecTechs is an 8(a) company, certified by the SBA, Economically Disadvantaged Women Owned Small Business (EDWOSB), Service-Disabled Veteran-Owned Small Business (SDVOSB), Small Disadvantaged Business (SDB) and Small Women and Minority Owned (SWaM).EO/Affirmative Action Statement:  We are an Equal Employment/Affirmative Action employer. We do not discriminate in hiring based on sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, race, color, religious creed, national origin, physical or mental disability, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state, or local law. If you need a reasonable accommodation for any part of the employment process, please contact us by email. Let us know the nature of your request and your contact information. Accommodation requests will be considered on a case-by-case basis. Please note that only inquiries concerning a request for reasonable accommodation will be responded to from this email address.IntellecTechs, Inc. will not tolerate discrimination or sexual harassment in its workplace and will take all reasonable steps necessary to ensure nondiscriminatory treatment throughout its programs and business practices to include, but not limited to the following: recruiting/posting/advertising, selection and hiring; disciplinary actions; involuntary and voluntary terminations and layoffs; position upgrades and promotions; rates of pay and other compensation; training programs and participation/selection criteria; and apprenticeships. Also, IntellecTechs, Inc. will provide reasonable accommodations to applicants and employees with disabilities in accordance with Federal, State or Local regulations and laws.We value our diversified team and work diligently to provide and promote a culture free from discrimination and harassment.Job Types: Full-time, ContractSchedule:8 hour shiftExperience:Headquarters level protocol office: 5 years (Required)Professional Protocol Training: 1 year (Required)Professional Protocol Officer with Headquarters: 1 year (Preferred)Army Protocol: 1 year (Preferred)License/Certification:CMP, CMM, or CGMP (Preferred)Membership in a professional Protocol Organization (Preferred)Work Location:One location",767,Washington
80,Systems Administrator,LOCKHEED MARTIN CORPORATION,"Annapolis Junction, MD 20701",None,"Want to be at the frontlines of cybersecurity by defending key national security systems? Come join our team of specialists who work daily with groundbreaking technologies to support critical customer systems and missions. We work with our customers to develop tools, support 24x7x365 operations, and engineer systems that play a significant role in the day-day defense of critical national systems.


Program requires a Mid/Senior level System Administrator to support the customer’s Rapid Response Center (RRC). Candidate will have shown talent in coordinating the Linux Operating System, VMWare, and Windows Operating System. Confirmed grasp of basic Window’s functions to include account administration, Active Directory, file sharing, and other common administrative activities. Desired candidates must have experience working in and supporting a customer service organization and have experience using common system monitoring such as Zabbix.


In addition, ideal candidates will have experience in using a help desk ticketing system such as SysAid or Service Now. Candidate must be willing to work in a critical crucial position supporting 24x7 continuous operations. Standard work schedule includes IS 0600-1500 M-F, however the candidate is considered a back-up for our 24x7 SSA team and will be placed on an on-call list. Team size ranges from 4 – 8 System Administrators on any given day.

BENEFITS OF EMPLOYMENT:
We may not know what's going to change the world next, but chances are we're already working on it, and you can, too. As part of our culture of innovation, you’ll have excellent benefits and amenities, an inclusive work environment, ongoing career development and support, rewards and recognition to honor your hard work, and more.



HERE ARE SOME OF THE BENEFITS YOU CAN ENJOY:
Medical
Dental
401k
Paid time off
Work/life balance
Career development
Mentorship opportunities
Rewards & recognition
Whether you’re new to the area or just like being socially involved, we encourage everyone to explore among our many employee networks and employee resource groups we have on-site. Whatever your interests, there’s likely a community at Lockheed Martin for networking, becoming familiar with the area, and enjoying common activities with coworkers.

Lockheed Martin’s driven and comprehensive benefits package. (https://www.lockheedmartinjobs.com/working-here#benefits)

We support our employees, so they can support our mission.
Basic Qualifications:
16 years experience or 12 years, and a Bachelor's of Science Degree, or 10 years and a Masters
TECHNOLOGIES/TOOLS/SKILLS:
VMware – Experience will vSphere
Client/vSphere Web Client & View Client
- Centrify – Work with Active Directory in non-

Windows environments
SSH – Experience with remote command execution
RDP – Work with Remote Desktop Connection to coordinate accounts
McAfee ePO – Experience with security management software
Desired Skills:
Experience with Power shell, Perl, and Linux scripting (csh, ksh, bash)
Working knowledge of NiFi and DDS
Experience with CentOS and Openstack
Experience with common Linux commands such as mv, passwd, rm, useradd
BASIC QUALIFICATIONS:
job.Qualifications

Lockheed Martin is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.
Join us at Lockheed Martin, where your mission is ours. Our customers tackle the hardest missions. Those that demand extraordinary amounts of courage, resilience and precision. They’re dangerous. Critical. Sometimes they even provide an opportunity to change the world and save lives. Those are the missions we care about.

As a leading technology innovation company, Lockheed Martin’s vast team works with partners around the world to bring proven performance to our customers’ toughest challenges. Lockheed Martin has employees based in many states throughout the U.S., and Internationally, with business locations in many nations and territories.
EXPERIENCE LEVEL:
Experienced Professional",767,Washington
81,IT Help Desk Specialist II,Ultra Electronics,"Chantilly, VA",None,"The Ultra IT function manages IT operations across the global locations, providing the technology, vision and leadership in the development and implementation of IT strategies and priorities that support business growth. The IT function manages all aspects of IT Security in safeguarding all the information assets for which Group businesses are responsible.
Ultra Innovates Today for a Safer Tomorrow!
Ultra Maritime Naval Systems and Sensors (NS2) is a provider of underwater and surface solutions for the US and allied government customers. Our products include undersea defense, acoustic countermeasures, sonar systems and radar solutions.
The Help Desk Analyst II will provide IT support for the Chantilly site. He/she will provide support to the end user community through:
configuration, deployment, and troubleshooting of computer hardware and software using remote tools, phone as well as in person.
prioritizing incidents and requests to ensure the most severe issues receive attention first
following up on open incidents and requests to keep tickets up-to-date
serving as an escalation point for more serious technical issues, and work with other team members in the development of their technical skills.
Duties include:
Install Win10 image and configure new computers and deliver to end users
Install, configure and/or troubleshoot a variety of software including O365, and engineering packages.
Setup phone extensions and voice mail, and resolve any issues
Perform routine maintenance of workstations and servers with guidance from Sr. Systems Administrator, including daily review of backup process.
Provide new hire orientation on IT systems and processes
Provide support to and receive support from remote team
Required Skills:
3+ years providing computer support in a corporate environment (in person and remotely), customer service skills important.
Windows 10 experience: image build process, configuration, troubleshooting
1+ years of Active Directory Management: user setup, security groups
1+ years of Linux(RHEL): software, hardware knowledge
1+ years of VMWare 5.5, Exagrid, Veeam
General networking knowledge: able to troubleshoot connectivity issues
1+ years of VPN client support
3+ years of Smartphone support
Ability to obtain a US Government security clearance. Security clearances are granted to U.S. citizens.
Desired Experience:
Knowledge of Bomgar remote support software
Knowledge of Kace Help Desk Ticketing software
Powershell Scripting experience for automation
A+ or Microsoft or comparable certification
Ultra specialises in providing application-engineered bespoke solutions. We focus on our customers' mission critical and intelligent systems in defence, security, critical detection & control markets. Our capabilities and technologies can be found on many of the world's long-term military programmes. We employ over 4,500 employees across the globe and are listed on the London Stock Exchange. Ultra operates mainly as a Tier 3 (sub-system) and occasionally a Tier 2 systems provider, in the Maritime, C3 (Communications, Command and Control) and Cyber, military and commercial aerospace, nuclear and industrial sensors markets. We use both research and development , to provide innovative, mission specific bespoke technological solutions to our customer's most complex problems. Learn more by visiting our website; https://www.ultra.group/
We offer medical, dental, vision, life, and disability insurance, health savings accounts, paid time off, and a 401(k) plan with a Company match.
This contractor and subcontractor shall abide by the requirements of 41 CFR 60-1.4(a), 60-741.5(a). These regulations prohibit discrimination against qualified individuals based on their status as protected veterans or individuals with disabilities and prohibit discrimination against all indibiduals based on their race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, and for inquiring about, discussing or disclosing compensation. Moreover, these regulations require that covered prime contractors and subcontractors take affirmative action to employ and advance in employment individuals without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability or veteran status.
Reasonable accommodation statement: if you need an accommodation for any part of the application process, please email careers@ultra-us-gbs.com",767,Washington
82,Cyber Security Specialist Senior KEY P2E,Axiologic Solutions,"Fort Belvoir, VA",None,"Based in Northern, VA, Axiologic Solutions LLC has opportunities for you to become part of our high-quality team that delivers innovative solutions to key Federal clients. We are seeking a talented Senior Cyber Security Specialist to support our government client in Fort Belvoir. This role will be on a brand new contract!

The mission of the Power Projection Enablers (PdM P2E) contract is to provide a full spectrum of required strategic network and information services within all Combatant Commands (COCOMs) through the implementation of a standardized, global info-structure that is scalable, accessible, and defensible, providing continuous communication and coordination across global operations. The Chief Information Officer of the Army has charged PdM P2E with, but not limited to, procuring and installing leading-edge technologies including Command, Control, Communications, Computers and Intelligence (C4I) systems; computer and communication networks; network convergence; cloud computing; cyber security compliance; visual displays; product tools; product architecture; modeling; electro-optics; transport; radio frequency devices; control systems; and instrumentation equipment. This work will be performed at the P2E Headquarters at Fort Belvoir, VA

This on-site Cyber Security Specialist will support the overall effort and provide assistance in identifying and resolving highly complex Cybersecurity/Information Assurance (IA) problems which are not subject to resolution through conventional methods. The Senior Cyber Security Specialist will develop and implement information assurance (IA), and security standards and procedures. This person must have the ability to provide assistance in the development of P2E Cybersecurity/IA briefings to obtain leadership/management consensus/approval on potential security solutions and provide assistance in network security implementation, including preparation and oversight of the execution of policies and procedures to ensure the continuous security of PEO EIS P2E’s project architectures. Provide assistance in the oversight to ensure implemented security safeguards are adequate to assure the integrity, availability, and confidentiality of the information being processed, transmitted, or stored are consistent with the level of sensitivity of that information. Provide analysis of information processing needs and proposed system changes for security requirements and implications

Minimum Qualifications

Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science or related field is required
Minimum 8-10 years of related experience performing a variety of Cyber Security/ IA coordinating security programs for P2E and implementing IA and security standards, procedures, doctrine and policies.
Secret Clearance

 This role is contingent upon funding
Equal Opportunity Employer–minorities/females/veterans/individuals with disabilities/sexual orientation/gender identity.


Applicants with a physical or mental disability, who require a reasonable accommodation for any part of the application or hiring process, may e-mail their request to Jennifer.chavira@axiologicsolutions.com, call 571-758-3780, or visit our office at 8280 Willow Oaks Corp. Dr. Suite 450, Fairfax Virginia for assistance. Determinations on request for reasonable accommodation will be made on a case-by-case basis.",767,Washington
83,Senior Technical Support Specialist Tier II WFH in Washington,Zest City,"Washington, DC","$38,000 - $83,000 a year","Fast pace business supporting blue chip clients
$38-83000 USD subject to experience
Working for the market leader

Responsible for providing assistance to customers in an enterprise and multi-site infrastructure needing to resolve problems with their computer systems by answering service requests. Provides more complex troubleshooting and assistance for customer systems, scheduling escalations as needed. Perform daily equipment checks to ensure equipment is functioning properly. Provides support for department using basic acquired job skills and knowledge of the company.


Major Accountabilities:


Network Operations Center Functions - Provide Tier II support to clients related to issues with assigned business unit products and services (e.g., VOC, data, etc.) while ensuring adherence to established corporate and departmental policies and procedures
Respond to escalated tickets from Tier I support staff to issues that impact clients business operations
Perform more advanced troubleshooting of routers and systems making adjustments within scope of responsibility
Test modifications to systems to ensure operation before implementing for client's use
Contact common carrier and work with them to resolve issues determined to be in their area of responsibility, acting as a liaison between them and the client
Update information on trouble tickets as necessary, and close out trouble tickets when clients' issues have been resolved
Work aging tickets to resolution, engaging appropriate higher level support teams as needed
Provide constant communication to clients on any/all outstanding issues
Provide backup support to Tier I, answering incoming client calls involving questions or issues (e.g., moves, adds, changes, service affecting issues, etc) with services being provided
Document all trouble tickets with clear, concise explanations in a timely and accurate manner ensuring adherence to department policies and procedures May resolve Tier I problems (e.g., modify call flow, password reset, web feature modification, add/delete users, etc.) as needed
Using various tools (e.g., Tivoli, etc), monitor circuits and network functions and activities for issues
Research Assistance - Assist in resolving routine issues by identifying issue(s) and researching in a timely manner
Document all issues thoroughly maintaining department files
Continuously evaluate the status of all work efforts, ensuring all tasks are prioritized to assist in providing timely and quality services
Assist in monitoring issue trends, escalating such trends to supervisor to determine appropriate actions necessary to eliminate future occurrences and improve service levels
Team Interface/Customer Service - Establish and maintain a professional relationship with internal/external customers, team members and department contacts
Cooperate with team members to meet goals or complete tasks
Provide quality customer service that exceeds customer expectations and improves level of service being provided
Treat all internal/external customers, team members and department contacts with dignity/respect
Escalate to supervisor any situation outside the employee's control that could adversely impact the services being provided

Qualifications:


Education
High school diploma or GED required
College courses from an accredited college or university in computer science, MIS or a related field preferred
Experience
Minimum 2 years experience in a network operations or technical support environment required
Advanced work in pursuit of a Bachelors degree (e.g., junior and senior year, etc.) in computer science, MIS, or a related field can be substituted for one year of technical support or network operations experience
Technical Knowledge
Basic troubleshooting methodology knowledge preferred
Cisco Certified Network Associate (e.g., Voice, Wireless, Security, Service Provider Operations) or higher designation preferred
Minimum 1 year experience with Cisco networking systems required
Minimum 1 year experience with troubleshooting or configuring voice services required
Minimum 1 year experience with call flow configuration required
Other
Basic knowledge of Word and Excel required
Based on departmental need, may be required to work weekend or evening shifts",767,Washington
84,IT CYBERSECURITY SPECIALIST (NETWORK/INFOSEC),US National Defense University,"Fort McNair, DC","$103,690 - $134,798 a year","Duties
Summary
Priority Placement Program (PPP) Military Spouse Preference (MSP) eligible candidates will receive priority consideration at the full performance level only.
Responsibilities
Serves as technical expert and senior project leader.
As a SME, provide effective technical support and oversight as well as ensuring the technical adequacy of contractors and work performed by other IT specialists.
Provide subject matter expertise regarding the design, management, operations, maintenance and architectural improvements for NDU Enterprise Information Systems and infrastructure that ensures that all applicable policies and procedures are followed.
Oversees the operations and maintenance of enterprise systems and security through monitoring physical server/client performance, network availability, capacity, and identifying configuration problems in systems and/or networks.
Plants, assists, develops and implements DOD and Federal security policies and procedures to ensure data confidentiality, integrity and availability is maintained for enterprise systems and/or networks within NDU.
As the technical expert and senior project leader, participates with decision-makers in setting project goals and establishing priorities to support the organizational mission.
Travel Required
Occasional travel - You may be expected to travel for this position.
Supervisory status
No
Promotion Potential
13
Job family (Series)
2210 Information Technology Management
Requirements

Requirements
Conditions of Employment
Must be a U.S. Citizen
Qualifications
You must have at least one year of specialized experience equivalent in level of difficulty and responsibility to the GS-12 grade level in the Federal service.

Specialized experience is defined as:
experience with IT network security;
experience identifying and performing detailed analysis of IT systems security problems at the technical level; experience identifying and reporting trends and weaknesses;
recommending specific technical modifications and solutions to reduce IT security risks; monitoring functionality, security, and integrity of information services;
collects and analyzes usage and performance data; and ensuring security are in accordance with published DoD regulations and policies
Volunteer Experience: Experience refers to paid and unpaid experience, including volunteer work done through National Service programs (e.g., Peace Corps, AmeriCorps) and other organizations (e.g., professional, philanthropic, religious, spiritual, community, student, social). Volunteer work helps build critical competencies, knowledge, and skills, and can provide valuable training and experience that translates to paid employment. You will receive credit for all qualifying experience, including volunteer experience.
Education
Education is not substitutable for specialized experience for this grade level.
Additional information
NDU has a comprehensive benefits package that includes retirement, social security, and thrift savings; health, life, and long term care insurance; paid vacation, sick leave, and holidays. NDU employees enjoy flexible work schedules, transit subsidy, and the opportunity to telecommute.

Initial Probationary Period: You will be required to serve an initial probationary period of two years if one has not already been completed.

Background or Security Investigation: This is a Top Secret/SCI position which requires a background investigation. The individual selected for this position is required to obtain and maintain a Top Secret/SCI security determination to occupy a Top Secret/SCI position within the agency as a condition of employment.

Information Assurance Certification: This is a position with a designated specialization of Information Assurance. As a condition of employment, the individual must possess or be able to obtain an Information Assurance Technical (IAT) Level 1 Certification within 6 months of employment. Employee is required to satisfactory complete the appropriate training and obtain the required certification/recertification for this position as outlined in DOD 8570.1-M Information Assurance Workforce Improvement Program (12/19/2005).

Interagency Career Transition Assistance Program (ICTAP): You must be well qualified for the position to receive special selection priority under the ICTAP. A qualified ICTAP eligible achieving a score of 85 or above will be considered ""well qualified"". For more information, go to: http://www.opm.gov/rif/employee_guides/career_transition.asp#ictap

Special Hiring Authorities: You may be considered for the vacancy if you are eligible for a special appointment authority such as those authorized for the severely disabled; certain Vietnam Era and disabled veterans; volunteers returned from the Peace Corps or Vista, etc. For more information, visit the following OPM websites: USAJOBS Resource Center: http://www.usajobs.gov/ResourceCenter; VetsInfo Guide: http://www.fedshirevets.gov/.

Veterans Employment Opportunities Act (VEOA): Veterans who are preference eligibles or who have been separated from the Armed Forces under honorable conditions after substantially completing an initial 3-year term (not less than 2 years and 11 months) may apply regardless of their current geographical location. Veterans must submit their DD-214, Certificate of Release or Discharge from Active Duty, to be considered under this authority.

Military Spouse Preference (MSP): You may be eligible for MSP, if you are the spouse of an active duty military member and you are ranked among the best qualified for this vacancy.

Reemployed Annuitants: Department of Defense has the authority to hire annuitants without reduction in pay. For more information, go to: http://www.dtic.mil/whs/directives/corres/pdf/1400.25-V300.pdf

If you are unable to apply online, view the following link for information regarding Alternate Application.

How You Will Be Evaluated
You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications above.
HR will review your resume and supporting documentation to ensure you meet the basic qualification requirements. Applicants meeting the basic requirements will be further evaluated by information provided in the Assessment Questionnaire. If, after reviewing your resume and or supporting documentation, a determination is made that you have inflated your qualifications and or experience, you may lose consideration for this position. Please follow all instructions carefully. Errors or omissions may affect your rating.
The Assessment Questionnaire takes approximately 15 minutes to complete and collects information on your education, training and experience related to the following critical competencies:

Configuration Management
Information Systems/Network Security
Infrastructure Design
IT Cybersecurity Architecture (INFOSEC)
Technical Competence

Background checks and security clearance
Security clearance
Sensitive Compartmented Information
Drug test required
No
Required Documents

Required Documents
You must provide a complete Application Package which includes:

Résumé: The latest resume submitted will be used to determine qualifications.
Complete Assessment Questionnaire
Other Supporting Documents
The following supporting documents are REQUIRED to verify your individual eligibility status. Not all will apply for each applicant. They MUST be received by the closing date of the announcement.
SF-50 - (If applicable) Notification of Personnel Action for current or former federal employees- with the exception of current permanent NDU employees, please provide your most recent SF50 or the SF50 reflecting Career/Career-Conditional tenure and the highest grade held on a permanent basis.
If you claim Veteran's Preference:
You must submit a copy of your DD Form-214, Certificate of Release or Discharge from Active Duty"", showing the dates of active duty service, type of discharge and the character of service. Alternatively, If you are a current military member in active duty service and do not have a copy of your DD Form-214, you must submit a written documentation (certification) from your branch of service certifying that you are expected to be discharged or released from active duty under honorable conditions no later than 120 days after the date the certification is submitted with your application for this position. The certification should also include your rank, dates of active duty service and what they condition of discharge is thought to be.If claiming 10-point preference and/or are a 30% or more Disabled Veteran, you must submit both a DD Form-214 or expected discharge documentation as described above AND a copy of a letter from the Department of Veterans Affairs (VA) or your branch of service certifying the presence of service-connected disability and indicating the percentage of disability
If you are claiming eligibility based on 10-point derived veterans' preference (i.e. a spouse, widow/widower, or parent of a veteran claiming veterans' preference when the veteran is unable to use it), you must also submit a Standard Form 15 (SF-15) ""Application for 10-Point Veteran's Preference"" and any required documents indicated on the SF-15 to substantiate the claimed preference.
ICTAP Eligibles: A copy of the RIF separation notice and SF50 if available.
Special Hiring Authority: Documentation verifying eligibility.
Performance Appraisal: Current or previous federal employees.
Military Spouse Preference (MSP) - Spousal Travel Orders/Permanent Change of Station(PCS) Orders, Marriage Certificate, and Military Spouse Preference Self Certification checklist
Other documents identified in the announcement.
WARNING: Failure to submit a complete application package including any required documentation by the closing date of the announcement at 11:59 EST, or at the time of application for announcements with an extended closing date, may result in an ineligible rating and loss of consideration. To verify that your application is complete, log into your USAJOBS account, select Application Status and More Information. The Details page will display the status of your application. It is the applicant's responsibility to verify that information entered or uploaded is received, legible and accurate. HR will not modify answers submitted by an applicant.
If you are relying on your education to meet qualification requirements:
Education must be accredited by an accrediting institution recognized by the U.S. Department of Education in order for it to be credited towards qualifications. Therefore, provide only the attendance and/or degrees from schools accredited by accrediting institutions recognized by the U.S. Department of Education.
Failure to provide all of the required information as stated in this vacancy announcement may result in an ineligible rating or may affect the overall rating.
Benefits

Benefits
A career with the U.S. Government provides employees with a comprehensive benefits package. As a federal employee, you and your family will have access to a range of benefits that are designed to make your federal career very rewarding. Opens in a new windowLearn more about federal benefits.
Review our benefits
Eligibility for benefits depends on the type of position you hold and whether your position is full-time, part-time, or intermittent. Contact the hiring agency for more information on the specific benefits offered.
Help
This job is open to
Federal employees - Competitive service
Current or former competitive service federal employees.
Career transition (CTAP, ICTAP, RPL)
Federal employees who meet the definition of a ""surplus"" or ""displaced"" employee.
Individuals with disabilities
Military spouses
Peace Corps & AmeriCorps Vista
Special authorities
Individuals eligible under a special authority not listed above, but defined in the federal hiring regulations.
Veterans
Clarification from the agency
Current/former federal employees (competitive and noncompetitive), VEOA, 30% or more disabled veterans, certain military spouses (5 CFR 315.612), certain former overseas employees, ICTAP, foreign service employees, interchange agreements, national service (Peace Corps and VISTA), PPP DoD military spouse preference eligible and people with disabilities (Schedule A).",767,Washington
85,Cyber Security Specialist 2,"M.C. Dean, Inc.","Washington, DC 20018 (Langdon area)",None,"M.C. Dean is Building Intelligence™. We design, build, operate, and maintain cyber-physical solutions for the nation’s most recognizable mission-critical facilities, secure environments, complex infrastructure, and global enterprises.
Our success relies on great people delivering innovative projects and solutions for Fortune 100 companies and the most recognized agencies in government, defense, and security.
Join our more than 4,500 employees worldwide who engineer and deploy automated, secure, and resilient power and technology systems; and deliver the management platforms essential for long-term system sustainability. Together we are creating the integrated systems and technologies that shape the built and cyber-physical world.
We offer an excellent benefits package including:
A competitive salary
Medical, dental, vision, life, and disability insurance
Paid-time off
Tuition reimbursement
401k Retirement Plan
Military Reserve pay offset
Paid maternity leave

Position Summary
The Cyber Security Specialist is responsible for coordinating and implementing the technical controls and configuration settings that have been selected for complete systems. They mentor Junior Specialists, verify control implementation and provide RMF artifacts to Cyber Security Specialists.
Responsibilities:
Participate in development and review of System Security Documentation, including System Security Plans (SSP), CS policies, Personnel Security, Disaster Recovery, Incident Responses, Authentication Management plan.
Participate in systems analysis, systems development, and information technology program management.
Participate in the preparation of project briefings and reports.
Review and analyze existing systems, identify and understand technical requirements as part of strategic development, implementation, and support for CS practices.
Develop detailed and thorough site survey report documentation.
Help create Cyber Security documentation for the lifecycle of Information Technology / Operational Technology Systems.
Contribute to research and analysis and translate security policy and requirements to define best methods and practices.
Provide technical guidance on implementation of security mechanisms and controls.
Assist in device configuration of Windows Operating Systems, Applications, and Cisco IOS devices to comply with DISA STIG (and other) guidance
Complete and Verify device configuration of Operating Systems, Applications, and Network devices to comply with DISA STIG (and other) guidance
Spend time each week staying current on industry trends and available CS doctrine as workload allows.
Identify industry accepted technical security standards and the policies that drive compliance requirements
Support senior team members in developing, maintaining, and improving secure systems
Apply system Operating System patches, Service Packs, Hotfixes, and software/ firmware updates
Establish and support automated system software update methodologies and technologies
Apply DISA Security Technical Implementation Guide (STIG) settings
Perform system vulnerability scans including Nessus / ACAS, and SCAP Compliance Checker (SCC)

Requirements:
Certifications:
CCNA-Security, GICSP, GSEC, Security+ CE or SSCP
Education:
0-2 Years of Experience with a Master's Degree in Information Technology, Risk Management, Cybersecurity
2-4 Years of Experience with a Bachelor's Degree in Information Technology, Risk Management, Cybersecurity
6-8 Years of Experience with an Associate's Degree in Information Technology, Risk Management, Cybersecurity
8-10 Years of Experience with a High School Diploma
Abilities:
Exposure to computer screens for an extended period of time.
Sitting for extended periods of time.
Reach by extending hands or arms in any direction.
Have finger dexterity in order to manipulate objects with fingers rather than whole hands or arms, for example, using a keyboard.
Listen to and understand information and ideas presented through spoken words and sentences.
Communicate information and ideas in speaking so others will understand.
Read and understand information and ideas presented in writing.
Apply general rules to specific problems to produce answers that make sense.
Identify and understand the speech of another person.

EOE Minorities/Females/Protected Veterans/Disabled
VEVRAA Contractor",767,Washington
86,Senior Workday HRIS Specialist,Washington Gas,"Springfield, VA",None,"Job Description
Position Summary
As an Senior HR/ HRIS Specialist, you will play a key role in the development, implementation and maintenance of HRIS systems associated with the collection, retrieval, accessibility and usage of employee information for HR department planning and activities.


You will be responsible for:
Confirming accuracy and integrity of all data entered, maintains data in HRIS systems and databases and assures information is available on a timely basis.
Performing group data updates, exports, imports, clean-ups and researched/reports on any data discrepancies.
Supporting user acceptance testing of updates or enhancements to HRIS and assist with drafting requirements documents.
Conducting data analysis on HR data such as compensation, classification, employment, employee relations and/or benefits data, as directed.
Preparing reports, graphs, charts and statistics in support of Human Resources Organizational Effectiveness (HROE)
Supporting HROE personnel with standard, ad hoc and special analyses.
Managing data to support internal and external audit requests.
Providing assistance and supports other on difficult assignments and/or problems, as directed.
Coordinating schedules and tracks progress of specialized work projects or departmental functions.
Acting as primary contact for assigned functions with outside organizations or other departments; responds to technical administrative questions and ensures necessary follow up.
Advising, monitoring or coordinating activities of outsourced providers as it pertains to HRIS function.
External Interactions: Employees, Internal HR Functions, Business and support units, Government agencies & courts, Internal and external auditors.

Qualifications, Skills and Abilities
Bachelors Degree in a related field.
Minimum of 5 years’ HRIS experience with demonstrated aptitude for analytics and problem solving.
Workday HCM in Benefits, Time Tracking and Payroll preferred.
Highly proficient across the full Workday HCM Suite performing duties to include: Business Process Configuration and maintenance, EIB configuration, Integration Management, Security and Advanced report writing.
Proven ability to use computer software and applications, including Microsoft Office applications (Word, Excel and PowerPoint), to share, retrieve, research and present business information; proficiency with MS Excel.
Demonstrated working knowledge of principles, practices and standards of human resource administration.
WGL is an EEO employer – M/F/Vets/Disabled",767,Washington
87,Senior Data (Electronic Flies) Specialist (Must have ability to obtain a Public Trust),SAVA,"Washington, DC 20001 (Columbia Heights area)",None,"SAVA, an Akima Company, helps government customers strengthen national security, improve communications and collaboration, and secure the integrity of their data, information systems and networks. Our personnel enjoy competitive benefits packages and challenging roles in work environments committed to innovation, diversity and opportunity for career growth. As an Alaska Native Corporation (ANC), 100% of our company’s profits go back to our more than 14,000 Iñupiat shareholders that have resided near and above the Arctic Circle for more than 10,000 years. Our business helps support their way of life and contributes to the survival of a culture that has thrived in a challenging environment.
****Position is contingent upon contract award*****
Job Summary: SAVA is seeking a candidate to fill the role as a Senior Data Specialist to provide systems support to the United States Department of Justice (DOJ) Tax Division Office of Automated Litigation Support (OALS) Unit in Washington, DC.
Job Responsibilities:
Provides oversight functions for Data Specialists performing file manipulation, loading, conversion services, exports, and productions and quality checks of loads and exports.
Develops, evaluates and modifies methodologies and procedures for manipulating files for use with COTS products and litigation support applications.
Performs quality assurance of all EFP services.
Responsible for ensuring that incoming productions are made pursuant to the applicable ESI specifications
Qualifications
Minimum Qualifications:
Ability to Obtain Public Trust.
Requires knowledge of litigation discovery process, and the EDRM workflow.
Knowledge of Government’s IT environment, including office automation networks, PC and server-based applications preferred.
Working knowledge of personal computers, including Windows 7, document review software, and encryption methods.
Experience with LAW, IPRO, Relativity or other document process platform.
At least 5 years’ experience performing eDiscovery roles including but not limited to electronic files processing (EFP), image and data file conversion, data culling using review tools, quality assurance, database loads and retrieval, and data analysis.
Desired Qualifications:
Undergraduate degree preferred-preferably in computer science or related field.
Familiarity with ICONECT, Relativity, MS Office Suite, and West LiveNote valued.
The duties and responsibilities listed in this job description generally cover the nature and level of work being performed by individuals assigned to this position. This is not intended to be a complete list of all duties, responsibilities, and skills required. Subject to the terms of an applicable collective bargaining agreement, the company management reserves the right to modify, add, or remove duties and to assign other duties as may be necessary. We wish to thank all applicants for their interest and effort in applying for the position; however, only candidates selected for interviews will be contacted.
We are an equal opportunity employer. All applicants will receive consideration for employment, without regard to race, color, religion, creed, national origin, gender or gender-identity, age, marital status, sexual orientation, veteran status, disability, pregnancy or parental status, or any other basis prohibited by law.

We are committed to Equal Employment Opportunity and providing reasonable accommodations to applicants with physical and/or mental disabilities. If you have a physical and/or mental disability and are interested in applying for employment and need special accommodations to use our website to apply for a position please contact, Recruiting Services at job-assist@akima.com or 571-353-7053. Reasonable accommodation requests are considered on a case-by-case basis.

The dedicated email and telephonic options above are reserved only for individuals with disabilities needing accessibility assistance to apply to an open position using our website.

Please do not use the dedicated email or phone number above to inquire on the status of your job application.

In order for our company to stay compliant with government regulations, please apply on line. Please DO NOT email resumes or call in lieu of applying online unless you have a physical and/or mental disability and need assistance with the online application.


Shift: Day Job
Primary Location: US-DC-Washington
Organization: SAVA
Job: Information Technology
Closing Date (Period for Applying) - External: Ongoing
Travel: No
Clearance Level: Public Trust",767,Washington
88,Network Infrastructure Lead Specialist - 21065,World Wildlife Fund,"Washington, DC 20037 (West End area)",None,"Overview:

World Wildlife Fund (WWF), one of the world’s leading conservation organizations, seeks a Network Infrastructure Lead Specialist.
The Network Infrastructure Lead Specialist is responsible for the support and maintenance of the WWF US computer network and technical infrastructure. Configures, supports, and maintains WWF’s complex network including firewalls, routers, switches, load-balancers, point-to-point tunnels, VRRP, and DMZ. Develop and implement best practices for support, routine maintenance, and proactively monitor systems. Administrators over WWF’s complex series of virtual and interconnected systems. Works with the Sr. Director, Enterprise Technology Services and the Director of Network Services to develop a strategy to effectively manage technical infrastructure at WWF US Headquarters and applicable remote offices. Responsible for research, evaluation, and testing of new and emerging network technologies.
Responsibilities:
Manages all aspects of multiple complex networks both connected and segmented along with routing, point-to-point tunnels, VLANs, VPN, load balancing, firewall policies, public and private IP assignment, public and private DNS management.
Manages the configuration and connections to hybrid, cloud-based (Azure and other) networks.
Configures, operates, and supports all aspects of a Hyperconverged Infrastructure systems (Nutanix) including virtualization (Nutanix AHV & VMWare), compute, storage, networking, data protection and disaster recovery. Ensure systems run optimally while monitoring and assessing systems for performance degradation while looking for tuning and optimization opportunities.
Maintains Disaster Recovery procedures to insure recovery of all identified systems, under the responsibilities of the Network Services team, in a declared disaster or a DR test.
Responsible for the backup of all critical systems.
Maintains and supports remote access solutions implemented at WWF US, including Citrix, VPN, and Outlook Web Access technologies.
Assists with support to Azure services, Office365 Exchange Online, MS Teams along with an Active Directory environment.
Assist with documenting all infrastructure systems, and mission critical applications under the responsibility of Network Services. Perform and maintain change management documentation for all major or functional changes to all critical systems to ensure proper migration, rollback, and approval steps are taken.
Maintains a security strategy to reduce the risk of a security breach. Manages security technology on Microsoft server operating systems, firewalls, switches, routers, and email systems. Implements changes (in accordance with change management procedures) as requested by the IT Security Administrator.
Support or assist support Linux (Red Hat) systems.
Provides technical support and troubleshoots infrastructure equipment. Provides tier 3 support to end users when requested by other Network Services staff.
Performs other duties as assigned.
Qualifications:
A Bachelor's degree is required, equivalent experience will be accepted in lieu of degree.
Requires eight years of related experience supporting computer networks with in depth experience supporting the following technologies: networking equipment (firewall, switches, routers), Hypervisor systems, remote access technologies, backups and disaster recovery. Experience with Active Directory, Azure AD and Office365.
Must be very familiar with OSI model and other foundational networking concepts along with best-practices.
Continuing education including certifications in networking, virtualization and hyperconverged technologies or existing Nutanix certifications are highly desirable.
Linux experience preferred but not required.
MacOS support experience a plus.
Strong verbal and written communication skills required along with being a consistent team player.
Strong organizational, documentation, project management skills including development of detailed project plans.
Strategic and business skills along with strong technical skills.
Well-developed methodologies for troubleshooting technical problems.
Committed to building and strengthening a culture of inclusion within and across teams.
Identifies and aligns with WWF’s core values: Courage, Integrity, Respect, and Collaboration
Demonstrates courage by speaking up even when it is difficult, or unpopular.
Builds trust with colleagues by acting with integrity, owning mistakes, and holding oneself accountable.
Welcomes other points of view and ideas, recognizing and embracing different and contrary perspectives with kindness, curiosity, and encouragement.
To Apply:
Submit cover letter and resume through our Careers Page, Requisition #21065
Due to the high volume of applications we are not able to respond to inquiries via phone
As an EOE/AA employer, WWF will not discriminate in its employment practices due to an applicant’s race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, marital status, genetic information, sexual orientation, gender identity and expression, disability, or protected Veteran status. WWF values diversity and inclusion and welcomes diverse candidates to apply.",767,Washington
89,Peer Recovery Specialist,Psychiatric Institute of Washington,"Washington, DC 20016 (American University Park area)",None,"Responsibilities
The Psychiatric Institute of Washington provides comprehensive behavioral healthcare for adolescents, adults, and senior adults suffering from mental health and addictive illnesses. PIW is a 130 bed, short-term, acute care hospital offering inpatient, partial and intensive outpatient hospitalization, as well as specialized treatment programs for chemical dependency. PIW has an excellent reputation as an innovative hospital with caring, dedicated staff, experienced in the delivery of behavioral healthcare. Situated in the safe, historical Tenleytown neighborhood, PIW is one mile from the Tenleytown Metro stop and within walking distance to local cafes and restaurants.
Benefits package include:
Challenging and rewarding work environment
Competitive Compensation & Generous Paid Time Off
Excellent Medical, Dental, Vision and Prescription Drug Plans
401(K) with company match and discounted stock plan
Career development opportunities within UHS and its 300+ Subsidiaries!
Tuition Assistance
Primary Duties & Responsibilities:
Conducts screenings to understand the patient’s history of drug and/or alcohol use, treatment history, social service and other recovery support needs and motivation to change behavior.
Facilitates patient’s readiness for change and uses motivational interviewing techniques and other communication skills to support and encourage the patient to plan for reduction or elimination of drug and alcohol use. Models coping techniques and self-help strategies.
Assists patients in setting personal recovery goals and developing recovery care plans.
Works with addiction treatment and recovery care team and patient to connect with community supports and treatment services to promote recovery.
Supports patients and families to understand how to access community resources.
Assists patients in linking to community supports and treatment services, including helping secure transportation and other resources.
Acts as a peer support during the inpatient stay, discharge planning and care transitions throughout the continuum of care.
Use technology applications, televideo and patient facing apps to maintain engagement with patients in various community settings.
Provides family and social support network members with education and recovery support materials.
Provides education on risks of overdose and assures that patient and significant others have naloxone and are trained to use.
Participates in trainings to continually gain new skills.
Attends required staff and other meetings.
Completes required documentation and other reports.
Acts as a resource to other clinical team members on recovery support.
Consults with nursing staff, social work as requested, even if patient does not screen positive.
Electronically reach out to treatment providers to verify patient showed up for appointment; and follow-up on all missed appointments
Participates in trainings to continually gain new skills.
Attends required staff and other meetings.
Completes required documentation and other reports.
Acts as a resource to other clinical team members on recovery support. Dress, speak and conduct yourself in an appropriate and professional manner at all times. Adheres to IT and business-related communications confidentiality policies.
Qualifications
High school diploma or G.E.D. is required.
The candidate must be actively engaged in his/her own recovery with a minimum of two years demonstrated personal recovery experience from alcohol and/or drug use.
The incumbent must be able to read, interpret documents and write routine reports.
Basic computer skills are required. The Coach must demonstrate excellent interpersonal skills, the ability to relate to patients and health professionals, as well as good problem-solving skills.
Must demonstrate a willingness to learn and an interest in acquiring new skills.
The incumbent should have a minimum of two years of professional experience in a substance use disorder setting providing peer support/navigation; Certified Peer Specialist Certification or completion of certification within 12 months of hire..
Must have knowledge of recovery support systems, including but not limited to, inpatient Residential Treatment Programs, IOP, outpatient MAT and community based support groups; and providing direct service; Experience or a working knowledge of the criminal justice system is a plus. Reliable transportation and valid drivers license preferred
One of the nation’s largest and most respected hospital companies, Universal Health Services, Inc. (UHS) has built an impressive record of achievement and performance. Steadily growing from a startup to an esteemed Fortune 500 corporation, UHS today has annual revenue nearing $10 billion. In 2017, UHS was recognized as one of the World’s Most Admired Companies by Fortune; ranked #276 on the Fortune 500, and listed #275 in Forbes inaugural ranking of America’s Top 500 Public Companies.
Our operating philosophy is as effective today as it was 40 years ago: Build or acquire high quality hospitals in rapidly growing markets, invest in the people and equipment needed to allow each facility to thrive, and become the leading healthcare provider in each community we serve.
Headquartered in King of Prussia, PA, UHS has more than 81,000 employees and through its subsidiaries operates more than 320 acute care hospitals, behavioral health facilities and ambulatory centers in the United States, Puerto Rico, the U.S. Virgin Islands and the United Kingdom.
UHS is a registered trademark of UHS of Delaware, Inc., the management company for Universal Health Services, Inc. and a wholly-owned subsidiary of Universal Health Services, Inc. Universal Health Services, Inc. is a holding company and operates through its subsidiaries including its management company, UHS of Delaware, Inc. All healthcare and management operations are conducted by subsidiaries of Universal Health Services, Inc. To the extent any reference to ""UHS or UHS facilities"" on this website including any statements, articles or other publications contained herein relates to our healthcare or management operations it is referring to Universal Health Services' subsidiaries including UHS of Delaware. Further, the terms ""we,"" ""us,"" ""our"" or ""the company"" in such context similarly refer to the operations of Universal Health Services' subsidiaries including UHS of Delaware. Any employment referenced in this website is not with Universal Health Services, Inc. but solely with one of its subsidiaries including but not limited to UHS of Delaware, Inc.
UHS is not accepting unsolicited assistance from search firms for this employment opportunity. Please, no phone calls or emails. All resumes submitted by search firms to any employee at UHS via-email, the Internet or in any form and/or method without a valid written search agreement in place for this position will be deemed the sole property of UHS. No fee will be paid in the event the candidate is hired by UHS as a result of the referral or through other means.
EEO Statement
All UHS subsidiaries are committed to providing an environment of mutual respect where equal employment opportunities are available to all applicants and teammates. UHS subsidiaries are equal opportunity employers and as such, openly support and fully commit to recruitment, selection, placement, promotion and compensation of individuals without regard to race, color, religion, age, sex (including pregnancy, gender identity, and sexual orientation), genetic information, national origin, disability status, protected veteran status or any other characteristic protected by federal, state or local laws.
We believe that diversity and inclusion among our teammates is critical to our success.
Notice
At UHS and all our subsidiaries, our Human Resources departments and recruiters are here to help prospective candidates by matching skillset and experience with the best possible career path at UHS and our subsidiaries. We take pride in creating a highly efficient and best in class candidate experience. During the recruitment process, no recruiter or employee will request financial or personal information (Social Security Number, credit card or bank information, etc.) from you via email. The recruiters will not email you from a public webmail client like Hotmail, Gmail, Yahoo Mail, etc. If you are suspicious of a job posting or job-related email mentioning UHS or its subsidiaries, let us know by contacting us at: https://uhs.alertline.com or 1-800-852-3449.",767,Washington
90,Senior Advanced Systems Administration Specialist (SECRET),Geologics Corporation,"Fairfax, VA",None,"Senior Advanced Systems Administration Specialist job in Fairfax, Virginia is available with one of GeoLogics top Space and Intelligence companies. IN this job you will installing new software, troubleshooting, granting permissions to applications and training users. You'll also be responsible for the day-to-day support of server services by performing server administration for physical and virtual server operating systems and configuring, maintaining and troubleshooting of physical and virtual hardware and network related interfaces on servers. We'll rely on you to perform, maintain, troubleshoot and conduct a complete analysis of alerts; create scripts to automate repetitive processes; and work with customers to identify, isolate, and resolve problems with servers that are affecting other services.

What you bring to the table:
U.S. Citizen with active Department of Defense Secret security clearance
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, a related field or equivalent experience is required and 8+ years of relevant experience; or Master's degree plus 6 years of relevant experience.
Advanced understanding of complex networks & server based operating systems
Design, planning, implementation, monitoring, administering and maintaining computer networks.
Palo Alto, Cisco, Taclanes, WANs, LANs, Firewalls, switches and routers.
Linux including RHEL/CentOS, specifically secure environments. Virtualized and bare metal
Infrastructure aspects of Linux related to authentication, policy, scanning, logging, storage.
Microsoft Windows 10 desktop and Microsoft Windows 2008/2012/2019
Subject matter expert (SME) with the ability to mentor others on administrating the server environment
Enhanced troubleshooting skills within the server OS as well as both networking and storage technologies
Hands-on experience developing, deploying and supporting large-scale enterprise server solutions

What sets you apart:
Senior level knowledge of physical and virtual server support
Senior level knowledge of access, permissions and security that gives the clients the access to the data they need to perform their daily activities.
Brian Videtic
Senior Recruiter
(703) 891-6119 x5059
bvidetic@geologics.com",767,Washington
91,"Specialist, Cyber Security Sr. (SailPoint - IdentityNow)",CareFirst BlueCross BlueShield,"Washington, DC 20024 (Southwest Waterfront area)",None,"Resp & Qualifications
PRINCIPAL ACCOUNTABILITIES:
We are looking for a SailPoint IdentityNow Engineer to be a part of our team. The candidate will be responsible for driving the continued growth of our identity management platform and extending its use across more applications while addressing additional business requirements. The candidate must have excellent skills on various Identity Management products - primarily with SailPoint IdentityNow. The candidate must have strong experience with designing, building, testing, and deploying identity management solutions.
You will have the opportunity to work closely with internal clients, Information Security teams and external vendors in gathering requirements and designing and deploying application infrastructure components. You will also work with project and operations/support teams in resolving problems and incidents.
What you’ll do as a SailPoint IdentityNow Engineer:Deep knowledge of Identity and Access Management end-to-end lifecycle, from HR driven processes (on/off-boarding, conversions, transfer) to IAM compliance and role management and mining.Architect/Design, build, and maintain an enterprise wide Identity Management solution.Manage the user lifecycle (joiners, movers, leavers) through automation and integration with key systems.Good understanding of information security principles and IT infrastructure including operating systems, applications, communications and network protocols.Good understanding/working knowledge of the UNIX/Linux systems, active directory, Azure, O365, SAAS applications, privileged access management.Evaluate and address issues related to performance, stability, scalability, and extensibility of the tools and applications.Partner with operations staff to develop testing and monitoring strategies and resolve defects and customer-reported issues. Participate in developing test plans, including regression tests, for newly developed software or feature.Write and maintain the code, so that it can be tested using automatic methods. Write and maintain automatic test cases as appropriate.Create and follow processes and procedures to ensure maintainable application development, including source code management, automated build processes and appropriate documentation.Work across teams including Information Services, Information Security, and Business units to architect and build IDE workflows and collectors.
Qualifications
You could be a great fit if you have:
7+ years of experience in Identity development and engineering or related technologies.
2 – 4 years of SailPoint IdentityNow implementation and support work.
Experience in web application development using Java, JavaScript, etc.
Possess good working knowledge in SailPoint IdentityNow, Active Directory, provisioning / deprovisioning to Azure & O365 and SAAS based applications.
BS. in Computer Science or equivalent experience.
Experience in tools such as SailPoint IdentityNow, CyberArk or other identity management systems preferred.
Understands the challenges in managing an identity system within an organization.
Department
Department: Identity Development & Engineering.
Equal Employment Opportunity
CareFirst BlueCross BlueShield is an Equal Opportunity (EEO) employer. It is the policy of the Company to provide equal employment opportunities to all qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran or disabled status, or genetic information.
Hire Range Disclaimer
Actual salary will be based on relevant job experience and work history.
Where To Apply
Please visit our website to apply: www.carefirst.com/careers
Closing Date
Please apply before: 7.6.2021
Sponsorship in US
Must be eligible to work in the U.S. without Sponsorship",767,Washington
92,"Senior Advisor, Cash and Voucher Technology - Technology for Development",Mercy Corps,"Washington, DC 20036 (Downtown area)",None,"*This position is open to any Mercy Corps locations*

About Mercy Corps
Mercy Corps is a leading global organization powered by the belief that a better world is possible. Our mission is to alleviate poverty, suffering, and oppression and work to build secure, productive, and just communities in over 40 countries around the world. Empowering people with bold solutions to help them become drivers of their economic well-being and become major players in their economy is a cornerstone to our strategy. To do this, we know our teams do their best work when they are diverse and every team member feels that they belong. We welcome diverse backgrounds, perspectives, and skills so that we can be stronger and have long term impact.
We are at a critical junction where leveraging digital technology is more critical than ever - the contexts in which we work, even in the most fragile countries, are evolving and digital technology is transforming the world of international relief and development - the contexts in which we operate, and how we achieve our mission.
We’re looking for someone with the experience, creativity and drive to join our Technology for Development (T4D) team and lead our work in digital cash and voucher assistance, driving and supporting programming across our more than 40 countries of operation around the world. Mercy Corps is a leader in humanitarian cash and voucher assistance. It comprises almost half of our global humanitarian portfolio and last year we transferred some $57M through cash and voucher programs to vulnerable populations in support of both humanitarian and resilience-building outcomes.
Program / Department Summary
The Technology for Development (T4D) team is housed within the Program Department’s Technical Support Unit. It collaborates with Mercy Corps’ global teams and external partners to unlock new possibilities that increase program quality, impact and innovation, helping improve more lives through the power of technology. We think beyond today’s context, exploring how we can use current and emerging technology to shrink the global digital divide and help people in vulnerable communities adapt to and overcome evolving challenges. Our mission and purpose are to drive sustainable program impact through responsible application of existing and emerging digital technologies (i.e. digital identity, digital payments, big data analytics, etc.). Mercy Corps is focused on driving the use of digital technologies to maximize scale, efficiency and impact within key strategic outcome areas, such as Food Security; Economic Opportunity; Water and Climate Adaptation; Peace and Governance; and Humanitarian Response.
The Position
The Senior Advisor, Cash and Voucher Technology is the lead expert in digital cash programming in both development and humanitarian settings. They provide expert advice, targeted guidance, relationship management, support and capacity building to Mercy Corps field teams. The Senior Advisor provides key technical leadership on program design and development, expertly develops and grows partnerships and networks, represents the agency at key sector forums and events, and contributes to program quality and relevance. They stay at the forefront of industry innovation and best practices, delivering focused training and disseminating key information to internal and external partners.
The Senior Advisor will be a core member of a matrixed team that supports quality Cash and Voucher Assistance (CVA) in collaboration with cash technical experts. The Senior Advisor will strengthen and promote Mercy Corps’ suite of technology solutions, while also identifying and researching emerging technologies that maximize the impact of field programs and improved, high quality implementation - including but not limited to participant registration and management, data sharing and protection, post distribution monitoring, and effective and efficient digital cash/voucher delivery, including integrating with payment providers in countries where Mercy Corps operates.

Essential Responsibilities
Program Development
Co-design and co-implement technical solutions with country teams, program design teams, and proposal developers.
Lead cross-functional teams in the design, development and execution of technology enabled solutions, with special focus on CVA.
Contribute significant components to large bid and concept note development for government and private donors, including FCDO, ECHO, USAID.
Program Quality & Implementation
Provide hands-on implementation support for complex projects, including country staff recruitment and onboarding.
Advance monitoring, evaluation and learning (MEL) tech uptake through design and support for use of MEL tech in CVA programs in accordance with Mercy Corps’ MEL policy.
Support country teams to establish electronic payment systems, by utilizing Mercy Corps’ Master Service Agreements for electronic voucher platform services.
Facilitate partnerships between local payment providers, digital solutions, and Mercy Corps team members to facilitate digitally-based payments.
Support Mercy Corps’ Data Protection Specialist in identified areas of overlap.
Ensure that program implementation is responsive to communities and partners and consistent with Mercy Corps’ relevant program guidelines, principles, values, quality standards and strategic plan.
Leverage Mercy Corps’ position as a leader in humanitarian technology solutions to enable coordination across agencies in complex, fluid environments where effective data analysis can enable accelerated, coordinated, joint responses.
Program Learning
Track key advances in digital and/or donor policies and consider relevance for advancing Mercy Corps’ use of technology in CVA programs.
Provide Mercy Corps leadership with strategic guidance on how to improve and scale digital transfers.
Identify and maintain partnerships with technology service providers to create benefit for Mercy Corps teams.
Build evidence on what works and what does not, compiling and sharing lessons learned with Mercy Corps teams, country leadership, peer organizations, and the donor community.
Strategic Influence & Representation
Develop strategic partnerships to bring relevant external resources and innovations into the organization.
Manage technical partner relationships for digital products and services and conduct appropriate due diligence and negotiations.
Represent T4D and Mercy Corps at donor meetings for general partnership development, proposal development and presentation and status presentation of existing grants.
Organizational Learning
Provide in-country and remote training and support for Mercy Corps staff, partners, and others.
As part of our commitment to organizational learning and in support of our understanding that learning organizations are more effective, efficient and relevant to the communities they serve, we expect all team members to commit 5% of their time to learning activities that benefit Mercy Corps as well as themselves.
Supervisory Responsibility
None.
Accountability

Reports Directly To: Senior Director, Technology for Development

Works Directly With: Senior leadership, field leadership and staff, IT staff, partner organizations, Technical Support Units, Program Performance and Quality, Humanitarian Leadership and Response, Research and Learning, Compliance, Resource Development and Communications.

Accountability to Participants and Stakeholders
Mercy Corps team members are expected to support all efforts toward accountability, specifically to our program participants, community partners, other stakeholders, and to international standards guiding international relief and development work. We are committed to actively engaging communities as equal partners in the design, monitoring and evaluation of our field projects.
Minimum Qualification & Transferable Skills
Bachelor’s or Master’s degree in International Affairs, International Relations, Computer Science, Information Systems, or relevant field preferred.
A minimum of 5 years of experience as researcher, designer, and implementer of digital solutions for Cash and Voucher Assistance.
Knowledgeable about latest industry trends, including CVA programming, digital tools and new technologies.
Experience in the design and implementation of humanitarian assistance programs.
Knowledge of Sphere standards and other training in humanitarian response preferred.
Experience living and working in humanitarian settings is a plus.
English fluency required. French or Arabic a plus.
Willingness and ability to travel frequently to Mercy Corps project sites and field locations, including traveling to insecure environments, is required.
Success Factors
To be successful in this role, the senior advisor will demonstrate significant experience managing programs in the field, further enhancing their ability to adjust technical theories to meet real world complexities. The individual should have the proven ability to influence donors, partners, and peer organizations toward innovative programs and best practices. Through significant experience managing all aspects of large or complex proposals, the individual will be able to advise and coach other Mercy Corps staff on how to adjust their methodology. The senior advisor must take a lead role in building and maintaining external relationships as well as demonstrating the drive and initiative to contribute to internal team efforts. All TSU positions require strong interpersonal and cross-cultural communication skills, and a level of emotional intelligence proficiency that quickly builds and maintains productive relationships across teams. Being aware and sensitive to international development issues and diverse cultures is critical. The successful person will be skilled at reducing complexities to clear and understandable non-technical terms.
Living Conditions / Environmental Conditions
The position is based in one of Mercy Corps’ locations and requires up to 40% travel to support country programs, which may include travel to insecure locations where freedom of movement is limited and areas where amenities are limited. Housing for this role is in individual housing and staff will have access to good medical services and the living situation is of a high standard.
Ongoing Learning
In support of our belief that learning organizations are more effective, efficient and relevant to the communities we serve, we empower all team members to dedicate 5% of their time to learning activities that further their personal and/or professional growth and development
Diversity, Equity & Inclusion
Achieving our mission begins with how we build our team and work together. Through our commitment to enriching our organization with people of different origins, beliefs, backgrounds, and ways of thinking, we are better able to leverage the collective power of our teams and solve the world’s most complex challenges. We strive for a culture of trust and respect, where everyone contributes their perspectives and authentic selves, reaches their potential as individuals and teams, and collaborates to do the best work of their lives.
We recognize that diversity and inclusion is a journey, and we are committed to learning, listening and evolving to become more diverse, equitable and inclusive than we are today.
Equal Employment Opportunity
Mercy Corps is an equal opportunity employer that does not tolerate discrimination on any basis. We actively seek out diverse backgrounds, perspectives, and skills so that we can be collectively stronger and have sustained global impact.
We are committed to providing an environment of respect and psychological safety where equal employment opportunities are available to all. We do not engage in or tolerate discrimination on the basis of race, color, gender identity, gender expression, religion, age, sexual orientation, national or ethnic origin, disability (including HIV/AIDS status), marital status, military veteran status or any other protected group in the locations where we work.
Safeguarding & Ethics
Mercy Corps is committed to ensuring that all individuals we come into contact with through our work, whether team members, community members, program participants or others, are treated with respect and dignity. We are committed to the core principles regarding prevention of sexual exploitation and abuse laid out by the UN Secretary General and IASC. We will not tolerate child abuse, sexual exploitation, abuse, or harassment by or of our team members. As part of our commitment to a safe and inclusive work environment, team members are expected to conduct themselves in a professional manner, respect local laws and customs, and to adhere to Mercy Corps Code of Conduct Policies and values at all times. Team members are required to complete mandatory Code of Conduct elearning courses upon hire and on an annual basis.",767,Washington
93,IT SPECIALIST (PLCYPLN),US Defense Information Systems Agency,"Fort Meade, MD","$103,690 - $134,798 a year","Duties
Summary
This position is being recruited under 10 USC 1599f into the Cyber Excepted Service and does NOT convey eligibility to be converted to the Competitive Service. It has been identified as a position necessary to carry out and support the mission of the US Cyber Command.


It is in the Professional Work Category at the Full Performance Work Level within the CES Occupational Structure. It is located in the DISA MISSION PARTNER ENGAGEMENT OFFICE (INT RELS & FOR MIL SALES) BD9M3 at Fort Meade, MD.
Responsibilities
Serves as an International Portfolio Manager between the United States and assigned countries to promote information exchange to enhance multinational cooperation.
Supports DISA Technical Representatives for IT Standards in preparation and review of documents for the Command and Control Interoperability program assigned to their associated countries. Interacts with international defense partners.
Promotes and explains DISA's position on IT Standards, Foreign Military Sales, and methods to improve initiatives and participates in special studies and exercises designed to improve overall readiness.
Maintains current and detailed knowledge of interoperable IT standards development and implementation projects, R and D programs throughout the agency, and commercial standards developments and practices.
Applies a broad technical knowledge of Information Assurance systems, Tactical Data Link systems, and C2/C4 systems to support mission requirements.
Performs research, evaluations, and develops recommendations on special problems and follows such matters through to a satisfactory conclusion.
Prepares briefing books, trip books, read-ahead, issue papers, action and information memoranda and other documents for U.S. and international mission partner executive personnel.
Travel Required
Occasional travel - You may be expected to travel for this position.
Supervisory status
No
Promotion Potential
13
Job family (Series)
2210 Information Technology Management
Requirements

Requirements
Conditions of Employment
Must be a U.S. Citizen.
Males born after 12-31-59 must be registered or exempt from Selective Service.
This national security position, which may require access to classified information, requires a favorable suitability review and security clearance as a condition of employment. Failure to maintain security eligibility may result in termination.
Qualifications
In order to qualify for this position, you must meet the requirements described below.

Basic Requirements:
Attention to Detail - experience reviewing my own information technology-related work or data and have been responsible for reviewing the work of others to ensure accuracy, completeness, and consistency with standards.

Customer Service - developing and maintaining relationships with customers, anticipating and assessing the current and future information technology needs of customers, and developing or identifying information technology products or services that are tailored to meet customer needs.

Oral Communication - briefing senior-level management and IT staff on the status of information technology systems, projects, or daily operations, including the communication of complex technical information to a non-technical audience.

Problem Solving - identifying alternatives to address unique, highly complex, or sensitive information technology-related issues. I have anticipated information technology-related problems and have identified and evaluated potential sources of information to generate alternative solutions.

AND

Qualifying Experience:

To qualify at the GG-13, your resume must describe at least one year of experience that demonstrates the competencies necessary for immediate success in the position. Experience refers to any paid or unpaid experience, including volunteer work and Military service, that would be considered equivalent to work normally performed at the next lower grade level in the federal service. For this position, qualifying experience is defined as: developing and executing strategic IT communication (verbal and written), IT planning and organizational customer support and outreach.


Candidates must describe how they meet the qualifying experience and/or selective placement factor(s) within the body of their resume. All qualifications must be met within 30 days after the closing date of this announcement.
Education

There is no substitution of education for the qualifying experienceat the GG-13 grade level
Additional information
This position is in the Excepted Service and does NOT convey eligibility to be converted to the Competitive Service. It is being recruited under 10 U.S.C. 1599f into the Cyber Excepted Service (CES) personnel system.
If you are a current Federal Career/Career-Conditional employee, you will be placed on an Excepted appointment.
This appointment does not confer eligibility to be non-competitively converted to an appointment in the competitive service.
A three year trial period may be required if you have not previously completed a trial or probationary period in the excepted or competitive service.
Telework availability will be based upon the mission requirements and supervisory determination
Individuals tentatively selected for drug testing designated positions at the Defense Information Systems Agency will be required to submit to urinalysis for illegal drugs prior to appointment or placement.
We may use this announcement to fill additional vacancies within 90 days of the closing date.
Moving costs MAY be paid.
The Tax Cuts and Jobs Act of 2017 makes certain reimbursements/payments taxable. For information on these changes and the Relocation Income Tax Allowance (RITA), for which some appointees are eligible, click here.
Recruitment, relocation, or retention incentives MAY be authorized.
The Department of Defense (DoD) policy on employment of annuitants issued March 18, 2004 will be used in determining eligibility of annuitants. It applies to former Federal civilian employees receiving a retirement annuity from the Civil Service Retirement and Disability Fund that are hired within the DoD on or after November 24, 2003. The policy also applies to annuitants (appointed in DoD on/or after November 24, 2003) who move from one position to another within DoD through voluntary reassignment, promotion, change to lower grade or transfer between military departments. Please see this policy here.
Because this position is in the Cyber Excepted Service, Veterans' Preference will be applied to preference eligible candidates, as defined by Section 2108 of the Title 5 U.S.C. in accordance with the procedures provided in DoD Instruction 1400.25, Volume 3005, ""CES Employment and Placement."" If you are a veteran claiming veteran's preference, as defined by Section 2108 of Title 5 U.S.C., you must submit documents verifying your eligibility with your application package.
For more information on the Cyber Excepted Service Personnel System, click here.
For more information on veterans' preference, click here.
For more information regarding qualifications requirements, click here.
If you are unable to apply online, view the following link for information regarding Alternate Application.


How You Will Be Evaluated
You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications above.
Once the application process is complete, a review of your resume and supporting documentation will be made and compared against your responses to the applicant questionnaire to determine if you are qualified for this job. If, after reviewing your resume and or supporting documentation, a determination is made that you have inflated your qualifications and or experience, you may lose consideration for this position. Please follow all instructions carefully. Errors or omissions may affect your rating.


You can preview the Questionnaire here:https://apply.usastaffing.gov/ViewQuestionnaire/11127668

Background checks and security clearance
Security clearance
Secret
Drug test required
No
Position sensitivity and risk
Noncritical-Sensitive (NCS)/Moderate Risk
Trust determination process
National security
Required Documents

Required Documents

FOR THIS JOB ANNOUNCEMENT THE FOLLOWING SUPPORTING DOCUMENTS ARE REQUIRED AS THEY APPLY STATED BELOW AND MUST BE RECEIVED BY THE CLOSE OF THE ANNOUNCEMENT. NOT ALL DOCUMENTS WILL APPLY TO EVERYONE.

Transcripts (if applicable) If you are substituting education for specialized experience you must submit all of your transcripts. The absence of this information will result in an ineligible rating.
SF-50 - (if applicable) Notification of Personnel Action for current or former federal employees- All applicants to include current agency employees must provide your most recent SF50 or the SF50 reflecting Career/Career-Conditional tenure and the highest grade held on a permanent basis.
Veterans Preference Documentation (if applicable): Candidates claiming Veterans Preference must submit a DD-214 (Member Copy 4), or, if you are CURRENTLY serving on active duty, a statement of service from your unit which states the date you entered on active duty, the date you are separating, and the campaign medals you have received. For those supplying the statement of service, preference will be verified by a DD-214 (Member Copy 4) upon separation from the military. Veterans with a service-connected disability must also submit a VA letter dated 1991 or later. DoD Components with CES positions apply Veterans' Preference to preference eligible candidates, as defined by Section 2108 of the Title 5 U.S.C. in accordance with the procedures provided in DoD Instruction 1400.25, Volume 3005, ""CES Employment and Placement.""
Military Spouse Preference (if applicable): Spousal Permanent Change of Station (PCS) orders, marriage certificate/license, and a MILITARY SPOUSE PPP SELF-CERTIFICATION CHECKLIST are required to claim Military Spouse Preference. The Military Spouse PPP Self-Certification Checklist can be found here: Military Spouse PPP Self-Certification Checklist .


Your complete Application Package (containing the above required documents) must be received no later than 11:59 pm Eastern Time on 06/14/2021.

WARNING: Failure to submit a complete application package including any required documentation by 11:59 PM (EST) on 06/14/2021, or at the time of application for announcements with an extended closing date, may result in an ineligible rating and loss of consideration. To verify that your application is complete, log into your USAJOBS account, select Application Status and More Information. The Details page will display the status of your application. It is the applicant's responsibility to verify that information entered, uploaded is received, legible and accurate. HR will not modify answers submitted by an applicant.
If you are relying on your education to meet qualification requirements:
Education must be accredited by an accrediting institution recognized by the U.S. Department of Education in order for it to be credited towards qualifications. Therefore, provide only the attendance and/or degrees from schools accredited by accrediting institutions recognized by the U.S. Department of Education.
Failure to provide all of the required information as stated in this vacancy announcement may result in an ineligible rating or may affect the overall rating.
Benefits

Benefits
A career with the U.S. Government provides employees with a comprehensive benefits package. As a federal employee, you and your family will have access to a range of benefits that are designed to make your federal career very rewarding. Opens in a new windowLearn more about federal benefits.
Review our benefits
Eligibility for benefits depends on the type of position you hold and whether your position is full-time, part-time, or intermittent. Contact the hiring agency for more information on the specific benefits offered.
Help
This job is open to
The public
U.S. citizens, nationals or those who owe allegiance to the U.S.
Clarification from the agency
Open to All U.S. Citizens",767,Washington
94,IT Specialist - Mid Level,National Reconnaissance Office (NRO),"Chantilly, VA 20151",None,"We Are the NRO
The NRO focuses on designing, building, launching, and maintaining America's intelligence satellites. Whether creating the latest innovations in satellite technology, contracting with the most cost-efficient industrial supplier, conducting rigorous launch schedules, or providing the highest-quality products to our customers, we never lose focus on who we are working to protect: our Nation and its Citizens.
Visit us at NRO.gov.
Position Overview
Do you enjoy designing, creating, and exploring possibilities? Do you have experience in Software Engineering, Information Technology, Computer Science, Cyber Security, or Networking? Does designing information technology systems to compliment complex and innovative overhead reconnaissance systems interest you?
If so, the National Reconnaissance Office (NRO) is looking for you!
The NRO Cadre is collecting resumes via a continuous announcement for consideration against current and future opportunities for mid-level IT Specialists (GG-11-GG-13).
Major Duties:
Mid-Level IT Specialists should have experience in applying IT principles, concepts, methods, and standards to accomplish assignments such as:
developing and interpreting policies, procedures, and strategies governing the planning and delivery of services throughout the agency
providing technical advice, guidance, and recommendations to management and other technical specialists on critical IT issues
applying new developments to previously unsolvable problems; and make decisions or recommendations that significantly influence important agency IT policies or programs.
Successful applicants will also have experience with one or more of the following:
interrelationships of multiple IT specialties
an organization’s IT architecture
new IT developments and applications
emerging technologies and their applications to business processes
IT security concepts, standards, and methods
project management principles, methods, and practices, including developing plans and schedules, estimating resource requirements, defining milestones and deliverables, monitoring activities, and evaluating and reporting on accomplishments
This is a broad announcement that requires specialty in one or more of the following specialized areas:
Software Engineer/Applications Developer:
Serves as a software engineer/ applications developer and consultant, managing and directing multiple highly complex and innovative IT projects and initiatives. This includes translating technical specifications into programming specifications; developing, customizing, and/or acquiring applications software programs; and testing, debugging, and maintaining software program.
Project Leadership:
Provides expert technical advice, leadership, and direction on all software engineering related issues for the improvement of the product. Determines project objectives and sets priorities; anticipates potential threats and opportunities. Provides expert leadership and guidance in how to use user research findings to influence software product development. Establishes a shared understanding across team members and stakeholders.
Leads, coordinates, communicates, integrates and is accountable for the overall success of the program, ensuring alignment with critical agency priorities.
Leadership to Ad Hoc Teams:
Leads cross functional teams at scale or in highly complex environments to develop innovative software and/or services. Focuses team efforts towards current goals and priorities.
Plans, develops, and executes large scale IT projects that transform the manner in which work is accomplished. Determines the size, skills, and roles necessary for an ad hoc team to deliver a product and identifies appropriate team members.
Relationship Management:
Serves as a liaison to high-ranking stakeholders within GSA and customer agencies to convey information regarding Agile Technology Program activities, policies and goals; to clarify procedures; and to interpret directives as needed.
Works closely with customer agencies in senior leadership roles and navigates conflicting priorities from senior stakeholders or in complex environments. Reinforces, upholds, and advocates core principles for building IT services, including building in the open, developing software using agile and lean methodologies, and using user-centered design methods.
Qualifying experience may have been acquired in any public or private sector job, but will clearly demonstrate past experience in the application of the particular competencies/knowledge, skills, and abilities necessary to successfully perform and is typically in or directly related to the duties of the position as described above. Experience must be reflected in your resume.
Other Position Requirements:
Overtime Statement: May be required to work other than normal duty hours, which may include evenings, weekends, and/or holidays.
Travel Statement: May be required to travel in military or commercial aircraft to perform temporary duty assignments.
Financial Disclosure: Required to file an OGE Form 450, Confidential Financial Disclosure Report, upon appointment and will be required to file annually.
You may be required to obtain a CISM or CISSP certification within 6 months of being appointed to the position IAW Cyber Workforce Requirements outlined in DoDI 8500.01.
Position selectee may be selected for a Defense Acquisition Workforce Improvement Act (DAWIA) coded position. If so, the selectee must meet appropriate certification requirements IAW the Defense Acquisition Workforce Improvement Act (DAWIA) no later than 24 months after accepting the position. Individual shall maintain, at a minimum 80 continuous Learning Points every 24 months via the services acquisition management system. DAWIA requirements may be located at the Defense Acquisition University website.
Basic Eligibility for a position with NRO:
U.S. Citizenship is required
You must be able to obtain and maintain a TS/SCI security clearance
You will be subject to pre-employment and periodic drug testing
You will be subject to pre-employment and periodic polygraph examinations
Location
Washington, DC area.
Salary
2021 salary range for the Washington, DC area:
GG-11 = $72,750 - $94,581.
GG-13 = $103,690 - 134,798.
**This position is a Full-Performance DCIPS position. The NRO is accepting applications from U.S. Citizens and current GS/GG-11-13 or equivalent Federal Government employees for this position. Federal government employees, who are currently at a GS/GG-11-13 or equivalent level may ONLY apply for a lateral reassignment at their current grade level and step. Federal applicants who exceed the advertised grade may voluntarily request acceptance at the lower grade per IAW DoDI 1400.25 Volume 2006.
Hiring Incentives
The NRO may offer hiring incentives and other entitlements at management’s discretion.
Trial Period
All new DCIPS employees will be required to serve a 2-year trial period.
Veterans’ Preference
DoD Components with DCIPS positions apply Veterans’ Preference to preference eligible candidates as defined by Section 2108 of Title 5 USC, in accordance with the procedures provided in DoD Instruction 1400.25, Vol 2005, DCIPS Employment and Placement. If you are a veteran claiming veterans’ preference, as defined by section 2108 of Title 5 USC, you must submit documents verifying your eligibility with your application package.
Equal Employment Opportunity Policy
The United States Government does not discriminate in employment on the basis of race, color, religion, sex (including pregnancy and gender identity), national origin, political affiliation, sexual orientation, marital status, disability, genetic information, age, membership in an employee organization, retaliation, parental status, military service, or other non-merit factor.
Equal Employment Opportunity (EEO) for federal employees & job applicants
Reasonable Accommodation Policy
Federal agencies must provide reasonable accommodation to applicants with disabilities where appropriate. Applicants requiring reasonable accommodation for any part of the application process should follow the instructions in the job opportunity announcement. For any part of the remaining hiring process, applicants should contact the hiring agency directly. Determinations on requests for reasonable accommodation will be made on a case-by-case basis.
A reasonable accommodation is any change to a job, the work environment, or the way things are usually done that enables an individual with a disability to apply for a job, perform job duties or receive equal access to job benefits.
Under the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, federal agencies must provide reasonable accommodations when:
An applicant with a disability needs an accommodation to have an equal opportunity to apply for a job.
An employee with a disability needs an accommodation to perform the essential job duties or to gain access to the workplace.
An employee with a disability needs an accommodation to receive equal access to benefits, such as details, training, and office-sponsored events.
You can request a reasonable accommodation at any time during the application or hiring process or while on the job. Requests are considered on a case-by-case basis.
Privacy Act Notice
Privacy Act Notice (PL 93-579): We use this information to determine qualifications for employment. This is authorized under Title 5 U.S.C. 3302 and 3361.
Read more about the Privacy Act of 1974
kOUxSK97KV",767,Washington
95,Senior IT Audit and Compliance Specialist,Deloitte,"Arlington, VA",None,"Are you looking to elevate your cyber career? Your technical skills? Your opportunity for growth? Deloitte's Government and Public Services Cyber Practice (GPS Cyber Practice) is the place for you! Our GPS Cyber Practice helps organizations create a cyber minded culture and become stronger, faster, and more innovative. You will become part of a team that advises, implements, and manages solutions across five verticals: Strategy, Defense and Response; Identity; Infrastructure; Data; and Application Security. Our dynamic team offers opportunities to work with cutting-edge cyber security tools and grow both vertically and horizontally at an accelerated rate. Join our cyber team and elevate your career.
Work you'll do
Implement risk management programs for our federal clients by utilizing NIST, RMF, and FISMA compliance frameworks.
Enhance cyber awareness with clients and project teams.
Work alongside federal clients to help them mitigate risk with the use of continuous monitoring and incident response.
Establish security controls to ensure protection of client systems.
Implement cutting edge security tools for our federal clients.
Support the team with audit and oversight related activities to include but not limited to responding to inquiries and requests for artifacts in a timely manner, tracking of communications and artifacts, analyzing findings and reports and providing input to Client responses, tracking recommendations and findings and contributing analysis and support to resolution of findings.
Advise the Cybersecurity team on pertinent developments in federal information security policy as it pertains to the Client to include monitoring and staying abreast of applicable Cybersecurity statues, regulations, and federal doctrine.

The team
Deloitte's Government and Public Services (GPS) practice - our people, ideas, technology and outcomes-is designed for impact. Serving federal, state, & local government clients as well as public higher education institutions, our team of more than 15,000 professionals brings fresh perspective to help clients anticipate disruption, reimagine the possible, and fulfill their mission promise.
At Deloitte, we believe cyber is about starting things-not stopping them-and enabling the freedom to create a more secure future. Cyber Strategy, Defense and Response (SDR) focuses on helping federal clients design and implement transformational enterprise security programs with an emphasis on defending against, recovering from, and mitigating major cyberattacks. If you're seeking a career that increases cyber awareness, utilizes risk management programs, and develops strategies for cyber defense and response, then the Cyber SDR offering at Deloitte is for you.
Qualifications
Required:

Bachelor's degree required
Must be legally authorized to work in the United States without the need for employer sponsorship, now or at any time in the future
Must be able to obtain and maintain the required clearance for this role
Experience working with RMF and NIST 800-53
Experience working with cyber security tools
Experience with cyber awareness (e.g., phishing emails, cyber trainings)
Experience in FISMA related audits and compliance

Preferred:

Prior professional services or federal consulting experience
Certifications (e.g., CompTIA Security+, CEH, CISSP)

How you'll grow
At Deloitte, our professional development plan focuses on helping people at every level of their career to identify and use their strengths to do their best work every day. From entry-level employees to senior leaders, we believe there's always room to learn. We offer opportunities to help sharpen skills in addition to hands-on experience in the global, fast-changing business world. From on-the-job learning experiences to formal development programs, our professionals have a variety of opportunities to continue to grow throughout their career.",767,Washington
96,Hardware Technician / Service Desk Specialist (All Levels),Leidos,"Fort Belvoir, VA 22060",None,"Description
Job Description:
Leidos is seeking candidates for exciting career opportunities. Leidos is a FORTUNE 500 company bringing a mix of innovative technology and sector expertise to customers in the Defense, Civil, Intelligence, and Health Industries. We solve our customers' mission-critical problems with innovative applications of technology and expertise.
Leidos is currently looking for Hardware Technicians and Service Desk Specialists in support of an upcoming defense contract. We are looking for all levels of experience including Associate, Intermediate and Senior level candidates.
The ideal candidate will participate in IT equipment repair, maintenance and operations to ensure that the site’s information technology infrastructure is operating securely, reliably and efficiently.
Basic Qualifications
Candidates must have:
Active TS/SCI clearance.
Bachelor's degree from an accredited college/university or equivalent experience and skills as required for Associate, Intermediate and Senior levels.
Certification that meets a minimum of IAT Level II such as:
Comp TIA Network+ CE
Cisco Certified Network Associate (CCNA)-Security, or
ISC2 Systems Security Certified Practitioner (SSCP)
Some positions may also require Computing Environment Certifications such as MCSA: Windows Server 2016 or Microsoft 365 Certified: Modern Desktop Administrator Associate or Microsoft 365 Certified: Security Administrator Associate
External Referral Bonus:
Potential for Telework:
Clearance Level Required:
Travel:
Scheduled Weekly Hours:
40
Shift:
Requisition Category:
Job Family:
Hardware
Pay Range:",767,Washington
97,Security Control Assessor,System High Corporation,"Arlington, VA 22203 (Bluemont area)",None,"The Security Control Assessor must fulfill a variety of cybersecurity functions, to include: System Administrator, Enterprise Oversight, certification and accreditation, SAP and SCI assessment and authorization (A&A) , Platform Information Technology (PIT) assessment and authorization, Information Assurance and Technical Security for AIS, Information Technology (IT) Network Administration & Support, and Information System Security Officer support. Will perform the IA tasks necessary to ensure that the existing DARPA IA program meets National, DoD, and DARPA IA standards, and continues to protect and defend DARPA information and Information Systems (IS) by ensuring the confidentiality integrity, availability, authentication, and non-repudiation of the systems.
The Senior Cybersecurity Specialist possesses experience in successfully participating in DoD Special Access Program Joint Certification and Accreditation, Assessment, and Approval events for DoD Joint cyber ranges and/or jointly accredited SAP information systems. The DARPA systems to be protected include systems that process and store information from controlled unclassified (CUI) up to Top Secret, including SAP and SCI caveats/compartments.
Duties include, but are not limited to:
Must possess experience in successfully meeting and participating in Defense Information System Agency (DISA), National Security Agency, and USCBYERCOM Computer Network Defense Program (CNDSP) and CBYERCOM Computer Readiness Inspections (CCRI)
Experience with network security devices, classified Local Area Networks, Wide Area Networks, public key infrastructure (PKI), virtual machines, and end-point security solutions.
Ensure system security requirements are addressed during all phases of DARPA program life cycles (concept development, Request for Information (RFI), Request for Proposal (RFP) or BAA, Proposal, Selection, Award, Closeout, Transition, etc.).
Planning, preparing, and executing inspections, authorization and approval (A&A) events IAW with the respective policies detailed in paragraph 3.12.c. for all classifications of networks; to include the development and review of Automated Information System Authorization and Approval Packages.
Develop, review, endorse, and recommend action by the authorizing official (AO), delegated authorizing official (DAO), or designated approval authority (DAA) for system certification documentation
Conduct security control assessments for the evaluation of security controls to determine the extent to which the controls are implemented correctly, operating as intended, and producing the desired outcome with respect to meeting the security requirements for an AIS
Provide an assessment of the severity of weaknesses or deficiencies discovered in the information system and its environment of operation and recommend corrective actions to address identified vulnerabilities
Analyze and make recommendations in support of DARPA accredited network Configuration Control Board cases within 10 calendar days of case validation by the respective network’s Information System owner
Monitor activities of DARPA accredited networks and DARPA DAO Accredited performer networks
Provide advice, assistance, and analysis of threats and vulnerabilities and risk mitigation and acceptance recommendations, as required. Conduct certification tests that include verification that the features and assurances are functional and support accreditation
Review and recommend changes or amplification of policy, procedures, and strategy development
Evaluate Information Assurance (IA) products and provide written recommendations as to their risk and usefulness and/or adoption for the DARPA IA mission
Evaluate information technology (IT) vulnerabilities to assess whether additional safeguards are prudent and ensure certification is accomplished for each information system
Develop and maintain a formal, written Information Systems Security Program SOP
Ensure all Information System Security Officers (ISSO), network administrators, and other Automated Information Security (AIS) personnel, to include DARPA performers performing these functions, receive the necessary and required technical and security training to carry out their duties
Ensure development and implementation of an information security education, training, and awareness program, to include attending, monitoring, and presenting local AIS security training.
Maintain a repository for all system certification/accreditation documentation and modifications
Coordinate AIS security inspections, tests, and reviews
Prepare policies and procedures for responding to security incidents and for investigating and reporting security violations and incidents
Ensure proper protection or corrective measures have been taken when an incident or vulnerability has been discovered
Assess changes in a system, its environment, or operational needs that could affect the accreditation
Ensure configuration management (CM) for security-relevant AIS software, hardware, and firmware is maintained and documented
Perform system audits on multiple systems; work closely with system administrators and ensure current security measures are sufficient and in compliance with approved policies and processes
Perform, and conduct training as required, for the execution of secure file transfers/trusted downloads between local systems to storage devices, this includes secure down writing of data between systems of different security levels
Provide technical advice and assistance, as required, and perform technical oversight on telecommunications requirements for Collateral, SAP, and SCI systems and networks
In coordination with SID Emergency Management, review and provide AIS security relevant input to DARPA Emergency/Disaster plans and procedures.

Required Skills (Knowledge, Skills, Abilities)
Relevant work experience as specified for an Information Assurance Technical (IAT) Level III or Information Assurance Management (IAM) Level II in DoD Manual 8570.1-M
Extensive knowledge of RMF (Risk Management Framework)
Experience assessing and authorizing various PIT systems (of all classification levels) including but not limited to; space systems, manned and unmanned aircraft systems, manned and unmanned underwater vessels, cyber operation platforms, cyber capabilities, directed energy systems, and hand-held battle field orientation electronic devices

Professional Business Functions
Attend meetings (either locally or out-of-area) and create meeting summaries or trip reports
Prepare and submit meeting minutes on an as-required basis
Prepare/present briefings, incorporating graphics (if appropriate) for/to SID/ DARPA leaders
Prepare various security forms associated with their duties
Assist in entry control and perform escort duties for visitors
Answer telephones and other modes of administrative communications in the performance of duties
Perform self-inspections, identify security discrepancies, and report security incidents
Perform, or support, security inspections, identify security discrepancies and prepare reports
Perform courier duties within the continental United States (CONUS)
Perform user-level security administrator and information security responsibilities are required and in compliance with US Codes, Executive Orders, and DoD and DARPA policy
Perform objective reviews on all documentation encountered during performance of duties

Years of Experience/Education Requirements
The Senior Cybersecurity positions require a Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science or Information Systems with at least 12 years of specific, demonstrable, and successful experience fulfilling a Cybersecurity role for a DoD or IC customer on similar size and scale.
A Master’s degree in Computer Science or Information Systems may substitute for 4 years of relevant experience.

Certification Requirements
DoD Approved Baseline Certification as a CISSP IAW DoD 8570.1-M

Travel Requirements
Some travel is required for this position.
Ability to travel to CONUS and/or OCONUS locations
Must have active US passport for OCONUS travel requirements

Additional Information
This job description is not designed to cover or contain all job duties required of the employee. There may be additional activities, duties and/or responsibilities that are required for this position that are not listed in this job description.
In compliance with federal law, all persons hired will be required to verify identity and eligibility to work in the United States and to complete the required employment eligibility verification document form upon hire.
System High is a Military friendly employer. Our extensive work on behalf of the U.S. government offers those who have served in uniform an opportunity to continue to serve their country in a new and exciting way while enjoying a successful civilian career.
System High Corporation is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We consider applicants without regard to race, color, religion, age, national origin, ancestry, ethnicity, gender, gender identity, gender expression, sexual orientation, marital status, veteran status, disability, genetic information, citizenship status, or membership in any other group protected by federal, state or local law. EEO is the Law",767,Washington
98,Staff Simulation Test Specialist,Collins Aerospace,"Sterling, VA 20164",None,"Businesses Collins Aerospace
Job ID 01424447
Date posted 03/17/2021
City Sterling
State Virginia
Country United States
Date Posted:
2021-03-17-07:00
Country:
United States of America
Location:
HVA34: Sterling, VA 22640 Davis Dr , Sterling, VA, 20164-7104 USA
Do you want to be a part of something bigger? A team whose impact stretches across the world, and even beyond? At Collins Aerospace, our Mission Systems team helps civilian, military and government customers complete their most complex missions — whatever and wherever they may be. Our customers depend on us for intelligent and secure communications, missionized systems for specialized aircraft and spacecraft and collaborative space solutions. By joining our team, you’ll have your own critical part to play in ensuring our customer succeeds today while anticipating their needs for tomorrow. Are you up for the challenge? Join our mission today.
Staff Simulation Test Specialist - Flight Simulation
Test Specialist: This engineering position is within the Simulation and Training Solutions (STS) business area. STS develops and builds simulators and training systems for both military and commercial customers. Devices range from desktop training all the way up to high fidelity weapon system and full-flight training systems; including visual, motion and simulator interoperability (HLA/DIS).
This position is responsible for performing assignments requiring installation and testing of Collins Aerospace Simulation and Training Devices. The primary functions are to direct or perform; installation, operational checkout, and system test both in house and on site as required in accordance with Collins Aerospace and customer requirements. Typically required to act as on site lead for major field installation or modification programs. Services are performed using Collins approved methods and workmanship standards to ensure optimum equipment operation and customer satisfaction. The Simulation Test Specialist supports equipment and systems of high complexity and advanced technology.
Job Responsibilities:
Provide technical support to field engineers, technicians and product support who are diagnosing, troubleshooting, repairing and debugging complex electro/mechanical equipment, computer systems, and/or complex software not related to information technology.
Installs, operates, maintains, repairs and modifies equipment. Normally receives little instructions on day-to-day work, general instructions on new assignments.
Participates in determining objectives of assignment. Plans schedules and arranges own activities in accomplishing objectives. Work is reviewed upon completion.
Networks with senior internal and external personnel in own area of expertise.
Represents organization as a prime contact on contracts or projects. Interacts with senior internal and external personnel on significant matters often requiring coordination between organizations.
Conducts technical analysis/test of product implementations, modifications and enhancements to product in accordance with specific customer specifications and implementations.
Identifies technical problems and issues, recommends technical solution in accordance with product and customer specifications, and recommends actions to company or customer representatives for coordinative product solution.
Involved in planning and preparing customer installation and testing. Prepares, provides approval and validation of product test procedures.
Reports design, reliability and maintenance problems or bugs to design engineering/software engineering.
Serves as company liaison with customer on formal test phases for assigned projects
Installs and tests software releases on fielded systems, including training local maintenance/operations personnel on new features included in the release
Basic Qualifications:
This position requires a Bachelor’s degree in the appropriate discipline and 7 years of relevant experience or an Advanced degree in the appropriate discipline and 5 years of relevant experience. In the absence of a degree, 11 years of relevant experience is required.
Must be a U.S. Citizen
Must have or be capable of obtaining a US Department of Defense (DoD) security clearance. Candidate selected will be subject to a government security investigation/reinstatement and must meet eligibility requirements
This position will require a minimum of 25% travel.
Experience with aircraft maintenance or operations and/or simulator operations/maintenance on E2 C/D, B52 or other military aircraft is highly desired.
Experience as a military or commercial pilot is also desirable.
Diversity drives innovation; inclusion drives success.We believe a multitude of approaches and ideas enable us to deliver the best results for our workforce, workplace, and customers. We are committed to fostering a culture where all employees can share their passions and ideas so we can tackle the toughest challenges in our industry and pave new paths to limitless possibility.
Some of our competitive benefits package includes:
Medical, dental, and vision insurance
Three weeks of vacation for newly hired employees
Generous 401(k) plan that includes employer matching funds and separate employer retirement contribution, including a Lifetime Income Strategy option
Tuition reimbursement
Life insurance and disability coverage
Optional coverages you can buy: Pet Insurance, Home and Auto, additional life insurance, accident insurance, criticalillness insurance, group legal
Ovia Health, fertility and family planning
Employee Assistance Plan, including up to 5 free counseling sessions
Redbrick - Incentives for a Healthy You
Autism Benefit
Doctor on Demand, virtual doctor visits
Adoption Assistance
Best Doctors, second opinion program
 And more!
Nothing matters more to Collins Aerospace than our strong ethical and safety commitments. As such, all U.S. positions require a background check, which may include a drug screen.
At Collins, the paths we pave together lead to limitless possibility. And the bonds we form – with our customers and with each other - propel us all higher, again and again.
Apply now and be part of the team that’s redefining aerospace, every day.
Raytheon Technologies is An Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability or veteran status, age or any other federally protected class.
Privacy Policy and Terms:
Click on this link to read the Policy and Terms",767,Washington
99,Jr. Program Support Specialist HSEP3,Avantus Federal,"Arlington, VA",None,"Company Overview:

Avantus Federal, a NewSpring Holdings Company, is a mission-focused services and solutions company headquartered in McLean, VA. Drawing upon its heritage companies’ histories of consistent growth and high performance in the federal services market, Avantus ensures eminence is earned, sustained and grown.
Avantus’ services and solutions are designed, tailored, and executed based on our long history of helping our Homeland Security, Defense, Intelligence, and Federal Civilian customers solve complex challenges. Our capabilities include Project & Portfolio Management, Facilities, Acquisition & Sustainment, Systems Engineering Technical Services, Operations & Analysis, Transformation & Advisory Services, Data & Software Solutions, Digital Innovation, and Augmented Intelligence.
Position Overview:

Avantus Federal is seeking a Program Coordination Specialist to support a federal cybersecurity client. This position may be located at either the client site in Arlington, VA or at Avantus offices in McLean, VA.
Responsibilities:
Assisting the Government in the day-to-day coordination of mission support and office operations necessary to support the Division/Sub-Division including: office management activities, information technology coordination, training logistics emergency planning, files management, and general administrative support.Assisting in responding to periodic and ad hoc requests for information.Provide scheduling assistance to senior staff members.Drafting support documentation as necessary to support the continued success and sustainment of CSD operations, including but not limited to Standard Operating Procedures, templates, analyst guides, training documentation, product catalogues, metadata processes and procedures, and metadata.Providing technical writing, proofreading, and production of materials, including integrating various source documents into a cohesive product which may be delivered as computer-based graphical and narrative presentation material to all levels of management.Schedule conference rooms and teleconferences as necessary.
Required Qualifications:
Bachelors degree and 2+ years of experience.
Superior time management, organization, and prioritization skills.
Ability to focus on details and must have strong proofreading skills.
Knowledge of Microsoft Office products, including MS Project.
Familiar with federal strategic planning processes including GPRA
Must hold a Top Secret clearance.
Preferred Qualifications:
Experience supporting federal clients.
Experience with Jira.
Active TS/SCI
Company EEO Statement:

Avantus Federal is an equal opportunity employer and Vietnam Era Veterans Readjustment Assistance Act (VEVRAA) federal contractor. All qualified applicants receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, national origin, age, sexual orientation, gender identity, protected veteran status, status as a qualified individual with a disability, or any other category protected by law. Avantus hires and promotes individuals solely on the basis of their qualifications for the job to be filled.",767,Washington
100,Network Intrusion Detection Specialist,Peterson Technologies,"Elkridge, MD 21075","$140,000 - $150,000 a year","Network Intrusion Detection SpecialistProvides advisory services in terms of Computer Network Defense (CND) analysis supporting active security monitoring missions. Identifies, evaluates and recommends new opportunities for active/holistic defense against adversarial activities based on vulnerability information to protect agency networks, devices and information.Assesses and advises of risk mitigation techniques, guidance and best practices in defending against the most critical cyber threats on a continuous basis. Analyzes and evaluates recommendations for system improvements, optimization, development and maintenance efforts in the following specialties: information systems, architecture, networking, telecommunications, automation, communications protocols, risk management/electronic analysis; software; life-cycle management, software development methodologies and modeling and simulation.Network Intrusion Detection Specialist shall possess the following capabilities:Identifies and documents triage data gaps in order to determine how to help posture on cyber-related issuesCollaborate with Government to discuss/resolve technical issuesInvestigate, develop and apply statistical methods, counterintelligence and computer forensic analysis techniquesPerform risk managementDiscover, characterize and assess anomalous network and platform activity on various information systemsProvide first instance threat actors analysis and reports to Enterprise Mission ElementsEvaluate and document identified cross-domain violations and submit findings for analysis and report generationSurvey network traffic for high priority malicious attacks, anomalous traffic or other incidents of interestProvide initial event analysis assessing risk and vulnerability implications for agency technologies and customersAdvise Information Systems Incident Response Team of risk mitigation measures and modifications to operational priorities based in vulnerability information.Advise of tools employment to discover new cyber threat actorsProvide cause and effect analysis of new/potential sources of unauthorized access to networks, databases and systems.Assess network topologies to understand data flows through networks and provide mechanisms to tip countermeasures.Provide reports detailing adversarial capabilities, exploits, cyber activity and vulnerabilities in addition to mitigation techniques and best practices in defeating threats.Provide reports detailing documentation for and briefs to Senior Government Officials.Investigate and advise of innovative solutions to threat-monitoring challenges; validate implementation of enterprise-level networking and security solutions in addressing challenges.Basic Qualifications:Eight (8) years experience and a Bachelor's degree in Network system engineering, programming languages, computer science or related field. A Masters or Doctoral (PhD) in Software Engineering, Computer Engineering, Computer Science or related field may be substituted for experience (Masters counts as 2 years, PHD counts as 4 years).Networking experience to include:Internet protocols (TCP/IP and IPSec)Computer Networks Theory and practicesNetwork SecurityThree (3) years experience with commercial, Government off-the-Shelf (GOTS) and /or Free and Open Source Software (FOSS) Intrusion Detection Systems and frameworksActive TS/SCI/FSP Security ClearancePeterson Technologies will provide reasonable accommodations to applicants who are unable to utilize our online application system due to a disability.Please send your request to 240-456-0092.Peterson Technologies is an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability status, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.Job Types: Full-time, ContractPay: $140,000.00 - $150,000.00 per yearBenefits:401(k)Dental insuranceDisability insuranceFlexible scheduleFlexible spending accountHealth insuranceHealth savings accountLife insurancePaid time offParental leaveProfessional development assistanceReferral programRetirement planTuition reimbursementVision insuranceSchedule:8 hour shiftMonday to FridayCOVID-19 considerations:Following CDC Guidelines as they become available.Education:Bachelor's (Preferred)Experience:Computer Network Defense: 8 years (Preferred)License/Certification:Active DoD Top Secret/Full Scope Poly Clearance (Required)Work Location:One locationWork Remotely:No",767,Washington
101,Supervisory IT Cybersecurity Specialist (PLCYPLN/INFOSEC),US Defense Technical Information Center,"Fort Belvoir, VA","$122,530 - $159,286 a year","Duties
Summary
The Defense Technical Information Center (DTIC) is the central facility for the acquisition, preservation, protection, retrieval, and dissemination of scientific and technical information (STI) supporting the Research and Engineering (R&E) needs of the Department of Defense (DoD), as well as federal and industry partners. DTIC provides leading edge information services and analysis products to the DoD community as a recognized leader in information and knowledge management innovations.
Responsibilities
As the DTIC-PD Division Chief, plan, direct and coordinate the activities of the Division. Formulate Division goals and priorities through discussion with Directorate leadership and subordinate team leaders.
Consults with other DTIC Directorates and offices whose work affects or is affected by the Division's work in order to coordinate plans and work schedules to meet the overall objectives.
Determines compliance with procedural and technical instructions and assess appropriate actions to correct deficiencies, authorizing changes as the situation demands to comply with DOD and Federal Information Technology policy guidance.
Serves as the Directorate technical expert for technologies and processes that fall within the Division's scope of responsibilities. Develops, maintains, and coordinates on procedures and policies for the Division and the Directorate.
Coordinates and directs Division resources for effective accomplishment of the DTIC mission. Develops staffing requirements and position descriptions based on operational needs, workloads and coverage.
Sets goals for work to be accomplished; schedules and assigns projects to achieve desired results; provides necessary guidance and assistance and reviews progress and status of work.
Travel Required
Occasional travel - You may be expected to travel for this position.
Supervisory status
Yes
Promotion Potential
None
Job family (Series)
2210 Information Technology Management
Requirements

Requirements
Conditions of Employment
Must be a U.S. Citizen.
Background investigation required.
Qualifications
Basic Requirement: Applicants must have IT-related experience demonstrating the following competencies appropriate to, or above, the level of this position. For vacancies below the full-performance level of the position, the basic requirement will be evaluated on a developmental basis. Your resume and work experience should clearly support your ability to meet these competencies and will be evaluated as part of the entire application process.

Attention to Detail - experience reviewing my own information technology-related work or data and have been responsible for reviewing the work of others to ensure accuracy, completeness, and consistency with standards
Customer Service - developing and maintaining relationships with customers, anticipating and assessing the current and future information technology needs of customers, and developing or identifying information technology products or services that are tailored to meet customer needs
Oral Communication - briefing senior-level management and IT staff on the status of information technology systems, projects, or daily operations, including the communication of complex technical information to a non-technical audience
Problem Solving -identifying alternatives to address unique, highly complex, or sensitive information technology-related issues. I have anticipated information technology-related problems and have identified and evaluated potential sources of information to generate alternative solutions

In addition to meeting the basic requirement, qualified applicants must possess: One year of specialized experience equivalent in level of difficulty and responsibility to that of the next lower grade, GS-13, within the federal service, which demonstrates the ability to perform the duties of the position, is required.

Specialized experience is defined as experience with information technology tools and solutions to support application program development. Experience coordinating information technology related projects; reconfiguration of existing hardware/software; and an understanding of connectivity capabilities across on-premises and Cloud support. Experience identifying technical issues and resolving critical problems in IT technologies to support strategic goals and objectives.

Volunteer Experience: Experience refers to paid and unpaid experience, including volunteer work done through National Service programs (e.g., Peace Corps, AmeriCorps) and other organizations (e.g., professional; philanthropic; religious; spiritual, community, student, social). Volunteer work helps build critical competencies, knowledge, and skills and can provide valuable training and experience that translates to paid employment. You will receive credit for all qualifying experience, including volunteer experience.
Education
Education is not substitutable for specialized experience for this grade level.
Additional information
These benefits generally apply if you are selected for a permanent or term appointment:

The Federal Employees Health Benefits (FEHB) Program has many plans to choose from, all at very reasonable rates, which can be paid from pre-tax income.

The Federal Employees Retirement System (FERS) is one of the premier retirement programs in the Nation. The program features three components: a retirement pension; the Thrift Savings Plan (TSP, an employee controlled investment program); and social security.

Federal Employee Group Life Insurance (FEGLI) offers numerous life insurance policy options covering federal employees and dependents.

For more benefits information please visit: http://www.opm.gov/employment_and_benefits/employeesupport2.asp

You must be a U.S. Citizen to qualify for this position.
A two year probationary period may be required.
This position is subject to completion of 1 year probationary period for assignment to a supervisory position.
Recruitment, relocation, or retention incentives MAY NOT be authorized.
This position is covered by the Department of Defense Directive 8140.01, Cyberspace Workforce Management, August 11, 2015. Applicants must possess IASAE Level I upon entry or must obtain all required certifications within six months of selection.
This is an acquisition position in the DAWIA career field for Program management (PM). Selectee must meet Acquisition Corps requirements or have an approved waiver prior to or concurrent with placement in this position. Selectee must attain Level III Certification (or be eligible for certification within 24 months of appointment) in the PM career field.
Males born after 12-31-59 must be registered or exempt from Selective Service
Interagency Career Transition Assistance Program (ICTAP): To be well-qualified and exercise selection priority for this vacancy, displaced Federal employees must be rated at 90 or above on the rating criteria for this position.
This position is subject to the limitations imposed by the DOD Priority Placement Program.
The Department of Defense (DoD) policy on employment of annuitants issued March 18, 2004 will be used in determining eligibility of annuitants. It is applicable to former Federal civilian employees receiving a retirement annuity from the Civil Service Retirement and Disability Fund that are hired within the DoD on or after November 24, 2003. The policy also applies to annuitants (appointed in DoD on/or after November 24, 2003) who move from one position to another within DoD through voluntary reassignment, promotion, change to lower grade or transfer between military departments. The view this policy, please copy and paste the following web address into your web browser: https://www.esd.whs.mil/Portals/54/Documents/DD/issuances/140025/1400.25-V300.pdf.
Background or Security Investigation: The individual selected will be subject to an investigation in conjunction with granting of a security clearance prior to appointment. Selectee must be able to obtain and maintain a Top Secret security clearance.
If you are unable to apply online, view the following link for information regarding Alternate Application.


How You Will Be Evaluated
You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications above.
Once the application process is complete, a review of your resume and supporting documentation will be made and compared against your responses to the assessment questionnaire to determine if you are qualified for this job. The numeric rating you receive is based on your responses to the questionnaire. The score is a measure of the degree to which your background matches the knowledge, skills, and abilities required for this position. If, after reviewing your resume and or supporting documentation, a determination is made that you have inflated your qualifications and or experience, you may lose consideration for this position. Please follow all instructions carefully. Errors or omissions may affect your rating.

The Assessment Questionnaire takes approximately 15 minutes to complete and collects information on your education, training and experience related to the following critical competencies:

Communication
Information Technology Policy and Planning
Leadership
Project Management

You can preview the Assessment Questionnaire here: https://apply.usastaffing.gov/ViewQuestionnaire/11130955

Background checks and security clearance
Security clearance
Top Secret
Drug test required
No
Required Documents

Required Documents
FOR THIS JOB ANNOUNCEMENT THE FOLLOWING SUPPORTING DOCUMENTS ARE REQUIRED AS THEY APPLY STATED BELOW AND MUST BE RECEIVED BY THE CLOSE OF THE ANNOUNCEMENT.

1. Notification of Personnel Action (SF-50) (If applicable):
Notification of Personnel Action for current or former federal employees - with the exception of current permanent DTIC employees, please provide your most recent SF50 or the SF50 reflecting Career/Career-Conditional tenure and the highest grade held on a permanent basis.
If claiming ""DoD Education Exemption"" (Grandfathered) you must also provide SF50's dated prior to October 1, 2000 showing that you have been continuously employed with DoD with no break in service since October 1, 2000.
2. Veterans Preference Documentation (If applicable):
For Five Point Veterans Preference: DD-214 (Member Copy 4), or, if you are CURRENTLY serving on active duty, a statement of service from your unit which states the date you entered on active duty, the date you are separating, and the campaign medals you have received. For those supplying the statement of service, preference will be verified by a DD-214 (Member Copy 4) upon separation from the military.
For Ten Point Veterans Preference: DD-214 (Member Copy 4). Veterans with a service-connected disability must also submit a VA letter dated 1991 or later.
3. ICTAP Eligible (if applicable) - A copy of the RIF separation notice and SF50 if available.
4. Military Spouse Preference (MSP) - Spousal Travel Orders/Permanent Change of Station(PCS) Orders, Marriage Certificate, and Military Spouse Preference Self Certification checklist
5. Cover letter: You may submit a cover letter which will be forwarded to the selecting official with your resume. Your cover letter will not be used to verify your qualifications or eligibility.

Your complete Application Package (containing the above required documents) must be received no later than 11:59 pm Eastern Time on the announcement closing date.

WARNING: Failure to submit a complete application package including any required documentation by 11:59 PM (EST) on 06/25/2021, or at the time of application for announcements with an extended closing date, may result in an ineligible rating and loss of consideration. To verify that your application is complete, log into your USAJOBS account, select Application Status and More Information. The Details page will display the status of your application. It is the applicant's responsibility to verify that information entered, uploaded, or faxed is received, legible and accurate. HR will not modify answers submitted by an applicant.
If you are relying on your education to meet qualification requirements:
Education must be accredited by an accrediting institution recognized by the U.S. Department of Education in order for it to be credited towards qualifications. Therefore, provide only the attendance and/or degrees from schools accredited by accrediting institutions recognized by the U.S. Department of Education.
Failure to provide all of the required information as stated in this vacancy announcement may result in an ineligible rating or may affect the overall rating.
Benefits

Benefits
Review our benefits
Help
This job is open to
The public
U.S. citizens, nationals or those who owe allegiance to the U.S.
Clarification from the agency
U.S. Citizens",767,Washington
102,Senior Cyber Security Specialist - Clearance Required,Logistics Management Institute,"Fort Belvoir, VA 22060",None,"Overview:

LMI is seeking a senior cyber security specialist to support the development of infrastructure network installation projects. The position will be located at the client site in Ft. Belvoir, VA with the ability to travel up to 25%.
LMI is a private government consulting firm, dedicated exclusively to advancing the management of the government. As a not-for-profit company, we deliver the best value for the government dollar as all revenues are directed to our mission of advancing government rather than to delivering shareholder value. We operate completely free of political and commercial bias, and we are entirely aligned with the goals of our clients. Our clients value our not-for-profit status and specialized services in logistics, intelligence, homeland security, health care, and energy and environment markets. We believe government can make a difference, and we seek talented, hardworking people who share that conviction.
We offer a generous compensation package with excellent benefits that start the first day of employment. Business casual dress, flex time, and tuition reimbursement are a few of our many work-life benefits available to our employees.
Responsibilities:

Responsibilities may include:
Ensure that each engineering design incorporates IA criteria using applicable Army Regulations (ARs), DoD regulations, and DISA STIGs.
Ensure that each system is developed using a cyber-resilient and robust system design, and compliant baseline configuration for every type of device comprising the system.
Resolve and identify complex cyber security issues and problems.
Resolve and identify complex information assurance issues and problems
Prepare briefings on cyber security / IAs issues to be given to leadership / management.
Enforce appropriate security policies and procedures.
Identify security risks and recommend areas for improvements.
Provide input to and analysis of proposed systems changes. This will include security inpacts, requirements and implications.
Provide assistance in network security implementation, including preparation and oversight of the execution of policies and procedures to ensure the continuous security governments architectures
Provide assistance in the oversight to ensure implemented security safeguards are adequate to assure the integrity, availability, and confidentiality of the information being processed, transmitted, or stored are consistent with the level of sensitivity of that information
Qualifications:

MINIMUM REQUIREMENTS:
Bachelors degree computer science or related field
8 + years work in cyber security / information assurance.
Demonstrated experience coordinating cyber security programs, security standards, procedures etc for the federal government
Demonstrated experience with the Army
Excellent analytical, problem solving, and presentation skills
Excellent customer relationship management skills
This position requires and active security clearance at the Secret level. You must be a US citizen.
PREFERRED EXPERIENCE/SKILLS:
Masters Degree preferred
CISSP, Security + or CISM certification
Demonstrated understanding of complex network environments
Understanding of Army acquisition process
EEO Statement:

LMI is an Equal Opportunity Employer” all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, or national origin.",767,Washington
103,Sr. IT Specialist (SYSANALYSIS),US Nuclear Regulatory Commission,"Rockville, MD","$122,530 - $159,286 a year","Duties
Summary
The position is located in the Office of the Chief Financial Officer (OCFO), Division of the Comptroller (DOC), Financial Systems Branch (FSB).

The supervisor is Jeffrey Sheldon.

The position is bargaining unit.

This position is not subject to Confidential Financial Disclosure reporting requirements.

Responsibilities
As a Sr. IT Specialist (SYSANALYSIS) you will be responsible for the following:

Performing and coordinating a wide range of system development life cycle and IT project management functions in support of developing and implementing major financial systems.

Performing needs analyses to define opportunities for new or improved business process solutions. Consulting with NRC customers of financial management IT systems to identify and specify requirements.

Providing advice and assistance in the interpretation of, and ensuring compliance with, all applicable Federal Financial Management regulations and governmental IT systems requirements.

Supporting and overseeing financial management systems implementation. Working independently with project managers within the branch to support implementation activities.
Travel Required
Not required
Supervisory status
No
Promotion Potential
14
Job family (Series)
2210 Information Technology Management
Requirements

Requirements
Conditions of Employment
U.S. Citizenship Required
This is a Drug Testing position.
Background investigation leading to a clearance is required for new hires.
You must meet the qualifications for these positions no later than 30 calendar days after the closing date of this announcement and before placement in the position.
Qualifications
In order to qualify for this position, you must have at least one year of specialized experience at the next lower grade level (GG-13) in the Federal Service or equivalent experience in the private or public sector.

Specialized experience is defined as experience that demonstrates an understanding of Federal financial management regulations and the impact on business procedures and IT financial systems; and the ability to apply analytical processes to the planning, design and implementation of new and improved information systems to meet the business requirements of customer organizations

The ideal candidate will be able to demonstrate the following:

Expert knowledge of and experience in applying IT principles and practices to perform technical audits, complex needs analyses, develop systems requirements, conduct feasibility studies, and plan system implementation.
Expert knowledge of and experience in IT financial system operations, IT project management, problem solving and workload prioritization.

Knowledge in the application of communicating information, ideas and advice in a clear, concise and logical manner, both orally and in writing.

Knowledge of a formal, modern software development life cycle methodology and IT system investment management.

Knowledge in the application of establishing and maintaining effective work relationships with all levels of personnel.
A description of how you possess the specialized experience, as well as how you meet the qualifications desired, should be addressed in your resume and additional space provided for supplemental response.
Education
This job does not have an education qualification requirement.
Additional information
The NRC provides reasonable accommodation to applicants with disabilities where appropriate. Individuals with disabilities may contact the Selective Placement Coordinator for assistance with the application or hiring process via Disability.Resource@nrc.gov. Deaf applicants may contact the Disability Program Manager by calling the NRC videophone at 240-428-3217.

Individuals who are eligible for non-competitive appointment under an OPM special appointing authority may apply for consideration under a comparable NRC non-competitive appointing authority. Veterans, please visit: http://www.fedshirevets.gov/

Selectee's will be required to complete a ""Declaration of Federal Employment"", (OF-306), prior to being appointed to determine their suitability for Federal employment and to authorize a background investigation. False statements or responses on your resume or questionnaire can jeopardize your employment opportunity and subject you to disciplinary action, including removal from Federal service.

A transferable security clearance from another agency or a background investigation leading to a clearance is required for all new hires. To begin work at the NRC without a security clearance, you must be granted a temporary waiver of the required clearance, referred to as a 145(b) waiver. To be eligible for a 145(b) waiver you will need a favorable education verification, reference, credit, and criminal history checks. If a wavier is granted, the successful completion of a background investigation and favorable adjudication is required for continued employment. If you have resided outside the U.S. for an extended period of time, the agency may not be able to (1) grant the 145(b) waiver where the required investigation cannot be completed in a timely manner, or (2) achieve timely completion of the background investigation required for a security clearance.

The NRC is a zero tolerance agency with respect to illegal drug use. Individuals selected for this position will be subject to pre-appointment drug testing unless currently in a NRC position subject to random drug testing AND will be subject to random drug testing upon appointment to the NRC.


How You Will Be Evaluated
You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications above.
When the application process is complete, your application will be reviewed to determine if you meet the job requirements. You will be rated based on the information provided in your resume and responses to any vacancy questions, if applicable, to determine your level of knowledge, skill and ability related to the job requirements. If you are among the top candidates for this position, your application will be referred to the hiring manager.

Your resume is the key means we have for evaluating your skills, knowledge, and abilities as they relate to this position. Therefore, we encourage you to submit a thorough resume that directly relates to this position.

To preview questions please click here.

Background checks and security clearance
Security clearance
L Access Authorization
Drug test required
Yes
Required Documents

Required Documents
List of supplemental material that may be applicable:

If you are a NRC employee you are required to submit your most recent Rating of Record (Performance Appraisal) or a statement saying that one is not available. You may do so either electronically, following the instructions below (preferred method), or by sending one copy by e-mail to Valanita.Morgan@nrc.gov.

If you are a current/reinstatement eligible Federal employee with status (Tenure Group 1 or 2), you will be considered under our merit promotion procedures and must submit a copy of your most recent SF-50 (Notification of Personnel Action) to verify competitive status or reinstatement eligibility.

If you are a Veteran claiming 5-point Veterans' Preference, you must submit a copy of your DD-214, Certificate of Release or Discharge from Active Duty, or other proof of eligibility. If you are a Veteran claiming 10-point Veterans' Preference, you must submit a SF-15, Application for 10-point Veterans' Preference, plus the proof required by that form. You can find additional information about Veterans' Preference at https://www.fedshirevets.gov/.

If you are applying under the Schedule A Hiring Authority and wish to be considered you must supply supporting documentation. Documentation of disability is required, i.e., Schedule A Letter. Such documentation is used to verify that the individual being hired is indeed a person with an intellectual disability, severe physical disability, or psychiatric disability. This documentation must be provided to the hiring agency at the time of application, before an individual can be hired. Documentation of eligibility for employment under Schedule A can be obtained from a licensed medical professional (e.g., a physician or other medical professional certified by a state, the District of Columbia, or a U.S territory to practice medicine); a licensed vocational rehabilitation specialist (i.e., state or private); or any Federal agency, state agency, or agency of the District of Columbia or a U.S. territory that issues or provides disability benefits. You may refer to the following link to view Proof of Disability Documentation (https://www.opm.gov/faqs/QA.aspx?fid=de14aff4-4f77-4e17-afaa-fa109430fc7b&pid=a79f6a77-248f-47bc-80e6-ce9bd40607a2)

If you are applying for a position that requires a college degree, you must submit your College Transcripts.

All supplemental documents will now be collected electronically and should be submitted before the closing date of this vacancy announcement. You have three choices for submitting your supplemental documents:

1. Use the ""USAJOBS"" feature to download documents from your USAJOBS portfolio; or

2. use the ""Upload"" feature to upload documents directly from your computer. The following types of documents can be uploaded:

.gif, .jpeg, .png, .rtf, .pdf, and .doc; or

3. use the ""Fax"" feature to print the Fax Cover Sheet and fax it, along with your supplemental documents to 1-571-258-4052.
Benefits

Benefits
A career with the U.S. Government provides employees with a comprehensive benefits package. As a federal employee, you and your family will have access to a range of benefits that are designed to make your federal career very rewarding. Opens in a new windowLearn more about federal benefits.
As an NRC employee you will enjoy excellent Federal Benefits, including: comprehensive health and life insurance plans; Flexible Spending Account Program for health and dependent care; Long Term Care Insurance; Dental and Vision Insurance; retirement savings and investment plan similar to 401(k) (Thrift Savings Plan); annual (vacation) and paid sick leave; family friendly leave policies; 10 paid holidays per year; transit benefits. This link provides an overview of the benefits currently offered to Federal employees. https://help.usajobs.gov/index.php/Pay_and_Benefits
Eligibility for benefits depends on the type of position you hold and whether your position is full-time, part-time, or intermittent. Contact the hiring agency for more information on the specific benefits offered.
Help
This job is open to
The public
U.S. citizens, nationals or those who owe allegiance to the U.S.",767,Washington
104,ENGINEER,US Naval Sea Systems Command,"Washington Navy Yard, DC","$103,690 - $172,500 a year","Duties
Summary
You will serve as a ENGINEER in the COLUMBIA BRANCH of the NAVAL ARCHITECTURE & ENGINEERING DEPARTMENT ofCARDEROCK DIV NS.

This position is part of the Warfare Centers Personnel Demonstration Project. The ND-5 pay band encompasses positions equivalent to GS-14 and GS-15.
Responsibilities
You will serve as the PMS 397 COLUMBIA Class Submarine Research and Development Manager.
You will manage and direct the research and development budget and activities for programs/projects under the Program Executive Officer, COLUMBIA (PEO-COLUMBIA) for COLUMBIA Class.
You will serve as the National-level senior technical expert supporting the COLUMBIA Class Program manager by directing the application of research and applied science efforts to control cost, schedule, and performance risks for the submarine class.
You will exercise delegated program authority for COLUMBIA Class.
You will establish, defend, award, and manage the execution of COLUMBIA Program Office (PMS397) Research and Development Budgets.
You will represent the COLUMBIA Program Office (PMS397) in discussions with shipbuilders, FFRDCs, ONR, DARPA, Warfare Centers, and academia.
You will lead in the resolution of emergent, quick turn-around, high priority programmatic and technical issues.
You will develop cost-effective systems and designs that meet requirements through close working relationships with technical warrant holders, subject matter experts, systems engineering specialists, ship designers, and fabrication trades.
Travel Required
Occasional travel - You may be expected to travel for this position.
Supervisory status
No
Promotion Potential
None
Job family (Series)
0801 General Engineering
Requirements

Requirements
Conditions of Employment
Must be a US Citizen.
Must be determined suitable for federal employment.
Must participate in the direct deposit pay program.
New employees to the Department of the Navy will be required to successfully pass the E-Verify employment verification check. To learn more about E-Verify, including your rights and responsibilities, visit e-verify.gov
Males born after 12-31-59 must be registered for Selective Service.
You will be required to obtain and maintain an interim and/or final security clearance prior to entrance on duty. Failure to obtain and maintain the required level of clearance may result in the withdrawal of a job offer or removal.
This position is covered under the Defense Acquisition Workforce Improvement Act (DAWIA). You must be certified as a Career Field ENGINEERING Level III. Certification is required within 24 months of appointment
This position may require travel from normal duty station to CONUS and OCONUS and may include remote or isolated sites. You must be able to travel on military and commercial aircraft for extended periods of time
You will be required to complete ethics orientation within three months of appointment and submit a Confidential Financial Disclosure Report, OGE-450, within 30 days of appointment.
Qualifications
In addition to the Basic Requirements for this position, your resume must also demonstrate at least one year of specialized experience equivalent to the next lower grade ND-04 (GS-12/13 equivalency) in the Federal service or equivalent experience in the private or public sector as a professional engineer analyzing and assessing submersible systems including adapting engineering or naval architectural theories and concepts, to develop research studies for the advancement of Naval submarine systems.

Additional qualification information can be found from the following Office of Personnel Management website:
https://www.opm.gov/policy-data-oversight/classification-qualifications/general-schedule-qualification-standards/#url=List-by-Occupational-Series AND https://www.opm.gov/policy-data-oversight/classification-qualifications/general-schedule-qualification-standards/0800/files/all-professional-engineering-positions-0800.pdf

Experience refers to paid and unpaid experience, including volunteer work done through National Service programs (e.g., professional, philanthropic, religious, spiritual, community, student, social). Volunteer work helps build critical competencies, knowledge, and skills and can provide valuable training and experience that translates directly to paid employment.
Education
Applicants must meet the following basic education requirements of the Office of Personnel Management (OPM) Qualifications Standards Manual:

Successful completion of a professional engineering degree. To be acceptable, the program must: (1) lead to a bachelor's degree (or higher) in a school of engineering with at least one program accredited by the Accreditation Board for Engineering and Technology (ABET); or (2) include differential and integral calculus and courses (more advanced than first-year physics and chemistry) in five of the following seven areas of engineering science or physics: (a) statics, dynamics; (b) strength of materials (stress-strain relationships); (c) fluid mechanics, hydraulics; (d) thermodynamics; (e) electrical fields and circuits; (f) nature and properties of materials (relating particle and aggregate structure to properties); and (g) any other comparable area of fundamental engineering science or physics, such as optics, heat transfer, soil mechanics, or electronics. Such education must demonstrate the knowledge, skills, and abilities necessary to do the work of the position.

OR

Current registration as an Engineer Intern (EI), Engineer in Training (EIT), or licensure as a Professional Engineer (PE) by any State, the District of Columbia, Guam, or Puerto Rico. Absent other means of qualifying under this standard, those applicants who achieved such registration by means other than written test (e.g., State grandfather or eminence provisions) are eligible only for positions that are within or closely related to the specialty field of their registration For more information about EI and EIT registration requirements, please visit the National Society of Professional Engineers website at: http://www.nspe.org

OR

Evidence of having successfully passed the Fundamentals of Engineering (FE) examination or any other written test required for professional registration by an engineering licensure board in the various States, the District of Columbia, Guam, and Puerto Rico The FE examination is not administered by the U. S. Office of Personnel Management. For more information, please visit: http://www.nspe.org/Licensure/HowtoGetLicensed/index.html.

OR

Successful completion of at least 60 semester hours of courses in the physical, mathematical, and engineering sciences and in engineering that included the courses specified in the basic requirements under paragraph A (above). The courses must be fully acceptable toward meeting the requirements of an engineering program as described in paragraph A (above)

OR

Successful completion of a curriculum leading to a bachelor's degree in an appropriate scientific field, e.g., engineering technology, physics, chemistry, architecture, computer science, mathematics, hydrology, or geology, may be accepted in lieu of a bachelor's degree in engineering, provided the applicant has had at least one year of professional engineering experience acquired under professional engineering supervision and guidance. Ordinarily, there should be either an established plan of intensive training to develop professional engineering competence, or several years of prior professional engineering-type experience, e.g., in interdisciplinary positions.
Additional information
This position is covered by the Department of Defense Priority Placement Program.

Additional vacancies may be filled by this announcement.

A tentative offer of employment will be rescinded if the selectee fails to meet the pre-employment requirements, including failure to report to any of the scheduled appointments.

If you are unable to apply online and request information about the Alternate Application process, please contact the Department of Navy's Employment Information Center.

Federal annuitant information: The selection of an annuitant is subject to the Department of Defense and Department of the Navy policy on the employment of annuitants. Policy information may be found at: http://www.secnav.navy.mil/donhr/Documents/CivilianJobs/FedCivAnnuitants.pdf

Military Spouse Preference applicants will receive priority consideration at the Full Performance Level (FPL) and if determined to be Best Qualified at the FPL, and selected, must be placed at the FPL. A BQ military spouse possesses knowledge, skills, abilities, and competencies comparable to others who meet the competitive referral criteria for the specific position.

A relocation incentive is generally a single payment intended to offset some of the relocation costs experienced by the selectee. A relocation incentive may be authorized.

This position is eligible for part time, full time or ad-hoc telework at the discretion of management.

How You Will Be Evaluated
You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications above.
When the application process is complete, we will review your resume to ensure you meet the hiring eligibility and qualification requirements listed in this announcement. You will be rated based on the information provided in your resume and responses to the Occupational Questionnaire, along with your supporting documentation to determine your ability to demonstrate the following competencies:
ACCOUNTABILITY
ENGINEERING PROJECT MANAGEMENT
INFLUENCING/NEGOTIATING
RESEARCH AND DEVELOPMENT
RISK MANAGEMENT
SYSTEMS ENGINEERING

You should list any relevant performance appraisals and incentive awards in your resume as that information may be taken into consideration during the selection process. If selected, you may be required to provide supporting documentation.

If after reviewing your resume and supporting documentation, a determination is made that you inflated your qualifications and/or experience, your score may be adjusted to more accurately reflect your abilities or you may be found ineligible/not qualified.

Please follow all instructions carefully. Errors or omissions may affect your rating or consideration for employment.

All eligibility, qualifications, and time-in-grade requirements must be met by the closing date of this announcement.

Background checks and security clearance
Security clearance
Secret
Drug test required
No
Required Documents

Required Documents
You are required to provide documentation that supports the eligibility and qualification claims made in your resume and assessment questionnaire. You must submit the applicable documents listed here and those listed with the eligibilities you select in the announcement questionnaire with your application package. Applicants who do not provide supporting documentation that fully support their claims will not be referred to the hiring manager. Cover letter is optional.

A complete resume is required. Your resume must show relevant experience, job title, duties and accomplishments. Your resume must show complete information for each job entry to support minimum qualifications. The following information should be provided in your resume, but it is acceptable to provide elsewhere in your application package: employer's name, starting and end dates (Mo/Yr), hours per week, and pay plan, series and grade level (e.g. GS-0201-09) for relevant federal experience.TIP: A good way to ensure you include all essential information is to use the Resume Builder in USAJOBS to create your resume.

Are you applying for a promotion? If you are a current employee applying for a higher grade than the grade that you currently hold you must provide an SF-50 that shows that you have held the next lower grade for at least one year. Some SF-50s effective within the last 52 weeks will not demonstrate you have held the next lower grade for at least one year (e.g. General Adjustment SF-50 from this year). In many cases, we need to see two (2) SF-50s to determine eligibility for promotion. If you are a DoD employee, you can obtain a copy of your SF- 50(s) from MyBiz.

Are you claiming membership in any professional organizations, or possession of a license, certificate or credentials? Check the Conditions of Employment section above to see if any are required. If you claim membership, license, certification, or credentials, you must submit a copy of said document in your application package.


Are you using education as a substitute for some or all of the experience requirement? Is there a basic education requirement for this position? Check the Education section above to see what is allowed and what is required. Any claims you make in your resume or assessment questionnaire regarding education or degrees MUST be supported by submitting with your application official or unofficial transcripts or a list of courses, grades earned, completion dates, and quarter and semester hours earned issued from your school. While unofficial transcripts are acceptable for initial application, an official transcript will ultimately be required if you are selected for the position. You may submit a copy your degree(s) if specific coursework does not have to be verified.

Are you a veteran claiming 5-point veterans' preference or claiming sole survivorship preference? You must submit a copy of your latest DD-214 Certificate of Release or Discharge from Active Duty (any copy that shows all dates of service, as well as character of service [Honorable, General, etc.] is acceptable) OR a VA letter that shows dates of service or service connected disability AND character of service. If you have more than one DD-214 for multiple periods of active duty service, submit a copy for each period of service. If you were issued a DD-215 to amend aforementioned information on the DD-214 you must submit that too. If you are not sure of your preference eligibility, visit the Department of Labor's website: Veterans' Preference Advisor

Are you a disabled veteran or claiming 10-point veterans' preference?
If you are eligible to claim 10 point veterans preference you must submit a DD-214 Certificate of Release or Discharge from Active Duty as described above for 5-point preference.

You must also provide the applicable supporting documentation of your disability (e.g. disability letter from the VA) as described on Standard Form-15 (SF-15). http://www.opm.gov/forms/pdf_fill/SF15.pdf.

Are you an active duty service member? Active Duty Service Members are required to submit a statement of service printed on command letterhead and signed by the command. The statement of service must provide the branch of service, rate/rank, all dates of service, the expected date of discharge and anticipated character of service (Honorable, General, etc.).

Documents submitted as part of the application package, to include supplemental documents, may be shared beyond the Human Resources Office. Some supplemental documents contain personal information such as SSN and DOB and some documents such as military orders and marriage certificates may contain personal information for someone other than you. You may sanitize these documents to remove said personal information before you submit your application. You must provide an un-sanitized version of the documents if you are selected.
If you are relying on your education to meet qualification requirements:
Education must be accredited by an accrediting institution recognized by the U.S. Department of Education in order for it to be credited towards qualifications. Therefore, provide only the attendance and/or degrees from schools accredited by accrediting institutions recognized by the U.S. Department of Education.
Failure to provide all of the required information as stated in this vacancy announcement may result in an ineligible rating or may affect the overall rating.
Benefits

Benefits
A career with the U.S. Government provides employees with a comprehensive benefits package. As a federal employee, you and your family will have access to a range of benefits that are designed to make your federal career very rewarding. Opens in a new windowLearn more about federal benefits.
Review our benefits
Eligibility for benefits depends on the type of position you hold and whether your position is full-time, part-time, or intermittent. Contact the hiring agency for more information on the specific benefits offered.
Help
This job is open to
Internal to an agency
Current federal employees of this agency.
Land & base management
Certain current or former term or temporary federal employees of a land or base management agency.
Special authorities
Individuals eligible under a special authority not listed above, but defined in the federal hiring regulations.
Clarification from the agency
Current permanent employees of UIC 00167, current or former time-limited employees that occupied a position located at a Defense Industrial Base Facility (DIBF) or Major Range and Test Facilities Base (MRTFB), and DoD Military Spouse Preference (MSP) eligibles",767,Washington
